2547
Agent_Orange
Army Huey helicopter spraying Agent Orange over Vietnamese agricultural landAgent Orange is the code name for one of the herbicides and defoliants used by the U.S. military as part of its warfare program, Ranch Hand, during the War from 1961 to 1971. Vietnam estimates 400,000 people being killed or maimed, and 500,000 children born with defects.(York,Geoffrey; Mick, Hayley; Last Ghost of the Vietnam War, The Globe and Mail, July 12, 2008)A 50:50 mixture of 2,4,5-T and 2,4-D, it was manufactured for the Department of Defense primarily by Corporation and Chemical. The 2,4,5-T used to produce Agent Orange was later discovered to be contaminated with 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzodioxin, an extremely toxic compound. It was given its name from the color of the orange-striped 55 US gallon (200 L) barrels in which it was shipped, and was by far the most widely used of the so-called Herbicides.(During the Vietnam War, between 1962 and 1971, the United States military sprayed nearly  of chemical herbicides and defoliants in Vietnam, eastern Laos and parts of Cambodia, as part of Ranch Hand.(Pellow, David N. Resisting Global Toxics: Transnational Movements for Environmental Justice, MIT Press, 2007, p. 159, (ISBN 0-262-16244-X).)(Stellman et al. 2003: pp 681687) The programs goal was to defoliate forested and rural land, depriving guerrillas of cover; another goal was to induce draft urbanization, destroying the ability of peasants to support themselves in the countryside, and forcing them to flee to the U.S. dominated cities, thus depriving the guerrillas of their rural support base and food supply.(Stellman et al. 2003: pp 681687)(The US began to target food crops in October 1962, primarily using Blue. In 1965, 42 percent of all herbicide spraying was dedicated to food crops.( Rural-to-urban migration rates dramatically increased in South Vietnam, as peasants escaped the destruction and famine in the countryside by fleeing to the U.S.-dominated cities. The urban population in South Vietnam nearly tripled: from 2.8 million people in 1958, to 8 million by 1971. The rapid flow of people led to a fast-paced and uncontrolled urbanization; an estimated 1.5 million people were living in Saigon slums, while many South Vietnamese elites and U.S. personnel lived in luxury.(Luong, 2003: pp. 4)United States Air Force records show that at least 6,542 spraying missions took place over the course of Operation Ranch Hand.() By 1971, 12 percent of the total area of South Vietnam had been sprayed with defoliating chemicals, at an average concentration of 13 times the recommended USDA application rate for domestic use.(SBSG, 1971: p. 36) In South Vietnam alone, an estimated 10 million hectares of agricultural land were ultimately destroyed.(Luong, 2003: p. 3) In some areas TCDD concentrations in soil and water were hundreds of times greater than the levels considered safe by the Environmental Protection Agency.(Fawthrop, Tom; Vietnams war against Agent Orange, BBC News, June 14, 2004)(Fawthrop, Tom; Agent of Suffering, Guardian, February 10, 2008) Overall, more than 20% of South Vietnams forests were sprayed at least once over a nine year period.()Chemical description and toxicologyChemically, Agent Orange is an approximately 1:1 mixture of two herbicides  acid (2,4-D) and acid (2,4,5-T)  in iso-octyl ester form.(IOM, 1994: p. 90)Numerous studies have examined health effects linked to Agent Orange, its component compounds, and its manufacturing byproducts.(Frumkin, 2003: pp.245255)Prior to the controversy surrounding Agent Orange, there was already a large body of scientific evidence linking 2,4,5-T and 2,4-D to serious negative health effects and ecological damage.(Young, 2009: p. 2) But in 1969, it was revealed to the public that the 2,4,5-T was contaminated with a dioxin, 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzodioxin (TCDD), and that the TCDD was causing many of the previously unexplained adverse health effects which were correlated with Agent Orange exposure.(Young, 2009: p. 6) TCDD has been described as perhaps the most toxic molecule ever synthesized by man.(Schuck, 1987: p. 18) Internal memoranda revealed Monsanto Corporation (a manufacturer of 2,4,5-T) had informed the U.S. government as early as 1952 that 2,4,5-T was contaminated with a toxic contaminant.(Schuck, 1987: p. 17) In the manufacture of 2,4,5-T, accidental overheating of the reaction mixture easily causes the product to condense into the toxic self-condensation product TCDD. At the time, precautions were not taken against this unintended side reaction, which caused also the disaster in Italy in 1976. In addition to this, 2,4,5-T is hazardous in its own right.In 1979, the Yale biologist Arthur Galston, who specialized in herbicide research, published a review of what was known at the time about the toxicity of TCDD. Even vanishingly small quantities of dioxin in the diet caused adverse health effects when tested on animals.( Since then, TCDD has been comprehensively studied. It has been associated with increased neoplasms in every animal bioassay reported in the scientific literature.(Dwyer and Flesch-Janys, Editorial: Agent Orange in Vietnam, Journal of Public Health, April 1995, Vol 85. No. 4, p. 476) The National Toxicology Program has classified TCDD as known to be a human carcinogen, frequently associated with soft-tissue sarcoma, lymphoma, lymphoma and lymphocytic leukemia (CLL).(Committee Recommendations: 2,3,7,8- Tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD))(NTP, 2006: )While the two herbicides that make up Agent Orange, 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T, remain toxic over a short perioda scale of days or weeksthey quickly degrade. A 1969 report authored by K. Diane Courtney and others found 2,4,5-T could cause birth defects and stillbirths in mice.(Buckingham, 1992: Chapter IX  Ranch Hand Ends) Several studies have shown an increased rate of cancer mortality for workers exposed to 2,4,5-T. In one such study, from Germany, the risk of cancer mortality increased by 170% after working for 10 years at the 2,4,5-T-producing section of a Hamburg manufacturing plant.( Three studies have suggested prior exposure to Agent Orange poses an increased risk of myelogenous leukemia in the children of Vietnam veterans.(Starting in 1991, the US Congress asked the of Medicine to review the scientific literature on Agent Orange and the other herbicides used in Vietnam, including their active ingredients and the dioxin contaminant. The IOM found an association between dioxin exposure and diabetes.(IOM, 2000)(Data Suggest a Possible Association Between Agent Orange Exposure and Hypertension, Office of News and Public Information, National Academy of Sciences. Quote: the report also concluded that there is suggestive but limited evidence that AL amyloidosis is associated with herbicide exposure (accessed:19 May 2008))Early developmentIn 1943 plant biologist Galston began studying the compound acid as a plant growth hormone, in an attempt to adapt soybeans to a short growing season. Galston found that excessive usage of the compound caused catastrophic defoliation  a finding later used by his colleague Ian Sussex to develop the family of herbicides used in Operation Ranch Hand.(Pearce, Jeremy; Arthur Galston, Agent Orange Researcher, Is Dead at 88  Obituary New York Times, June 23, 2008 (accessed August 18, 2008)) Galston was especially concerned about the compounds side effects to humans and the environment.(Peterson, Doug Arthur W. Galston: Matters of Light, LASNews Magazine, of Illinois, Spring 2005)In 1943, the U.S. Department of the Army contracted the University of Chicago to study the effects of 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T on cereal grains (including rice) and broadleaf crops. From these studies arose the concept of using aerial applications of herbicides to destroy enemy crops to disrupt their food supply. In early 1945, the U.S. army ran tests of various 2,4-D and 2,4,5-T mixtures at the Army Airfield in Florida, which is now listed as a Used Defense Site (FUDS).(Young, 2009: p.24)(Verwey, 1977: p. 111)Use in the Vietnam WarDuring the Vietnam War, between 1962 and 1971, the United States military sprayed nearly  of chemical herbicides and defoliants in Vietnam, eastern Laos and parts of Cambodia, as part of the aerial defoliation program known as Ranch Hand.(( The goal was to defoliate rural/forested land, depriving guerrillas of food and cover and clearing in sensitive areas such as around base perimeters.(Tucker, Spencer. Encyclopedia of the Vietnam War: Political, Social and Military History. ABC-CLIO, Inc. Santa Barbara. 1998.) The program was also a part of a general policy of draft urbanization, which aimed to destroy the ability of peasants to support themselves in the countryside, forcing them to flee to the U.S. dominated cities, depriving the guerrillas of their rural support base.((Spraying was usually done either from helicopters or from low-flying Provider aircraft, fitted with sprayers and MC-1 Hourglass pump systems and  chemical tanks. Spray runs were also conducted from trucks, boats, and backpack sprayers.(Schuck, 1987: p. 16)(Agent Orange and Cancer, American Cancer Society, 2010)(Young, 2009: p. 26)The first batch of herbicides was unloaded at Son Nhut Air base in South Vietnam, on January 9, 1962.(Hay, 1982: p. 151) Air Force records show at least 6,542 spraying missions took place over the course of Operation Ranch Hand.( By 1971, 12 percent of the total area of South Vietnam had been sprayed with defoliating chemicals, at an average concentration of 13 times the recommended USDA application rate for domestic use.( In South Vietnam alone, an estimated 10 million hectares of agricultural land were ultimately destroyed.( In some areas, TCDD concentrations in soil and water were hundreds of times greater than the levels considered safe by the Environmental Protection Agency.((The campaign destroyed  of upland and mangrove forests and millions of acres of crops. Overall, more than 20% of South Vietnams forests were sprayed at least once over a nine year period.((In 1965, members of the U.S. Congress were told crop destruction is understood to be the more important purpose ... but the emphasis is usually given to the jungle defoliation in public mention of the program.(Verwey, 1977: p. 113) Soldiers were told they were destroying crops because they were going to be used to feed guerrillas. They later discovered nearly all of the food they had been destroying was not being produced for guerrillas; it was, in reality, only being grown to support the local civilian population. For example, in Quang Ngai province, 85% of the crop lands were scheduled to be destroyed in 1970 alone. Widespread famine occurred as a result, leaving hundreds of thousands of people malnourished or starving.(Verwey, 1977: p. 116)The U.S. military began targeting food crops in October 1962, primarily using Blue; the American public was not made aware of the crop destruction programs until 1965 (and it was then believed that crop spraying had begun that spring). In 1965, 42 percent of all herbicide spraying was dedicated to food crops. The first official acknowledgement of the programs came from the Department in March 1966.((Many experts at the time, including Arthur Galston, the biologist who developed and intensively studied TCDD, opposed herbicidal warfare, due to concerns about the side effects to humans and the environment by indiscriminately spraying the chemical over a wide area. As early as 1966, resolutions were introduced to the Nations charging that the U.S. was violating the 1925 Protocol, which regulated the use of chemical and biological weapons.((Schuck, 1987: p. 19)Effects on the Vietnamese peopleHealth effectsThe Vietnam Red Cross reported as many as 3 million Vietnamese people have been affected by Agent Orange, including at least 150,000 children born with birth defects.( According to Vietnamese Ministry of Foreign Affairs, 4.8 million Vietnamese people were exposed to Agent Orange, resulting in 400,000 people being killed or maimed, and 500,000 children born with birth defects.(Children in the areas where Agent Orange was used have been affected and have multiple health problems, including cleft palate, mental disabilities, hernias, and extra fingers and toes.( In the 1970s, high levels of dioxin were found in the milk of South Vietnamese women, and in the blood of U.S. soldiers who had served in Vietnam.() The most affected zones are the mountainous area along Truong Son (Long Mountains) and the border between Vietnam and Cambodia. The affected residents are living in substandard conditions with many genetic diseases.(Vietnam Ministry of Foreign Affairs  Support Agent Orange Victims in Vietnamese.)File:Agent-orange-dead-deformed-babies.jpg|thumb|right|Vietnamese babies, deformed and stillborn after prenatal dioxin exposure from Agent OrangeAbout 28 of the former US military bases in Vietnam where the herbicides were stored and loaded onto airplanes may still have high level of dioxins in the soil, posing a health threat to the surrounding communities. Extensive testing for dioxin contamination has been conducted at the former US airbases in Da Nang, Phu Cat and Bien Hoa. Some of the soil and sediment on the bases have extremely high levels of dioxin requiring remediation. The Da Nang Airbase has dioxin contamination up to 350 times higher than international recommendations for action.(Hatfield Consultants. Evaluation of Contamination at the Agent Orange Dioxin Hot Spots in Bien Hoa, Phu Cat and Vicinity, Vietnam. June 2009)(Hatfield Consultants and the Office of the National Steering Commitee 33. Assessment of dioxin contamination in the environment and human population in the vicinity of Da Nang Airbase, Viet Nam. Vancouver, Canada: Hatfield Consultants, 2007. Final Report.) The contaminated soil and sediment continue to affect the citizens of Vietnam, poisoning their food chain and causing illnesses, serious skin diseases and a variety of cancers in the lungs, larynx, and prostate.()Ecological effectsAbout 17.8% (3,100,000 ha) of the total forested area of Vietnam was sprayed during the war, which dramatically disrupted ecological equilibrium. Furthermore, the persistent nature of dioxins, erosion caused by loss of protective tree cover, and loss of seeding forest stock, meant reforestation was difficult or impossible in many areas.(Furukawa, 2004: p. 215) Many defoliated forest areas were quickly invaded by aggressive pioneer species, such as bamboo and grass, which make it unlikely the forests will be able to regenerate. Animal species diversity was also significantly impacted: in one study, a Harvard biologist found 24 species of birds and 5 species of mammals in a sprayed forest, while in two adjacent sections of unsprayed forest there were 145 and 170 species of birds and 30 and 55 species of mammals.()Dioxins from Agent Orange have persisted in the Vietnamese environment since the war, settling in the soil and sediment and entering into food chain through the animals and fish that feed in the contaminated areas. Movement of dioxins through the web has resulted in bioconcentration and biomagnification.() The areas most heavily contaminated with dioxins are the sites of former U.S. air bases.(Furukawa, 2004: pp. 221222)Sociopolitical effectsThe Corporations Memorandum 5446-ISA/ARPA states: the fact that the VC obtain most of their food from the neutral rural population dictates the destruction of civilian crops ... if they (the VC) are to be hampered by the crop destruction program, it will be necessary to destroy large portions of the rural economy  probably 50% or more.(Verwey, 1977: p.115)Rural-to-urban migration rates dramatically increased in South Vietnam, as peasants escaped the destruction in the countryside by fleeing to the U.S.-dominated cities. The urban population in South Vietnam more than tripled: from 2.8 million people in 1958, to 8 million by 1971. The rapid flow of people led to a fast-paced and uncontrolled urbanization; an estimated 1.5 million people were living in Saigon slums, while many South Vietnamese elites and U.S. personnel lived in luxury.(Effects on U.S. veteransStudies of veterans who served in the South during the war have increased rates of cancer, nerve, digestive, skin and respiratory disorders. Veterans from the south had higher rates of throat cancer, acute/chronic leukemia, Hodgkins lymphoma and non-Hodgkins lymphoma, prostate cancer, lung cancer, soft tissue sarcoma and liver cancer. Other than liver cancer, these are the same conditions the US Veterans Administration has found to be associated with exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin, and are on the list of conditions eligible for compensation and treatment.()Military personnel who loaded airplanes and helicopters used in Ranch Hand probably sustained some of the heaviest exposures. Members of the Chemical Corps, who stored and mixed herbicides and defoliated the perimeters of military bases, are also thought to have had some of the heaviest exposures. Others with potentially heavy exposures included members of Army Special Forces units who defoliated remote campsites, and members of Navy river units who cleared base perimeters.(Frumkin, 2003: p. 3)  Military members who served on Okinawa also claim to have been exposed to the chemical.(Mitchell, Jon, Evidence for Agent Orange on Okinawa, Times, 12 April 2011, p. 12.)While in Vietnam, the veterans were told not to worry, and were persuaded the chemical was harmless.(Hermann, Kenneth J.; Killing Me Softly: How Agent Orange Murders Vietnams Children, Political Affairs, April 25, 2006) After returning home, Vietnam veterans began to suspect their ill health or the instances of their wives having miscarriages or children born with birth defects may be related to Agent Orange and the other toxic herbicides to which they were exposed in Vietnam. Veterans began to file claims in 1977 to the Department of Veterans Affairs for disability payments for health care for conditions they believed were associated with exposure to Agent Orange, or more specifically, dioxin, but their claims were denied unless they could prove the condition began when they were in the service or within one year of their discharge.By April 1993, the Department of Veterans Affairs had only compensated 486 victims, although it had received disability claims from 39,419 soldiers who had been exposed to Agent Orange while serving in Vietnam.()Legal and diplomatic proceedingsUS veterans class action lawsuit against manufacturersSince at least 1978, several lawsuits have been filed against the companies which produced Agent Orange, among them Dow Chemical, Monsanto, and Shamrock.Mayerson of the firm Mayerson Law Offices, P.C. was an early pioneer in Agent Orange litigation, working with renowned environmental attorney Yannacone in 1980 on the first class-action suits against wartime manufacturers of Agent Orange. In meeting Dr. Ronald A. Codario, one of the first civilian doctors to see afflicted patients, Mayerson, so impressed by the fact an M.D. would show so much interest in a Vietnam veteran, forwarded more than a thousand pages of information on Agent Orange and the effects of dioxin on animals and humans to Codarios office the day after he was first contacted by the doctor.(Wilcox, 1983: ) The corporate defendants sought to escape culpability by blaming everything on the U.S. government.()The Mayerson Law Offices, P.C., with Sgt. E. Hartz as their principal client, filed the first Agent Orange class action lawsuit, in Pennsylvania in 1980, for the injuries soldiers in Vietnam suffered through exposure to toxic dioxins in the Agent Orange defoliant.(http://news.google.com/newspapers?nid1347&dat19800125&idZdMSAAAAIBAJ&sjid0_oDAAAAIBAJ&pg5065,3012612 Dying Veteran May Speak From Beyond The Grave In Court: Ledger) Attorney Hy Mayerson co-wrote the brief that certified the Agent Orange Product Liability action as a action, the largest ever filed as of its filing.(Croft, Steve; Agent Orange, CBS Evening News, May 7, 1980) Hartzs deposition was one of the first ever taken in America, and the first for an Agent Orange trial, for the purpose of preserving testimony at trial, as it was understood that Hartz would not live to see the trial because of the tumor that began to develop while he was a member of Force, Forces, and LRRPs in Vietnam.()(Pottstown Mercury) The firm also located and supplied critical research to the Veterans lead expert, Dr. Ronald A. Codario, M.D., including about 100 hundred articles from toxicology journals dating back more than a decade, as well as data about where herbicides had been sprayed, what the effects of dioxin had been on animals and humans, and every accident in factories where herbicides were produced or dioxin was a contaminant of some chemical reaction.(In 1984, the class-action suit was settled out of court for $180 million; slightly over 45% of this was ordered to be paid by Monsanto alone.()() Many veterans who were victims of Agent Orange exposure were outraged the case had been settled instead of going to court, and felt they had been betrayed by the lawyers. Fairness Hearings were held in five major American cities, where veterans and their families discussed their reactions to the settlement, and condemned the actions of the lawyers and courts, demanding the case be heard before a jury of their peers. Federal Judge Julius Weinstein refused the appeals, claiming the settlement was fair and just. By 1989, the veterans fears were confirmed when it was decided how the money from the settlement would be paid out. A totally disabled Vietnam veteran would receive a maximum of $12,000 spread out over the course of 10 years. Furthermore, by accepting the settlement payments, disabled veterans would become ineligible for many state benefits that provided far more monetary support than the settlement, such as food stamps, public assistance, and government pensions. A widow of a Vietnam veteran who died of Agent Orange exposure would only receive $3700.()In 2004, Jill Montgomery, a spokesperson for Monsanto, said Monsanto should not be liable at all for injuries or deaths caused by Agent Orange, saying: We are sympathetic with people who believe they have been injured and understand their concern to find the cause, but reliable scientific evidence indicates that Agent Orange is not the cause of serious long-term health effects.()New Jersey Agent Orange CommissionIn 1980, Jersey created the New Jersey Agent Orange Commission, the first state commission created to study its effects. The commissions research project in association with University was called The Pointman Project. It was disbanded by Governor Todd Whitman in 1996.(New York Times, July 3, 1996)During Pointman I, commission researchers devised ways to determine small dioxin levels in blood. Prior to this, such levels could only be found in the adipose (fat) tissue. The project compared dioxin levels in a small group of Vietnam veterans who had been exposed to Agent Orange with a group of matched veterans who had not served in Vietnam. The results of this project were published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in 1988.(Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol. 259 No. 11, March 18, 1988)The second phase of the project continued to examine and compare dioxin levels in various groups of Vietnam veterans, including Army, Marines and brown water riverboat Navy personnel.US CongressIn 1991, the US Congress enacted the Orange Act, giving the Department of Veterans Affairs the authority to declare certain conditions presumptive to exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin, making these veterans who served in Vietnam eligible to receive treatment and compensation for these conditions.(Agent Orange  Office of Public Health and Environmental Hazards) The same law required the National Academy of Sciences to periodically review the science on dioxin and herbicides used in Vietnam to inform the Secretary of Veterans Affairs about the strength of the scientific evidence showing association between exposure to Agent Orange/dioxin and certain conditions.(PL 102-4 and The National Academy of Sciences)Through this process, the list of presumptive conditions has grown since 1991, and currently the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs has listed prostate cancer, respiratory cancers, multiple myeloma, type II diabetes, Hodgkins disease, non-Hodgkins lymphoma, soft tissue sarcoma, chloracne, porphyria cutanea tarda, peripheral neuropathy, chronic lymphocytic leukemia, and spina bifida in children of veterans exposed to Agent Orange as conditions associated with exposure to the herbicide. This list now includes B cell leukemias, such as hairy cell leukemia, Parkinsons disease and ischemic heart disease, these last three having been added on August 31, 2010. Several highly placed individuals in government are voicing concerns about whether some of the diseases on the list should, in fact, actually have been included.()U.S./Vietnamese government negotiationsIn 2002, Vietnam and the US held a joint conference on Human Health and Environmental Impacts of Agent Orange. Following the conference, the US Institute of Environmental Health Sciences (NIEHS) began scientific exchanges between the US and Vietnam, and began discussions for a joint research project on the human health impacts of Agent Orange. (Young, 2009: p. 310)These negotiations broke down in 2005, when neither side could agree on the research protocol and the research project was cancelled. More progress has been made on the environmental front. In 2005, the first US-Vietnam workshop on remediation of dioxin was held. (Young, 2009: p. 310)Starting in 2005, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) began to work with the Vietnamese government to measure the level of dioxin at the Nang Airbase. Also in 2005, the Joint Advisory Committee on Agent Orange, made up of representatives of Vietnamese and US government agencies, was established. The committee has been meeting yearly to explore areas of scientific cooperation, technical assistance and environmental remediation of dioxin.()A breakthrough in the diplomatic stalemate on this issue occurred as a result of United States President George W. Bushs state visit to Vietnam in November 2006. In the joint statement, President Bush and Triet agreed further joint efforts to address the environmental contamination near former dioxin storage sites would make a valuable contribution to the continued development of their bilateral relationship.(Joint Statement Between the Socialist Republic of Vietnam and the United States of America. Pres. George W Bush Whitehouse Press office. Accessed December 31, 2008. (original no longer available PDF available at http://www.warlegacies.org/Bush.pdf.))In late May 2007, President Bush signed into law a supplemental spending bill for the war in Iraq and Afghanistan that included an earmark of $3 million specifically for funding for programs for the remediation of dioxin hotspots on former US military bases, and for public health programs for the surrounding communities;(Martin, May 2009: p. 2) some authors consider this to be completely inadequate, pointing out that the U.S. airbase in Nang, alone, will cost $14 million to clean up, and that three others are estimated to require $60 million for cleanup.( The appropriation was renewed in the fiscal year 2009 and again in FY 2010. An additional $12 million was appropriated in the fiscal year 2010 in the Supplemental Appropriations Act and a total of $18.5 million appropriated for fiscal year 2011.()  Secretary of State Hillary Clinton stated during a visit to Hanoi in October 2010 that the US government would begin work on the clean-up of dioxin contamination at the Da Nang airbase. ()  In June 2011 a ceremony was held at Da Nang airport to mark the start of US-funded decontamination of dioxin hotspots in Vietnam. $32m has so far been allocated by the US congress to fund the program.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-asia-pacific-13808753)Vietnamese victims class action lawsuit in U.S. courtsOn January 31, 2004, a rights group, the Vietnam Association for Victims of Agent Orange/dioxin (VAVA), filed a lawsuit in the States District Court for the Eastern District of New York in Brooklyn, against several U.S. companies for liability in causing personal injury, by developing and producing the chemical. Dow Chemical and Monsanto were the two largest producers of Agent Orange for the U.S. military, and were named in the suit, along with the dozens of other companies (Diamond Shamrock, Uniroyal, Thompson Chemicals, Hercules, etc.). On March 10, 2005, Judge B. Weinstein of the Eastern District  who had presided over the 1984 US veterans class action lawsuit  dismissed the lawsuit, ruling there was no legal basis for the plaintiffs claims. He concluded Agent Orange was not considered a poison under law at the time of its use by the U.S.; the U.S. was not prohibited from using it as a herbicide; and the companies which produced the substance were not liable for the method of its use by the government. The U.S. government was not a party in the lawsuit, due to immunity, and the court ruled the chemical companies, as contractors of the US government, shared the same immunity. The case was appealed and heard by the Circuit Court of Appeals on June 18, 2007. The Court of Appeals upheld the dismissal of the case, stating the herbicides used during the war were not intended to be used to poison humans and therefore did not violate international law.(February 22, 2008 Decision by the Second Circuit Court of Appeals re: Vietnam Association of Victims of Agent Orange v. Dow Chemical Co.) The Supreme Court declined to consider the case.Three judges on the Second Circuit Court of Appeals in Manhattan heard the appeal on June 18, 2007. They upheld Weinsteins ruling to dismiss the case. They ruled that, though the herbicides contained a dioxin (a known poison), they were not intended to be used as a poison on humans. Therefore, they were not considered a chemical weapon and thus not a violation of international law. A further review of the case by the whole panel of judges of the Court of Appeals also confirmed this decision. The lawyers for the Vietnamese filed a petition to the US Supreme Court to hear the case. On March 2, 2009, the Supreme Court denied certiorari and refused to reconsider the ruling of the Court of Appeals.()In a November 2004 International poll of 987 people, 79% of respondents thought the US chemical companies which produced Agent Orange defoliant should compensate US soldiers who were affected by the toxic chemical used during the war in Vietnam. 51% said they supported compensation for Vietnamese Agent Orange victims.(Vietnam Ministry of Foreign Affairs; Americans support compensations for Agent Orange victims: poll, November 22, 2004)Help for those affected in VietnamTo assist those who have been affected by Agent Orange/dioxin, the Vietnamese have established peace villages, which each host between 50 and 100 victims, giving them medical and psychological help. As of 2006, there were 11 such villages, thus granting some social protection to fewer than a thousand victims. U.S. veterans of the war in Vietnam and individuals who are aware and sympathetic to the impacts of Agent Orange have supported these programs in Vietnam. An international group of veterans from the U.S. and its allies during the Vietnam War working with their former enemy  veterans from the Vietnam Veterans Association  established the Vietnam Friendship Village() outside of Hanoi.The center provides medical care, rehabilitation and vocational training for children and veterans from Vietnam who have been affected by Agent Orange. In 1998, The Red Cross established the Vietnam Agent Orange Victims Fund to provide direct assistance to families throughout Vietnam that have been affected. In 2003, the Association of Victims of Agent Orange (VAVA) was formed. In addition to filing the lawsuit against the chemical companies, VAVA provides medical care, rehabilitation services and financial assistance to those injured by Agent Orange.()The Vietnamese government provides small monthly stipends to more than 200,000 Vietnamese believed affected by the herbicides; this totaled $40.8 million in 2008 alone. The Vietnam Red Cross has raised more than $22 million to assist the ill or disabled, and several U.S. foundations, United Nations agencies, European governments and nongovernmental organizations have given a total of about $23 million for site cleanup, reforestation, health care and other services to those in need.(Statement by Amb. Ngo Quang Xuan to the U.S. House Foreign Affairs Subcommittee of Asia, Pacific and Global Environment, June 2009, p. 3)Vuong Mo of the Vietnam News Agency described one of centers:():May is 13, but she knows nothing, is unable to talk fluently, nor walk with ease due to for her bandy legs. Her father is dead and she has four elder brothers, all mentally retarded ... The students are all disabled, retarded and of different ages. Teaching them is a hard job. They are of the 3rd grade but many of them find it hard to do the reading. Only a few of them can. Their pronunciation is distorted due to their twisted lips and their memory is quite short. They easily forget what theyve learned ... In the Village, it is quite hard to tell the kids exact ages. Some in their twenties have a physical statures as small as the 7- or 8-years-old. They find it difficult to feed themselves, much less have mental ability or physical capacity for work. No one can hold back the tears when seeing the heads turning round unconsciously, the bandy arms managing to push the spoon of food into the mouths with awful difficulty ... Yet they still keep smiling, singing in their great innocence, at the presence of some visitors, craving for something beautiful.On June 16, 2010, members of U.S.-Vietnam Dialogue Group on Agent Orange/Dioxin unveiled a comprehensive 10-year Declaration and Plan of Action to address the toxic legacy of Agent Orange and other herbicides in Vietnam. The Plan of Action was released as an Aspen Institute publication and calls upon the U.S. and Vietnamese governments to join with other governments, foundations, businesses, and nonprofits in a partnership to clean up dioxin hot spots in Vietnam and to expand humanitarian services for people with disabilities there.(Public-private group has plan in the works to resolve issue. chicagotribune.com (December 8, 2009). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.)(Plan addresses Agent Orange legacy in Vietnam  World news  World environment  msnbc.com. MSNBC (June 16, 2010). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.)(Special Report: Agent Orange. Washingtonmonthly.com (January 6, 2010). Retrieved on January 27, 2011.) On September 16, 2010, Senator Patrick Leahy (D-VT) acknowledged the work of the Dialogue Group by releasing a statement on the floor of the United States Senate. The statement urges the U.S. government to take the Plan of Actions recommendations into account in developing a multi-year plan of activities to address the Agent Orange/dioxin legacy.(Congressional Record  Senate, September 16, 2010)Use outside VietnamWhile Agent Orange was only used between 1965 and 1970, 2,4-D, 2,4,5-T and other herbicides were used by the US military from the late 1940s through the 1970s.(Agent Orange information site)(Specifics of Agent Orange use)United StatesIn 1978, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency suspended spraying of Agent Orange in National Forests, due to a threefold increase in miscarriages in women living near forests that had been sprayed.(Nass, Meryl; Monsantos Agent Orange: The Persistent Ghost from the Vietnam War, Organic Consumers Association, 2002)(Nicosia and Swofford, 2004: p. 446)A December 2006 Department of Defense report listed Agent Orange testing, storage, and disposal sites at 32 locations throughout the United States, as well as in Canada, Thailand, Puerto Rico, Korea, and in the Pacific Ocean.(Young, 2006: pp. 56) The Veteran Administration has also acknowledged that Agent Orange was used domestically by U.S. forces in test sites throughout the US. Air Force Base in Florida was one of the primary testing sites throughout the 1960s.()KoreaAgent Orange was used in Korea in the late 1960s.() Republic of Korea troops were the only personnel involved in the spraying, which occurred along the Demilitarized Zone (DMZ). Citing declassified U.S. Department of Defense documents, Korean officials fear thousands of its soldiers may have come into contact with the deadly defoliant in the late 1960s and early 1970s. According to one top government official, as many as 30,000 Korean veterans are suffering from illness related to their exposure. The exact number of GIs who may have been exposed is unknown. But C. David Benbow, a North Carolina attorney who served as a sergeant with Co. C, 3rd Battalion, 23rd Infantry Regiment, 2nd Infantry Division, along the DMZ in 196869, estimates as many as 4,000 soldiers at any given time could have been affected..()In 1999, about 20,000 South Koreans filed two separated lawsuits against U.S. companies, seeking more than $5 billion in damages. After losing a decision in 2002, they filed an appeal.In January 2006, the South Korean Appeals Court ordered Dow Chemical and Monsanto to pay $62 million in compensation to about 6,800 people. The ruling acknowledged that the defendants failed to ensure safety as the defoliants manufactured by the defendants had higher levels of dioxins than standard, and, quoting the U.S. National Academy of Science report, declared that there was a causal relationship between Agent Orange and 11 diseases, including cancers of the lung, larynx and prostate. The judges failed to acknowledge the relationship between the chemical and peripheral neuropathy, the disease most widespread among Agent Orange victims according to the News.The United States local press KPHO-TV in Phoenix, Arizona alleged that the United States Army has buried Agent Orange in Camp Carroll, the U.S. Army base located in Gyeongsangbuk-do, Korea.() It is based on the claim of three U.S. Army veterans. They claimed approximately 250 55 gallon drums of Agent Orange were buried at Camp Carroll in 1978, which was indicated as Chemicals type Agent Orange or Province of Vietnam, Compound Orange with stripe around the barrel dated 1967 for the Republic of Vietnam. The South Korean Ministry of Environment announced that they will request cooperative investigation at Camp Carroll officially.()  The USFK issued a statement that confirmed that barrels were buried there, but all (plus an additional 60 tons of soil) were removed in 1996. ()Canadian Forces Base Gagetown (New Brunswick, Canada)The U.S. military, with the permission of the Canadian government,() tested herbicides, including Agent Orange, in the forests near the Forces Base Gagetown in New Brunswick in 1966 and 1967. On September 12, 2007, Thompson, of Veterans Affairs, announced that the of Canada was offering a one-time gratia payment of $20,000 as the compensation package for Agent Orange exposure at CFB Gagetown.()On July 12, 2005, Merchant Law Group LLP on behalf of over 1,100 Canadian veterans and civilians who were living in and around the CFB Gagetown filed a lawsuit to pursue action litigation concerning Agent Orange and Agent Purple with the Court of Canada.()On August 4, 2009, the case was rejected by the court due to lack of evidence. The ruling was appealed.()(Berry, Shawn; Moncton judge rules in Agent Orange lawsuit, Times & Transcript, August 4, 2009)Queensland, AustraliaIn 2008 Australian researcher Jean Williams claimed that cancer rates in the town of Innisfail, Queensland were 10 times higher than the state average due to secret testing of Agent Orange by the Australian military scientists during the Vietnam War. Williams, who had won the Order of Australia medal for her research on the effects of chemicals on U.S. war veterans, based her allegations on Australian government reports found in the Australian War Memorial museum archives. A former soldier, Ted Bosworth, backed up the claims, saying that he had been involved in the secret testing. The Queensland health department claimed that cancer rates in Innisfail were not higher than those in other parts of the state.(McMahon, Barbara; Australia cancer deaths linked to Agent Orange, Guardian, May 19, 2008)New ZealandThe use of Agent Orange has been controversial in New Zealand, because of exposure of New Zealand troops to it and because of the production of Agent Orange for Vietnam and other users at a Ivon Watkins-Dow chemical plant in Paritutu, Plymouth. There have been continuing claims that the suburb of Paritutu has also been polluted; see New Zealand in the Vietnam War.(;NZPA Concern prompts review of Dioxin study, New Zealand Herald, November 25, 2006)There are many cases of New Zealand soldiers developing cancers such as bone cancer from exposure to Agent Orange.BrazilThe Brazilian government used Agent Orange to defoliate a large section of the rainforest so that Alcoa could build the dam to power mining operations. Large areas of rainforest were destroyed, along with the homes and livelihoods of thousands of rural peasants and indigenous tribes.()Malayan EmergencySmall scale defoliation experiments using 2-4-D and 2-4-5-T were conducted by the British during the Emergency in 1951. Areas of jungle close to roadways were cleared using chemical defoliation to help prevent ambushes by Communist Terrorists.()Ontario, CanadaOn February 17, 2011, the Star revealed that the same toxins used to strip the jungles of Vietnam were also employed to clear extensive plots of land in Ontario.() The same day, in response to the Toronto Star article, the Ontario provincial government launched a probe into the use of Agent Orange.()On February 18, 2011, Ontarios Ministry of Natural Resources widened the probe of Agent Orange spraying to include all areas of the province where government managed forests on Crown land.()The Toronto Star reported that, records from the 1950s, 60s and 70s show forestry workers, often students and junior rangers, spent weeks at a time as human markers holding red, helium-filled balloons on fishing lines while low-flying planes sprayed toxic herbicides including an infamous chemical mixture known as Agent Orange on the brush and the boys below.(See also* issues with war* Teratogen* SyndromeReferencesNotesBibliography* ** * * * * * * Martin, Michael F.; Vietnamese Victims of Agent Orange and US-Vietnam Relations, Congressional Research Service, report to States Congress, May 28, 2009* * * NTP (National Toxicology Program); Toxicology and Carcinogenesis Studies of 2,3,7,8-Tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin (TCDD) in Female Harlan Sprague-Dawley Rats (Gavage Studies), CASRN 1746-01-6, April 2006.* * * * * * *   readers should note that both of Youngs books were commissioned by the Department of Defense, Office of the Deputy Under Secretary of Defense (Installations and Environment)Further readingBooks* * * * * * * * * * * Journal articles / Papers* Weisman, Joan Murray. The Effects of Exposure to Agent Orange on the Intellectual Functioning, Academic Achievement, Visual Motor Skill, and Activity Level of the Offspring of Vietnam War Veterans. Doctoral thesis. Hofstra University. 1986.* Kuehn, Bridget M.; Agent Orange Effects, Journal of the American Medical Association, 2010;303(8):722.Government/NGO reports* Agent Orange in Vietnam: Recent Developments in Remediation: Testimony of Ms. Tran Thi Hoan, Subcommittee on Asia, the Pacific and the Global Environment, U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on Foreign Affairs. July 15, 2010* Agent Orange in Vietnam: Recent Developments in Remediation: Testimony of Dr. Nguyen Thi Ngoc Phuong, Subcommittee on Asia, the Pacific and the Global Environment, U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on Foreign Affairs. July 15, 2010* Agent Orange Policy, American Public Health Association, 2007* Assessment of the health risk of dioxins, Health Organization/Programme on Chemical Safety, 1998*Operation Ranch Hand: Herbicides In Southeast Asia History of Operation Ranch Hand, 1983*Agent Orange Dioxin Contamination in the Environment and Food Chain at Key Hotspots in Viet Nam Boivin, TG, et al, 2011News* Fawthrop, Tom; Agent of suffering, Guardian, February 10, 2008* Cox, Paul; The Legacy of Agent Orange is a Continuing Focus of VVAW, The Veteran, Veterans Against the War, Volume 38, No. 2, Fall 2008.* Barlett, Donald P. and Steele, James B.; Monsantos Harvest of Fear, Vanity Fair May 2008* Quick, Ben The Boneyard Orion Magazine, March/April 2008* Cheng, Eva; Vietnams Agent Orange victims call for solidarity, Green Left Weekly, September 28, 2005* Children and the Vietnam War 3040 years after the use of Agent Orange* Tokar, Brian; Monsanto: A Checkered History, Z Magazine, March 1999Video* Agent Orange: The Last Battle. Dir. Stephanie Jobe, Adam Scholl. DVD. 2005* HADES Dir. Caroline Delerue, Screenplay Mauro Bellanova 2011External links*Vietnamese Victims of Agent Orange web site*U.S. Environmental Protection Agency  Dioxin Web site*Agent Orange/Dioxin Lawsuit in Vietnam Pictorial, Vietnam News Agency*Agent Orange Office of Public Health and Environmental Hazards, Department of Veteran Affairs*Poisoned Lives*The Aspen Institute Advocacy and Exchange Program on Agent Orange/Dioxin*Make Agent Orange History*Agent Orange Record*/ Hatfield ConsultantstaronjaOrangeOrangeOrangeNaranjaOrangeorangelaranxaOranyeArancioOranyeOrangeOrangeja:OrangeOrangelaranjaOrangeOrangeOrangeOrangeOrangec da camzh:
2700
Abercarn
Abercarn is a small town(Gwyddon Road, Abercarn:: OS grid ST2194 :: Geograph British Isles - photograph every grid square!) community in Caerphilly county borough, Wales, 10 miles (16 km) north-west of Newport on the A467 between Cwmcarn and Newbridge, within the historic boundaries of Monmouthshire. HistoryThe district was traditionally associated with the mining collieries, ironworks and tinplate works of the Wales coalfield and Wales Valleys, although all have now closed;(Post Office: Abercarn Royal Mail Sorting Office:: OS grid ST2194 :: Geograph British Isles - photograph every grid square!) the town, which lies in the middle portion of the Ebbw valley, being situated on the south-eastern flank of the once great mining region of Glamorgan and Monmouthshire.(Jamesville, Abercarn:: OS grid ST2193 :: Geograph British Isles - photograph every grid square!)On 11 September 1878 it was the site of an underground explosion which killed 268 miners.()Local governmentThe area was part of the ancient Monmouthshire parish of Mynyddislwyn until the late 19th century. In 1892 a board of health and local government district of Abercarn was formed.(Formed as Newbridge local board and local government district on March 17, 1892, renamed Abercarn on July 4 of the same year. County Census Report 1670, Monmouthshire) This became Abercarn urban district in 1894, governed by an urban district council of twelve members. Under the Government Act 1972 the urban district was abolished in 1974, becoming part of the borough of Islwyn, Gwent. Further local government organisation in 1996 placed the area in the county borough of Caerphilly. The former urban district corresponds to the three communities of Abercarn, Crumlin and Newbridge.SportAbercarn is home to Abercarn Rugby Club which is a member of the Welsh Rugby Union. See also*Welsh Coal Mines - details of all the local pits.*Abercarn Based Photographer -gallery of recent images.References;Attribution*bg:cy:Abercarnes:Abercarnnl:Abercarnpt:Abercarnsv:Abercarnuk:
2701
Aberdare
           Aberdare () is an industrial town in Cynon Taf, Wales, situated at the confluence of the Rivers Dare (Dr) and Cynon.  The population at the (2001) census was 31,705.  It is  south west of Tydfil and  north west of Cardiff.HistoryFrom being, at the beginning of the 19th century, a mere village in an agricultural district, the place grew rapidly in population owing to the abundance of its coal and ore, and the population of the whole parish (which was only 1,486 in 1801) increased tenfold during the first half of the 19th century.()  It has since declined, owing to the loss of most of the heavy industry.Ironworks were established at Llwydcoed and Abernant in 1799 and 1800 respectively, followed by others at Gadlys and Aberaman in 1827 and 1847. These have not been worked since about 1875. After this, the iron industry was represented only by a small tinplate works, but by this stage the economy of the town was dominated by the mining industry.  There were also several brickworks and breweries.  During the latter half of the 19th century, considerable public improvements were made to the town, which became, despite its neighbouring collieries, a pleasant place to live.  Its institutions included a post-graduate theological college (opened in connection with the Church of England in 1892, until 1907, when it was removed to Llandaff).(Aberdare, with the ecclesiastical parishes of St Fagans (Trecynon) and Aberaman carved out of the ancient parish, had twelve Anglican churches, one Roman Catholic church (built in 1866 in Monk Street near the site of a cell attached to Abbey) and at one time had over fifty Nonconformist chapels. The services in the majority of the chapels were in the language.  The urban district includes what were once the separate villages of Aberaman, Abernant, Cwmaman, Cwmbach, Cwmdare, Llwydcoed, Penywaun and Trecynon.  There are several cairns and the remains of a circular British encampment on the mountain between Aberdare and Merthyr. Hirwaun moor, 4 miles to the north west of Aberdare, was according to tradition the scene of a battle at which ap Tewdwr, prince of Dyfed, was defeated by the allied forces of the Norman Fitzhamon and ap Gwrgant, the last Welsh prince of Glamorgan.(The coal industryIn the early years of Aberdares development, most of the coal worked in the parish was coking coal, and was consumed locally, chiefly in the ironworks.( In 1836, exploitation of the Four-foot Seam of high-calorific value coal began, and pits were sunk in rapid succession.  This coal was valuable for steam railways and ships, and an export trade began, via the Vale Railway and the port of Cardiff. The population of the parish rose from 6,471 in 1841 to 14,999 in 1851 and 32,299 in 1861 and John Davies(Davies, John, A History of Wales, Penguin, 1994, ISBN 0-14-014581-8, p 400) described it as the most dynamic place in Wales. In 1851, the Admiralty decided to use Welsh steam coal in ships of the Navy, and this decision boosted the reputation of Aberdares product and launched a huge international export market.(Davies, op cit, p 400) Coal mined in Aberdare parish rose from  in 1844 to  in 1850,(Davies, op cit, p 384) and the coal trade, which after 1875 was the chief support of the town, soon reached huge dimensions.  Steam coal was subsequently found in the Rhondda and further west, but many of the great companies of the Welsh coal industrys Gilded Age started operation in Aberdare and the lower Cynon Valley, including those of Samuel Thomas, David Davies and Sons, Nixons Navigation and Duffryn.( In common with the rest of the South Wales coalfield, Aberdares coal industry commenced a long decline after War I, and the last two deep mines still in operation in the 1960s were the small Aberaman and Fforchaman collieries, which closed in 1962 and 1965 respectively.On May 11, 1919, an extensive fire broke out on Cardiff Street, Aberdare.CultureCaradog statue in Victoria SquareAberdare, during its boom years, was considered a centre of culture: it hosted the first Eisteddfod in 1861, again in 1885, and in 1956 at Park where the Gorsedd standing stones still exist.The Coliseum Theatre is Aberdares main arts venue, containing a 600-seat auditorium and cinema. It is situated in nearby Trecynon and was built in 1938 using miners subscriptions.  Aberdare was the birthplace of the Second World War poet Lewis, and a plaque commemorating him is to be found, including a quotation from his poem, The Mountain over Aberdare.The original founding members of the rock band Stereophonics originated from the nearby village of Cwmaman.  It is also the hometown of guitarist Mark Parry of Vancouver rock band Manvils.  Famed anarchist-punk band Crass played their last live show for striking miners in Aberdare during the miners strike (1984-1985).Griffith Rhys Jones - or Caradog as he was commonly known - was the Conductor of the famous Cr Mawr of some 460 voices (the South Wales Choral Union), which twice won first prize at Crystal Palace choral competitions in London in the 1870s.  He is depicted in the towns most prominent statue by sculptor Goscombe John, unveiled on Victoria Square in 1920.Churches and chapelsIn the town centre is Elvans Church. This is a in Wales church at the heart of the Parish of Aberdare. The church is over 200 years old and has had extensive work since its erection in the 1800s. The church also has a modern electrical, two-manual and pedal board pipe organ, that is still used in services.The nearby St John the Baptist Church of the same parish is also notable as a 15th century building that is still used for regular services. It currently has only a small electric organ.Also of the same parish is St. Matthews Church, Abernant.In the Parish of Aberaman and Cwmaman is St. Margarets Church, with an old, but beautiful, pipe organ with two manuals and a pedal board. Also in this parish is St. Josephs church, Cwmaman. St. Josephs has recently undergone much recreational work, almost converting the church into a community centre. However, regular church services still take place. Here, there is a two-manual and pedal board electric organ, with speakers at the front and sides of the church.In the mediaThe Torchwood novel Almost Perfect by James Goss mentions a fictional nuclear blast taking place in the town.SportsAthletic F.C. were members of the League between 1921 and 1927 before being replaced by United after finishing bottom. The club folded a year later. They played their games at the Athletic Ground.Aberdare Rugby Football Club are a union team formed in 1890 which still play in Aberdare today at the Ynys Stadium.The Athletic Ground was also the venue of the first ever league international played between Wales and the New Zealand All Golds on New Years Day 1908, which was won by the Welsh 9-8.TransportThe town is served by railway station and bus station which are opposite each other in the town centre.Schools and collegesColleges*MorgannwgPrimary schools*primary school*Church primary school*Margarets Roman Catholic primary school*Gynradd Gymraeg Aberdar*Blaengwawr Primary School*Oaklands Primary School*Cap Coach Primary School*Glynhafod Primary School*Cwmaman Infants School*Cwmdare Primary School*Aberdare Park Primary*Cwmbach Junior SchoolSecondary schools*Girls School*High School*Comprehensive School*John the Baptist School (Aberdare)*Gyfun RhydywaunNotable people:See also People from AberdareNotable current and former residents and natives of Aberdare include:*Austin Bruce - 1st Aberdare & Secretary (18681873)*Stereophonics - All 3 original members, Jones, Richard Jones and Cable where all brought up in Cwmaman, Aberdare*Davies-cricketer*Gruffudd - Actor born in Llwydcoed, Aberdare*Hannan (presenter) - Welsh broadcaster*Jenkins - Member of the Assembly for Wales for the South Wales (West) Region*Morgan - a leading language writer, born in Trecynon, some of his literary works feature Aberdare*Noble - popular Welsh broadcaster has lived near Aberdare for the past thirty years*Walton - fantasy novelist, now living in Montreal, Quebec*David Young - Rugby player and Cardiff Blues coach raised in Penywaun. Lions tourist and former Wales captain.*Evans - particle physicist and project leader of the Hadron Collider, the largest science experiment in the world.*John Morgan - A Canadian comedian best known for his roles on Canadian Air Farce.Twin cities/towns* - Montelimar, France* - Slagelse, Denmark* - Ravensburg, Baden-Wrttemberg, GermanySee also*ParkReferencesExternal links*BBC website on Aberdare*www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Aberdare and surrounding areabg:cy:Aberdrda:Aberdarede:Aberdarees:Aberdareeu:Aberdare(pays de Galles)- Aberdrid:Aberdareit:Aberdarelt:Aberderasnl:Aberdareno:Aberdarepl:Aberdarept:Aberdareru:sv:Aberdare
2717
Abertillery
__NOTOC__ Abertillery () is a town in the county borough of Gwent in Wales,  north-west of Newport, originally on the Western Railway. Its population rose steeply during the period of mining development in Wales, being 10,846 in the 1891 census and 21,945 ten years later. Lying in the mountainous mining district of the former counties of Monmouthshire and Glamorganshire, in the valley of the Ebbw Fach, the population was traditionally employed in the numerous coal-mines, ironworks and tin-plate works, now defunct. Further up the same valley are the mining townships of Nantyglo and Blaina.Abertillery has a traditional-style town centre and several small schools. Today, its population numbers just over 11,000 and is thought to be declining. In 2003, Abertillery was found to have the cheapest houses in the Kingdom, according to a survey by the Halifax, with an average price of only 37,872.() Noted for its unspoilt rural scenery, Abertillery neighbours the small districts of Aberbeeg (Aber-bg), Llanhilleth (Llanhiledd), Cwmtillery (Cwmtyleri), and Bells (Chwe Chloch).Over the past couple of decades the town has been transformed from industrial relic into the clean, modernised area it is today  this has largely been achieved due to large amounts of Union One funding which has helped the town remove unsightly reminders of the industrial past. Many of these areas have been utilised as playing fields, parks or mixed use land (including the local school).A recent windfarm proposal for the mountainside above the community of Cwmtillery has been revived despite opposition to the initial proposal drawing large support. This included a group tagged SCAM (Save Coity and Mynydd James), which led to the application being removed with Blaenau Gwent County Council before being re-submitted on a much smaller scale. The SCAM group is still active in the opposition to the proposal and holds regular meetings in the local area concerning the subject.The towns name is pronounced with the emphasis on the penultimate syllable, i.e. it rhymes with Mary, as in a song made popular by Welsh entertainer Davies: Blodwen and Mary from Abertillery...The reopening of railway station has been identified as a potential future development of the Valley Railway.According to the 2001 Census and information gathered by The Language Board (), 1,146 (9.9%) of Abertillery speaks Welsh.()SportAbertillery is home to cricket club Abertillery Town Cricket Club who were formed in the 1880s. The towns union club is Abertillery Blaenau Gwent RFC who also formed in the mid 1880s. The town supports two local Saturday football teams  Abertillery Bluebirds and Abertillery Excelsiors.Notable people:See People from AbertilleryInternational relationsAbertyleri is twinned with* Royat, FranceSee also*and Inver as place-name elements*and District HospitalReferences*External links* Abertillery Online* BBC On This Day item about Six Bells* Abertillery Bluebirds Football Club* Photos of Abertillery and surrounding area on geograph.org.ukbg:cy:Abertyleries:Abertillery- Abertyleriit:Abertillerynl:Abertillerypl:Abertillerypt:Abertillerysv:Abertilleryuk:
2736
Andalusia
 footnotes                Andalusia (, ; ,  or ) is the most populous and the second largest in area of the autonomous communities of Spain. The Andalusian autonomous community is officially recognised as a nationality of Spain.(Boletn Oficial del Estado of Spain, n. 68 of 2007/03/20, p. 11872. Estatuto de Autonoma de Andaluca. Artculo 1: Andaluca, como nacionalidad histrica y en el ejercicio del derecho de autogobierno que reconoce la Constitucin, se constituye en Comunidad Autnoma en el marco de la unidad de la nacin espaola y conforme al artculo 2 de la Constitucin.) The territory is divided into eight provinces: Huelva, Seville, Cdiz, Crdoba, Mlaga, Jan, Granada and Almera. Its capital and largest city is Seville (Spanish: Sevilla). Andalusia is in the south of the peninsula, immediately south of the autonomous communities of Extremadura and Mancha; west of the autonomous community of Murcia and the Sea; east of Portugal and the Ocean; and north of the Sea and the of Gibraltar, which separates Spain from Morocco, and the Ocean. The small overseas territory of Gibraltar shares a three-quarter-mile land border with the Andalusian of Cdiz at the eastern end of the Strait of Gibraltar.Andalusia has three major geographic subregions. In the north, the mountainous Morena separates Andalusia from the plains of Extremadura and Castile-La Mancha on Spains Central. South of that, one can distinguish Upper Andalusia, generally the System, from Lower Andalusia with its Depression of the valley of the Guadalquivir.The name Andalusia traces back to the language Al-Andalus (). As well as Muslim and Romani influences, the regions history and culture have been influenced by the earlier Iberians, Carthaginians, Greeks, Romans, Vandals, Visigoths, all of whom preceded the Muslims, as well as the Castilian and other Christian North Iberian nationalities who conquered and repopulated the area in the latter phases of the Reconquista.  There was also a relatively large Jewish presence.Since the Revolution, Andalusia has been an economically poor region in comparison with the rest of Spain and the Union at large. However, the growth of the community especially in the sectors of industry and services was above average in Spain and higher than many communities in the eurozone. The region has, however, a rich culture and a strong cultural identity. Many cultural phenomena that are seen internationally as distinctively Spanish are largely or entirely Andalusian in origin. These include flamenco, bullfighting, and certain Moorish-influenced architectural styles. The name Andaluca File:Espaa y Portugal (1770).jpg|thumb|Map of the peninsula dated 1770. The Kingdoms of Jan, Crdoba and Seville are collectively referred to under the name Andaluca, while the Kingdom of Granada appears under its individual name.The Spanish toponym (place name) Andaluca (immediate source of the American English(http://www.bbc.co.uk/search/andalusia) Andalusia) was introduced into the language in the 13th century under the form el Andaluca.(Spain: The Andalusian Patio) This was a Castilianization of Al-Andalusiya, the adjectival form of the Arabic language al-Andalus, the name of the Iberian territories under the Muslim rule from 711 to 1492. The etymology of al-Andalus is itself somewhat debated (see al-Andalus), but it entered the Arabic language even before such time as this area came under Muslim rule. The Arabic name is traditionally considered a corruption of an earlier *Vandalusia or the land of the Vandals, the Germanic tribe that invaded Spain after the fall of the Roman Empire and set up various kingdoms in Southern Spain and North Africa. Andalusia was the center of power in medieval Muslim-dominated Iberia.Like the Arabic term al-Andalus, in historical contexts the Spanish term Andaluca or the English term Andalusia do not necessarily refer to the exact territory designated by these terms today. Initially, the term referred exclusively to territories under Muslim control; later, it was applied to some of the last Iberian Islamic territories to be conquered, though not always to exactly the same ones.() In the de Espaa (also known as the Crnica General) of X of Castile, written in the second half of the 13th century, the term Andaluca is used with three different meanings:# As a literal translation of the Arabic al-ndalus when Arabic texts are quoted.# To designate the territories the Christians had conquered by that time in the Guadalquivir valley and in the Kingdoms of Granada and Murcia. In a document from 1253, Alfonso X styled himself Rey de Castilla, Len y de toda Andaluca (King of Castile, Len and all of Andalusia).# To designate the territories the Christians had conquered by that time in the Guadalquivir valley (the Kingdoms of Jan, Crdoba and Seville) but not the Kingdom of Granada. This was the most common significance in the Middle Ages and modern period.()From an administrative point of view, Granada remained separate for many years even after the completion of the Reconquista( due, above all, to its emblematic character as the last territory conquered, and as the seat of the important Real Chancillera de Granada, a of last resort. Still, the reconquest and repopulation of Granada was accomplished largely by people from the four existing Christian kingdoms of Andalusia, and Granada came to be considered a fourth kingdom of Andalusia.() The often-used expression Kingdoms of Andalusia dates back in Spanish at least to the mid-18th century.(For example, de Olavide was Intendente del Ejrcito de los cuatro reinos de Andaluca, Intendant of the Army of the four kingdoms of Andalusia. Biografa, Fundacin Pablo de Olavide. Accessed online 2009-12-07.)(In Gelo del Cabildos  1751 Respuestas generales, part of the write-up of the census of Ensenada, Jos Mara de Mendoza y Guzmn is described as visitador general of the Rentas Provinciales de los cuatro Reinos de Andaluca. See the digitization of the relevant document on the site of the Spanish Ministry of Culture. Enter Gelo in the search box Buscador Localidades and look at image number 3. ) Symbols File:Blas Infante Tiles.jpg|thumb|upright|Portrait of Infante, executed in azulejos, located on the avenue in de la Frontera named in his honor.The Andalusian coat of arms shows the figure of Hercules and two lions between the two of Hercules that tradition situates on either side of the Strait of Gibraltar. An inscription below, superimposed on an image of the of Andalusia reads Andaluca por s, para Espaa y la Humanidad (Andalusia by herself, for Spain and Humanity). Over the two columns is a semicircular arch in the colors of the flag of Andalusia, with the Latin words Dominator Hercules Fundator superimposed.()The official flag of Andalusia consists of three equal horizontal stripes, colored green, white, and green respectively;() the Andalusian coat of arms is superimposed on the central stripe. Its design was overseen by Infante() and approved in the of Ronda (a 1918 gathering of Andalusian nationalists at Ronda). The green symbolizes hope and union, and the white symbolizes peace and dialogue. Blas Infante considered these to have been the colors most used in regional symbols throughout the regions history. According to him, the green came in particular from the standard of the Caliphate and represented the call for a gathering of the populace. The white symbolized pardon in the dynasty, interpreted in European heraldry as parliament or peace. Other writers have justified the colors differently, with some Andalusian nationalists referring to them as the Arbonaida, meaning white-and-green in Mozarabic, a language that was spoken in the region in Muslim times.The anthem of Andalusia was composed by Jos del Castillo Daz (director of the Municipal Band of Seville, commonly known as Maestro Castillo) with lyrics by Blas Infante.( The music was inspired by Santo Dios, a popular religious song sung at harvest time by peasants and day laborers in the provinces of Mlaga, Seville, and Huelva. Blas Infante brought the song to Maestro Castillos attention; Maestro Castillo adapted and harmonized the traditional melody. The lyrics appeal to the Andalusians to mobilize and demand tierra y libertad (land and liberty) by way of reform and a statute of autonomy within Spain.The of Andalusia voted unanimously in 1983 that the preamble to the Statute of Autonomy recognize Blas Infante as the Father of the Andalusian Nation (Padre de la Patria Andaluza),() which was reaffirmed in the reformed Statute of Autonomy submitted to popular referendum February 18, 2007. The preamble of the present 2007 Statute of Autonomy says that Article 2 of the present Constitution of 1978 recognizes Andalusia as a nationality. Later, in its articulation, it speaks of Andalusia as a historic nationality (Spanish: nacionalidad histrica). It also cites the 1919 Andalusianist Manifesto of Crdoba describing Andalusia as a national reality (realidad nacional), but does not endorse that formulation. Article 1 of the earlier 1981 Statute of Autonomy defined it simply as a nationality (nacionalidad).(El Manifiesto andalucista de Crdoba describi a Andaluca como realidad nacional en 1919, cuyo espritu los andaluces encauzaron plenamente a travs del proceso de autogobierno recogido en nuestra Carta Magna. En 1978 los andaluces dieron un amplio respaldo al consenso constitucional. Hoy, la Constitucin, en su artculo 2, reconoce a Andaluca como una nacionalidad en el marco de la unidad indisoluble de la nacin espaola. Andalusian Statute of Autonomy on Wikisource, in Spanish.) The national holiday, the de Andaluca, is celebrated on February 28,() and commemorates the 1980 autonomy referendum. The honorific title of Predilecto de Andaluca (Favorite Son of Andalucia) is granted by the Junta of Andalusia to those whose exceptional merits benefited Andalusia, for work or achievements in natural, social, or political science. It is the highest distinction given by the Autonomous Community of Andalusia.GeographyThe Sevillian historian Domnguez Ortiz wrote that:Penibtica()LocationAndalusia has a surface area of , 17.3 percent of the territory of Spain. Andalusia alone is comparable in extent and in the variety of its terrain to any of several of the smaller European countries. To the east is the Sea; to the west the Ocean; to the north the Morena constitutes the border with the Central; to the south, the self-governing() overseas territory of Gibraltar and the of Gibraltar separate it from Africa.ClimateFile:Sierra de las Nieves.jpg|thumb|upright|Andalusian firs, de las NievesAndalusia sits at a latitude between 36 and 3844 N, in the warm-temperate region. In general, it experiences a climate, with dry summers influenced by the High, but subject to occasional torrential rains and extremely hot temperatures.(() In the winter, the tropical anticyclones move south, allowing cold polar fronts to penetrate the region. Still, within Andalusia there is considerable climatic variety. From the extensive coastal plains one may pass to the valley of the Guadalquivir, barely above sea level, then to the highest altitudes in the Iberian peninsula in the peaks of the Sierra Nevada. In a mere  one can pass from the subtropical coast of the province of Granada to the snowy peaks of Mulhacn. Andalusia also includes both the dry Desert in the province of Almera and the de Grazalema Natural Park in the province of Cdiz, which experiences Spains greatest rainfall.()()(Ecosistemas naturales de Andaluca. Alta montaa, Junta de Andaluca (2008). Accessed 2009-02-02.)()Annual rainfall in the Sierra de Grazalema has been measured as high as  in 1963, the highest ever recorded for any location in Iberia.() Andalusia is also home to the driest place in continental Europe, the Cabo de Gata, with only  of rain per year.In general, as one goes from west to east, away from the Atlantic, there is less precipitation.( Wet Andalusia includes most of the highest points in the region, above all the Sierra de Grazalema but also the de Ronda in western Mlaga. The valley of the Guadalquivir has moderate rainfall. The Desert in Almera, Europes only true desert, has less than 75 days with any measurable precipitation, and some particular places in the desert have as few as 50 such days. Much of dry Andalusia has more than 300 sunny days a year.The average temperature in Andalusia throughout the year is over . Averages in the cities range from  in Baeza to  in Mlaga.(See Temperatura media anual del periodo 19611990, Consejera de Medio Ambiente de la Junta de Andaluca, for a climate map. Accessed online 2009-12-08.) Much of the Guadalquivir valley and the Mediterranean coast has an average of about . The coldest month is January when Granada at the foot of the Sierra Nevada experiences an average temperature of . The hottest are July and August, with an average temperature of  for Andalusia as a whole. Crdoba is the hottest provincial capital, followed by Seville.()The Guadalquivir valley has experienced the highest temperatures recorded in Europe, with a maximum of  recorded at Crdoba and Seville.() The mountains of Granada and Jan have the coldest temperatures in southern Iberia, but do not reach continental extremes (and, indeed are surpassed by some mountains in northern Spain). In the cold snap of January 2005, de la Espada (Jan) experienced a temperature of  and the ski resort at Sierra Nevada National Parkthe southernmost ski resort in Europedropped to . Sierra Nevada Natural Park has Iberias lowest average annual temperature, ( at Pradollano) and its peaks remain snowy practically year-round. Terrain Mountain ranges affect climate, the network of rivers, soils and their erosion, bioregions, and even human economies insofar as they rely on natural resources.() The Andalusian terrain offers a range of altitudes and slopes. Andalusia has the Iberian peninsulas highest mountains and nearly 15 percent of its terrain over . The picture is similar for areas under  (with the Baetic Depression), and for the variety of slopes.The Atlantic coast is overwhelmingly beach and gradually sloping coasts; the Mediterranean coast has many cliffs, above all in the Malagan Axarqua and in Granada and Almera.() This asymmetry divides the region naturally into Upper Andalusia (two mountainous areas) and Lower Andalusia (the broad basin of the Guadalquivir).()The Morena separates Andalusia from the plains of Extremadura and Castile-La Mancha on Spains Central. Although sparsely populated, this is not a particularly high range, and its highest point, the  peak of La Bauela in the Madrona, lies outside of Andalusia. Within the Sierra Morana, the gorge of the Despeaperros forms a natural frontier between Castile and Andalusia.The Cordillera consists of the parallel mountain ranges of the Penibtica near the Mediterranean coast and the Subbtica inland, separated by the Intrabtico. The Cordillera Subbtica is quite discontinuous, offering many passes that facilitate transportation, but the Penibtico forms a strong barrier between the Mediterranean coast and the interior.(Bases para la Ordenacin del Territorio de Andaluca, 1990, p. 126, in Spanish.) The Sierra Nevada, part of the Cordillera Penibtica in the Province of Granada, has the highest peaks in Iberia: El Mulhacn at  and El Veleta at . Lower Andalusia, the Depression, the basin of the Guadalquivir, lies between these two mountainous areas. It is a nearly flat territory, open to the of Cdiz in the southeast. Throughout history, this has been the most populous part of Andalusia. Hydrography Andalusia has rivers that flow into both the Atlantic and the Mediterranean. Flowing to the Atlantic are the Guadiana, Odiel-Tinto, Guadalquivir, Guadalete, and Barbate. Flowing to the Mediterranean are the Guadiaro, Guadalhorce, Guadalmedina, Guadalfeo, Andarax (also known as the Almera) and Almanzora. Of these, the Guadalquivir is the longest in Andalusia and fifth longest on the Iberian peninsula, at .() The rivers of the Atlantic basin are characteristically long, run through mostly flat terrain, and have broad river valleys. As a result, at their mouths are estuaries and wetlands, such as the marshes of Doana in the delta of the Guadalquivir, and wetlands of the Odiel. In contrast, the rivers of the Mediterranean Basin are shorter, more seasonal, and make a precipitous descent from the mountains of the Baetic Cordillera. Their estuaries are small, and their valleys are less suitable for agriculture. Also, being in the shadow of the Baetic Cordillera means that they receive a lesser volume of water.(The following hydrographic basins can be distinguished in Andalusia. On the Atlantic side are the Guadalquivir basin; the Atlantic Basin with the sub-basins Guadalete-Barbate and Tinto-Odiel; and the Guadiana basin. On the Mediterranean side is the Mediterranean Basin and the very upper portion of the basin of the Segura.() Soils The soils of Andalusia can be divided into three large areas: the Morena, Subbtica, and the Depression and the Intrabtico.()The Sierra Morena, due to its morphology and the acidic content of its rocks, developed principally relatively poor, shallow soils, suitable only for forests. In the valleys and in some areas where limestone is present, deeper soils allowed farming of cereals suitable for livestock. The more complicated morphology of the Baetic Cordillera makes it more heterogeneous, with the most heterogeneous soils in Andalusia. Very roughly, in contrast to the Sierra Morena, a predominance of basic (alkaline) materials in the Cordillera Subbtica, combined with a hilly landscape, generates deeper soils with greater agricultural capacity, suitable to the cultivation of olives.()Finally, the Baetic Depression and the Surco Intrabtico have deep, rich soils, with great agricultural capacity. In particular, the alluvial soils of the Guadalquivir valley and plain of Granada have a loamy texture and are particularly suitable for intensive irrigated crops.() In the hilly areas of the countryside, there is a double dynamic: the depressions have filled with older lime-rich material, developing the deep, rich, dark clay soils the Spanish call bujeo, or tierras negras andaluzas, excellent for dryland farming. In other zones, the whiter albariza provides an excellent soil for vineyards.()Despite their marginal quality, the poorly consolidated soils of the sandy coastline of Huelva and Almerahave been successfully used in recent decades for hothouse cultivation under clear plastic of strawberries, raspberries, blueberries, and other fruits. Flora flora.jpg|thumb|400px|Floristic provinces of AndalusiaBiogeographically, Andalusia forms part of the Western Mediterranean subregion of the Basin, which falls within the Kingdom. Five floristic provinces lie, in whole or in part, within Andalusia: along much of the Atlantic coast, the Lusitanian-Andalusian littoral or Andalusian Atlantic littoral; in the north, the southern portion of the Luso-Extremaduran floristic province; covering roughly half of the region, the Baetic floristic province; and in the extreme east, the Almerian portion of the Almerian-Murcian floristic province and (coinciding roughly with the upper Segura basin) a small portion of the Castilian-Maestrazgan-Manchegan floristic province. These names derive primarily from past or present political geography: Luso and Lusitanian from Lusitania, one of three provinces in Iberia, most of the others from present-day Spanish provinces, and Maestrazgo being a historical region of northern Valencia.File:Rododendron.jpg|thumb|left|Oaks, rhododendrons and ferns in the Alcornocales Natural Park.In broad terms, the typical vegetation of Andalusia is Mediterranean woodland, characterized by leafy xerophilic perennials, adapted to the long, dry summers. The dominant species of the community is the Holly Oak (ilex). Also abundant are Cork Oak (suber), various pines, and Spanish Fir (pinsapo). Due to cultivation, olive (Olea europaea) and almond (Prunus dulcis) trees also abound. The dominant understory is composed of thorny and aromatic woody species, such as Rosemary (Rosmarinus officinalis), Thyme (Thymus), and Cistus. In the wettest areas with acidic soils, the most abundant species are the Oak and Cork Oak, and the cultivated Eucalyptus. In the woodlands, leafy hardwoods of genus Populus (poplars, aspens, cottonwoods) and Ulmus (elms) are also abundant; poplars are cultivated in the plains of Granada.()The Andalusian woodlands have been much altered by human settlement, the use of nearly all of the best land for farming, and frequent wildfires. The degraded forests become shrubby and combustible garrigue. Extensive areas have been planted with non-climax trees such as pines. There is now a clear conservation policy for the remaining forests, which survive almost exclusively in the mountains.FaunaFile:Linces12.jpg|thumb|The Lynx (Lynx pardinus)The biodiversity of Andalusia extends to its fauna as well. More than 400 of the 630 vertebrate species extant in Spain can be found in Andalusia. Spanning the Mediterrnean and Atlantic basins, and adjacent to the Strait of Gibraltar, Andalusia is on the migratory route of many of the numerous flocks of birds that travel annually from Europe to Africa and back.() The Andalusian wetlands host a rich variety of birds. Some are of African origin, such as the Coot (Fulica cristata), the Swamphen (Porphyrio porphyrio), and the Flamingo (Phoenicopterus roseus). Others originate in Northern Europe, such as the Goose (Anser anser). Birds of prey (raptors) include the Imperial Eagle (also known as Adalberts Eagle, Aquila adalberti, the Vulture (Gyps fulvus), and both the Black and Kite (Milvus migrans and Milvus milvus).File:Andalusierhengst 93c.jpg|upright|left|thumb|horseAmong the herbivores, are several deer (Cervidae) species, notably the Deer (Dama dama) and Deer (Capreolus capreolus); the Mouflon (Ovis orientalis musimon), a type of sheep; and the Ibex (Capra pyrenaica, which despite its scientific name is no longer found in the Pyrenees). The Spanish Ibex has recently been losing ground to the sheep (Ammotragus lervia), an species from Africa, introduced for hunting in the 1970s. Among the small herbivores are rabbitsespecially the Rabbit (Oryctolagus cuniculus)which form the most important part of the diet of the carnivorous species of the Mediterranean woodlands.The large carnivores such as the Wolf (Canis lupus signatus) and the Lynx (Lynx pardinus) are quite threatened, and are limited to the Sierra de Andjar, inside of Sierra Morena, Doana and Despeaperros. Stocks of the boar (Sus scrofa), on the other hand, have been well preserved because they are a popular with hunters. More abundant and in varied situations of conservation, are such smaller carnivores as Otters, very abundant Foxes, the Badger (Meles meles), the Polecat (Mustela putorius), the Weasel (Mustela nivalis), the Wildcat (Felis silvestris), the Genet (Genetta genetta), and the Mongoose (Herpestes ichneumon).() Other notable species are latasti, a snake, and the endemic (and endangered) fish baeticus. Protected areas parques.png|thumb|400px|Nationals and natural parks in Andalusia.Andalusia has many unique ecosystems. In order to preserve these areas in a manner compatible with both conservation and economic exploitation, many of the most representative ecosystems have been given protected status.()()The various levels of protection are encompassed within the Network of Protected Natural Spaces of Andalusia (Red de Espacios Naturales Protegidos de Andaluca, RENPA) which integrates all protected natural spaces located in Andalusia, whether they are protected at the level of the local community, the autonomous community of Andalusia, the Spanish state, or by international conventions. RENPA consists of 150 protected spaces, consisting of two national parks, 24 natural parks, 21 periurban parks (on the fringes of cities or towns), 32 natural sites, two protected countrysides, 37 natural monuments, 28 nature reserves, and four concerted nature reserves (in which a government agency coordinates with the owner of the property for its management), all part of the European Unions 2000 network. Under the international ambit are the nine Biosphere Reserves, 20 Ramsar wetland sites, four Protected Areas of Mediterranean Importance and two UNESCO Geoparks.()In total, nearly 20 percent of the territory of Andalusia lies in one of these protected areas, which constitute roughly 30 percent of the protected territory of Spain.( Among these many spaces, some of the most notable are the de Cazorla, Segura y Las Villas Natural Park, Spains largest natural park and the second largest in Europe, the Sierra Nevada National Park, Doana National Park and Natural Park, the Desert, and the de Gata-Njar Natural Park, the largest terrestrial-maritime reserve in the European Western Mediterranean Sea.HistoryFile:Dama de Baza ampliada.jpg|thumb|upright|of Baza, ancient Iberian sculpture. Origin: Baza. In the Archaeological Museum of Spain, Madrid.The geostrategic position of Andalusia in the extreme south of Europe, providing (along with Morocco) a gateway between Europe and Africa, added to its position between the Ocean and the Sea, as well as its rich deposits of minerals and its agricultural wealth, have made Andalusia a tempting prize for civilizations since prehistoric times. Add to this its area of  (larger than many European countries), and it can be no surprise that Andalusia has figured prominently in the history of Europe and the Mediterranean.Given that the origin of humanity was almost certainly in Africa, several theories postulate that the first hominids in Europe were in Andalusia, having passed across the Strait of Gibraltar. The earliest known cultures in Andalusia (based on artifacts from the archaeological sites at Millares, Argar, and Tartessos), were clearly influenced by cultures of the Eastern Mediterranean who settled on the Andalusian coast and influenced the cultures of the interior. Andalusia then went through a period of protohistory, when the region did not have a written language of its own, but its existence was known to and documented by literate cultures, principally the Phoenicians (Cadiz) and Ancient Greeks. During the second millennium BCE, the kingdom of Tartessos developed in Andalusia.( It should also be mentioned that according to John Koch ( Cunliffe, Karl, Wodtko and other highly respected scholars, Celtic culture may well have developed first in far Southern Portugal and Southwestern Spain, approximately 500 years prior to anything recorded in Central Europe.()()() The language from Andalusia, which T. Koch has been able to readily translate, is being accepted by a growing number of philologists and other linguists as the first Celtic language.()()(http://www.aber.ac.uk/aberonline/en/archive/2008/05/au7608/) Carthaginians and Romans File:BAELO CLAUDIA.jpg|thumb|Partial view of the forum; ruins of ClaudiaWith the fall of the Phoenician cities, Carthage became the dominant sea power of the western Mediterranean and the most important trading partner for the Phoenician towns along the Andalusian coast. Between the First and Punic Wars, Carthage extended its control beyond Andalucia to include all of Iberia except the Basque Country. Andalusia was the major staging ground for the war with Rome led by the Barkid Hannibal. The Romans defeated the Carthaginians and conquered Andalucia, the region being renamed Baetica.( It was fully incorporated into the Empire, and from this region came many Roman magistrates and senator, as well as the emperors Trajan and (most likely) Hadrian.Vandals - Visigoths - Byzantine EmpiresThe Vandals moved briefly through the region during the 5th century AD before settling in North Africa, after which the region fell into the hands of the Kingdom. The Visigoths in this region were practically independent of the Visigothic Catholic Kingdom of Toledo. This is the era of Saints of Seville and Hermenegild. During this period, around 555 AD, the Roman Empire conquered Andalusia under I, the Roman Emperor. They established Spania, a province of the Empire from 552 until 624. Though their holdings were quickly reduced, they continued to have interests in the region until they lost it altogether in 624.Roman EmpireIslamic Empire - Al-AndalusFile:Al Andalus.gif|thumb|350px|The of Crdoba c. 1000, at the apogee of Almanzors ruleThe Visigothic era came to an abrupt end in 711 with the conquest of Hispania by the Umayyad general ibn Ziyad, an Islamic Berber.( Tariq is known in Spanish history and legend as Tariq el Tuerto (Tariq the One-eyed). The Muslim conquestby the Caliphateof the Peninsula in 711718 marked the collapse of Visigothic rule and the establishment of the Islamic Empire era. Andalusian culture was fundamentally influenced by over half a millennium of rule by many Muslim caliphates and emirates. In this period, the name Al-Andalus was applied to a much larger area than the present Andalusia, and in some periods it referred to nearly the entire Iberian peninsula. Nevertheless, the Guadalquivir River valley in present-day Andalusia was the hub of Muslim power in the peninsula, with the of Crdoba making Crdoba its capital. The Umayyad Caliphate produced such leaders as Caliph III (ruled 912961) and his son, Caliph II (ruled 961976); and built the magnificent Mosque of Crdoba. Under these rulers, Moorish Islam in Spain reached its zenith, and Crdoba was a centre of global economic and cultural significance.()File:Mosque Cordoba.jpg|thumb|left|Mosque of CrdobaAlready in the 10th century, the Christians of northern Spain had begun what would eventually become the Reconquista: the reconquest of Spain for Christendom. Caliph Abd-ar-Rahman suffered some military defeats, but often managed to play off the Christian kingdoms against one another. Caliph Al-Hakam generally maintained peace and retained his status as the dominant figure of Iberia. Almanzor (effective ruler after Al-Hakams death) achieved military successes, but at the expense of uniting the Christian kings of the north against him.Internal divisions after the death of Almanzor (1002) led to the first of several decompositions of the Caliphate (1031). New centers of power arose, each ruling a taifa (and often with multiple levels of nominal fealty and relative independence, according to the patterns of feudalism). The taifa of Seville was especially influential, but the of Granada was the last to survive, lasting from 1228 until 1492.After the conquest of Toledo in 1086 by Alfonso VI, Christian rule dominated the peninsula. The main Taifas therefore had to resort to assistance from various Muslim powers across the Mediterranean. A number of different Muslim dynasties of North African originnotably dynasty and dynastydominated a slowly diminishing Al-Andalus over the next several centuries.()After the Muslim victory at the of Sagrajas (1086) put a temporary stop to Christian expansion, the dynasty constructed a unified Al-Andalus with its capital in Granada, ruling until mid-12th century. The various Taifa kingdoms were assimilated. the dynasty expansion in North Africa weakened Al-Andalus, and in 1170 the Almohads transferred their capital from Marrakesh to Seville. The Christian victory at the of Las Navas de Tolosa (1212) marked the beginning of the end of the Almohad dynasty.Andalusia - Kingdom of CastileThe weakness caused by the collapse of Almohad power and the subsequent creation of new Taifas, each with its own ruler, and led to the rapid Christian conquest or reconquest of the valley of the Guadalquivir. Crdoba was conquered in 1236 and Seville in 1248. The fall of Granada in 1492 put an end to Muslim rule in the Iberian peninsula.()File:La sevilla del sigloXVI.jpg|thumb||View of Seville and its port in the 16th century, by Snchez Coello.On August 3, 1492 Columbus left the town of de la Frontera, with the first expedition that resulted in the of America.() Many Andalusians participated in the expedition that would end the Middle Ages and signal the beginning of modernity. Contacts between Spain and the Americas, including royal administration and the shipping trade of Spanish colonies for over three hundred years, came almost exclusively through Andalusia.() As a result, the region became the wealthiest and most cosmopolitan of Spain and one of the most influential worldwide. Nonetheless, the dynasty ambitions elsewhere in Europe diverted much of the colonial wealth to war, and prevented the deeper economic development of Andalusia. Discontent with this situation culminated in 1641, when the Andalusian nobility staged an unsuccessful conspiracy to gain independence in 1641 from the provincial government of the de Guzmn, Count-Duke of Olivares.In the first half of the 16th century plague was still prevalent in Spain. According to George C. Kohn, One of the worst epidemics of the century, whose miseries were accompanied by severe drought and food shortage, started in 1505; by 1507, about 100,000 people had died in Andalusia alone... Andalusia was struck once again in 1646. For three years, plague haunted the entire region, causing perhaps as many as 200,000 deaths, especially in Mlaga and Seville.()Following the Second Rebellion of the Alpujarras in 1568-1571, the Moorish populationthat is, unconverted Moriscoswere expelled from of Castile (and Aragon). However, by order of the crown, two Moorish families were required to remain in each village in order to demonstrate to the new inhabitants, introduced from northern Spain, the workings of the terracing and irrigation systems on which the districts agriculture depends. Much as Andalusia profited from the Spanish overseas empire, the region suffered greatly from its loss and from the end of mercantilism. Having never industrialized, the region went from being one of Spains wealthiest in the early 19th century to one of its poorest a century later.Government and politicsAndalusia one of the 17 communities of Spain. The Autonomous Government (Spanish: Junta de Andaluca) includes the of Andalusia, its chosen president, a Consultative Council, and other bodies. The Autonomous Community of Andalusia was formed in accord with a referendum of February 28, 1980() and became an autonomous community under the 1981 Statute of Automony known as the Estatuto de Carmona. The process followed the Constitution of 1978, still current as of 2009, which recognizes and guarantees the right of automony for the various regions and nationalities of Spain. The process to establish Andalusia as an autonomous region followed Article 151 of the Constitution, making Andalusia the only autonomous community to take that particular course. That article was set out for regions like Andalusia that had been prevented by the outbreak of the Civil War from adopting a statute of autonomy during the period of the Spanish Republic.Article 1 of the 1981 Statute of Autonomy justifies autonomy based on the regions historical identity, on the self-government that the Constitution permits every nationality, on outright equality to the rest of the nationalities and regions that compose Spain, and with a power that emanates from the Andalusian Constitution and people, reflected in its Statute of Autonomy.()In October 2006 the constitutional commission of the Generales (the national legislature of Spain), with favorable votes from the left-of-center Socialist Workers Party (PSOE), the leftist United Left (IU) and the right-of-center People`s Party (PP), approved a new Statute of Autonomy for Andalusia, whose preamble refers to the community as a national reality (realidad nacional):On November 2, 2006 the Spanish Chamber Deputies ratified the text of the Constitutional Commission with 306 votes in favor, none opposed, and 2 abstentions. This was the first time a Spanish Organic Law adopting a Statute of Autonomy was approved with no opposing votes. The Senate, in a plenary session of December 20, 2006, ratified the referendum to be voted upon by the Andalusian public February 18, 2007.The Statute of Autonomy spells out Andalusias distinct institutions of government and administration. Chief among these is the Autonomous Government (Junta de Andaluca). Other institutions specified in the Statute are the Defensor del Pueblo Andaluz (literally Defender of the Andalusian People, basically an ombudsperson), the Consultative Council, the Chamber of Accounts, the Audiovisual Council of Andalusia, and the Economic and Social Council.The Andalusian Statute of Autonomy recognizes Seville as the regions capital. The Andalusian Autonomous Government is located there. However, the regions highest court, the Court of Andalusia (Superior de Justicia de Andaluca) is not part of the Autonomous Government, and has its seat in Granada. Andalusian Autonomous Government The Andalusian Autonomous Government (Junta de Andaluca) is the institution of self-government of the Autonomous Community of Andalusia. Within the government, the President is the supreme representative of the autonomous community, and the ordinary representative of the Spanish state in the autonomous community. The president is formally named to the position by the Monarch of Spain and then confirmed by a majority vote of the of Andalusia. In practice, the monarch always names a person acceptable to the ruling party or coalition of parties in the autonomous region. In theory, were the candidate to fail to gain the needed majority, the monarch could propose a succession of candidates. After two months, if no proposed candidate could gain the parliaments approval, the parliament would automatically be dissolved and the acting president would call new elections.(Estatuto de Autonoma Art. 118 Cap. III Tt. IV) As of 2009, Jos Antonio Grin Martnez is president.The Council of Government, the highest political and administrative organ of the Community, exercises regulatory and power.() The President presides over the council, which also includes the heads of various departments (Consejeras). In the current legislature (20082012), there are 15 of these departments. In order of precedence, they are Presidency, Governance, Economy and Treasury, Education, Justice and Public Administration, Innovation, Science and Business, Public Works and Transportation, Employment, Health, Agriculture and Fishing, Housing and Territorial Planning, Tourism, Commerce and Sports, Equality and Social Welfare, Culture, and Environment.File:Partidos Judiciales de Andaluca.svg|thumb|400px|districts of Andalusia.The Parliament of Andalusia, its Autonomic Legislative Assembly, develops and approves laws and elects and removes the President.() Elections to the Andalusian Parliament follow a democratic formula through which the citizens elect 109 representatives. After the approval of the Statute of Autonomy through Organic Law 6/1981 on December 20, 1981, the first elections to the autonomic parliament took place May 23, 1982. Further elections have occurred in 1986, 1990, 1994, 1996, 2000, 2004, and 2008. The current (20082012) legislature includes representatives of the PSOE-A (Andalusian branch of the left-of-center PSOE), PP-A (Andalusian branch of the right-of-center PP) and IULV-CA (Andalusian branch of the leftist IU).(Results of the 2008 elections to the Parliament of Andalusia, Junta de Andaluca.)Judicial powerThe Court of Andalusia (Superior de Justicia de Andaluca) in Granada is subject only to the higher jurisdiction of Court of Spain. The High Court is not an organ of the Autonomous Community, but rather of the of Spain, which is unitary throughout the kingdom and whose powers are not transferred to the autonomous communities. The Andalusian territory is divided into 88 legal/judicial districts (partidos judiciales).( )Administrative divisionsProvincesAndalusia consists of eight provinces. The latter were established by de Burgos in the territorial division of Spain. Each of the Andalusian provinces bears the same name as its capital:(){| classwikitable|-! Province !! Capital !! Population !! Density !! Municipalities !! Legal districts|-!  Almera| Almera || 635,850 ||  || 102 municipalities || 8|-!  Cdiz| Cdiz || 1,180,817 ||  || 44 municipalities || 14|-!  Crdoba| Crdoba || 788,287 ||  || 75 municipalities || 12|-!  Granada| Granada || 882,184 ||  || 168 municipalities || 9|-!  Huelva| Huelva || 483,792 ||  || 79 municipalities || 6|-!  Jan| Jan || {{convert|662,751 ||  || 97 municipalities || 10|-!  Mlaga| Mlaga || 1,491,287 ||  || 101 municipalities || 11|-!  Seville| Seville || 1,813,908 ||  || 105 municipalities || 15|}Entirely informally, Andalusia is traditionally divided into two large subregions: Upper or Eastern Andalusia, consisting of the provinces of Almera, Granada, Jan, and Mlaga, and Lower or Western Andalusia, consisting of the provinces of Huelva, Seville, Cdiz, and Crdoba.Municipalities and local entitiesBeyond the level of provinces, Andalusia is further divided into 771 municipalities (municipios).( The municipalities of Andalusia are regulated by Title III of the Statute of Autonomy, Articles 9195, which establishes the municipality as the basic territorial entity of Andalusia, each of which has legal personhood and autonomy in many aspects of its internal affairs. At the municipal level, representation, government and administration is performed by the ayuntamiento (municipal government), which has competency for planning, community social services, supply and treatment of water, collection and treatment of waste, and promotion of tourism, culture, and sports, among other matters established by law.(Ley 7/1993, de 27 de julio, reguladora de la demarcacin municipal de Andaluca.)Among the more important Andalusian cities besides the provincial capitals are:* Ejido, and de Mar, (Almera)* Lnea de la Concepcin, Algeciras, Roque, Cdiz, de Barrameda, Rota, San Fernando, Jerez, and El Puerto, (Cdiz)* Almucar, Guadix, Loja and Motril, (Granada)* Linares, beda and Baeza, (Jan)* Antequera, Ronda and Marbella, (Mlaga)* Utrera, Hermanas, de Guadara, Osuna, Ecija and Lebrija (Seville)In conformity with the intent to devolve control as locally as possible, in many cases, separate nuclei of population within municipal borders each administer their own interests. These are variously known as pedanas (hamlets), villas (villages), aldeas (also usually rendered as villages), or other similar names.((List of local entities in Andalusia, in Spanish.)Comarcas and mancomunidadesFile:Regions of Andalusia.svg|thumb|400px|of AndalusiaWithin the various autonomous communities of Spain, comarcas are comparable to shires (or, in some countries, counties) in the English-speaking world. Unlike in some of Spains other autonomous communities, under the original 1981 Statute of Autonomy, the of Andalusia had no formal recognition, but, in practice, they still had informal recognition as geographic, cultural, historical, and in some cases administrative entities. The 2007 Statute of Autonomy echoes this practice, and mentions comarcas in Article 97 of Title III, which defines the significance of comarcas and establishes a basis for formal recognition in future legislation.(Tt. III. Art. 97. Comarcas  Estatuto de Autonoma de Andaluca 2007: :1. La comarca se configura como la agrupacin voluntaria de municipios limtrofes con caractersticas geogrficas, econmicas, sociales e histricas afines. 2. Por ley del Parlamento de Andaluca podr regularse la creacin de comarcas,que establecer, tambin, sus competencias. Se requerir en todo caso el acuerdo de los Ayuntamientos afectados y la aprobacin del Consejo de Gobierno.) The current statutory entity that most closely resembles a comarca is the mancomunidad, a freely chosen, bottom-up association of municipalities intended as an instrument of socioeconomic development and coordination between municipal governments.((Mancomunidades (map), dgal.map.es. You can click the map to see the mancomunidades of each individual province.) It is possible that present-day mancomunidades could, in the future, become comarcas. Alternatively, groups of municipalities formed under LEADER or PRODER to solicit European aid for rural development could also evolve into comarcas. Almost every Andalusian municipality outside of the capitals and major cities is a member of some such group. These groups consist of municipalities freely united by their economic interests and are often endowed with funds used for external dissemination of their identity.DemographicsAndalusia ranks first by population among the 17 autonomous communities of Spain. The estimated population at the beginning of 2009 was 8,285,692.(Cifras de poblacin referidas al 01/01/2009. Resumen por Comunidades Autnomas. Instituto Nacional de Estadstica (Spain). Accessed 2009-06-05.) The population is concentrated, above all, in the provincial capitals and along the coasts, so that the level of urbanization is quite high; half the population is concentrated in the 28 cities of more than 50,000 inhabitants. The population is aging, although the process of immigration is countering the inversion of the pyramid.(Inversion of the pyramid is a process by which the number of older people exceeds the number of younger people. This often occurs in developed countries as birth rates decline.) Evolution At the end of the 20th century, Andalusia was in the last phase of transition. The rate stagnated at around 89 per thousand, and the population came to be influenced mainly by birth and migration.() File:Poblacion andalucia.png|thumb|300px|Population by municipalities in Andalusia in 2007.(Avance del Padrn a 1 de enero de 2008. Datos provisionales. Comunidades autnomas y provincias, INE. Accessed 2008-08-05. Link does not have relevant data 2009-12-10.)In 1950, Andalusia had 20.04 percent of the national population of Spain. By 1981, this had declined to 17.09 percent. Although the Andalusian population was not declining in absolute terms, these relative losses were due to emigration great enough to nearly counterbalance having the highest rate in Spain. Since the 1980s, this process has reversed on all counts,() and as of 2009, Andalusia has 17.82 percent of the Spanish population.()The birth rate is sharply down, as is typical in developed economies, although it has lagged much of the rest of the world in this respect. Furthermore, prior emigrants have been returning to Andalusia. Beginning in the 1990s, others have been immigrating in large numbers as well, as Spain has become a country of net immigration.(At the beginning of the 21st century, statistics show a slight increase in the birth rate, due in large part to the higher birth rate among immigrants.()() The result is that as of 2009, the trend toward rejuvenation of the population is among the strongest of any autonomous community of Spain, or of any comparable region in Europe.( Structure At the beginning of the 21st century, the population structure of Andalusia shows a clear inversion of the population pyramid, with the largest cohorts falling between ages 25 and 50.() Comparison of the population pyramid in 2008 to that in 1986 shows: # A clear decrease in the population under the age of 25, due to a declining birth rate.# An increase in the adult population, as the earlier, larger cohort born in the baby boom of the 1960s and 1970s reach adulthood. This effect has been exacerbated by immigration: the largest contingent of immigrants are young adults.# A further increase in the adult population, and especially the older adult population, due to increased expectancy.As far as composition by sex, two aspects stand out: the higher percentage of women in the elderly population, owing to womens longer life expectancy, and, on the other hand, the higher percentage of men of working age, due in large part to a predominantly male immigrant population.( Immigration 5.35 percent of the population of Andalusia were born outside of Spain. This is actually a relatively low number in Spanish national terms, the national average being three percentage points higher. The immigrants are by no means evenly distributed among the Andalusian provinces: Almera, with a 15.20 percent immigrant population, is third among all provinces in Spain, while at the other extreme Jan has only 2.07 percent immigrants and Crdoba 1.77%. The predominant nationalities among the immigrant populations are Moroccan (92,500, constituting 17.79 of the foreigners living in Andalusia), British (15.25 percent across the region, but constituting a majority of immigrants to Mlaga). Still, if one looks at regions rather than individual countries, the single largest immigrant block is from America, outnumbering either North Africans or non-Spanish Western Europeans.(Instituto Nacional de Estadstica de Espaa,  2005 census) Demographically, this group has provided an important addition to the Andalusian labor force.((EconomyAndalusia is traditionally an agricultural area, but the service sector (particularly tourism, retail sales, and transportation) now predominates. The once booming construction sector, hit hard by the 2009 recession, was also important to the regions economy. The industrial sector is less developed than most other regions in Spain. During the period for the 20002006 period was 3.72%, one of the highest in the country. Still, according to the Spanish Instituto Nacional de Estadstica (INE), the GDP per capita of Andalusia (17,401; 2006) remains the second lowest in Spain, with only Extremadura lagging behind.(La renta per cpita andaluza alcanza los 17.401 euros, la segunda ms baja de Espaa, Diario de Sevilla, 28 December 2007, pg. 40) Primary sector The sector, despite adding the least of the three sectors to the regional GDP remains important, especially when compared to typical developed economies. The primary sector produces 8.26 percent of regional GDP and employs 8.19 percent of the workforce.(IEA data for 2007) In monetary terms it could be considered a rather uncompetitive sector, given its level of productivity compared to other Spanish regions. In addition to its numeric importance relative to other regions, agriculture and other primary sector activities have strong roots in local culture and identity.The primary sector is divided into a number of subsectors: agriculture, fishing, husbandry, hunting, forestry, mining, and energy.Agriculture, husbandry, hunting, and forestryFile:Aceites DOP Andaluca.svg|thumb|400px|Denominations of origin of oil in AndalusiaFor many centuries, Andalusian society was mainly agricultural. Even today, 45.74 percent of the Andalusian territory is cultivated.(Source: MAPA. Subdireccin General de Estadsticas Agroalimentarias. 2004) The primary cultivation is dryland farming of cereals and sunflowers without artificial irrigation, especially in the vast countryside of the Guadalquivir valley and the high plains of Granada and Almera-with a considerably lesser and more geographically focused cultivation of barley and oats. Using irrigation, maize, cotton and rice are also grown on the banks of the Guadalquivir and Genil.()File:Olivares en Jan.jpg|thumb|Olive orchards in de la Encina province of Jan.The most important tree crops are olives, especially in the Subbetic regions of the provinces of Crdoba and Jen, where irrigated olive orchards constitute a large component of agricultural output.(Junta de Andaluca, Impacto de la ayuda a la produccin sobre el olivar andaluz, in El Olivar Andaluz, Besana. Accessed online 2008-10-09.) There are extensive vineyards in various zones such as de la Frontera (sherry), de Huelva, Montilla-Moriles and Mlaga. Fruitsmainly citrus fruitsare grown near the banks of the Guadalquivir; almonds, which require far less water, are grown on the high plains of Granada and Alemera.()In monetary terms, by far the most productive and competitive agriculture in Andalusia is the intensive forced cultivation of strawberries, raspberries, blueberries, and other fruits grown under hothouse conditions under clear plastic, often in sandy zones, on the coasts, in Almera and Huelva.()File:Dehesa Boyal. Bollullos Par del Condado (Huelva).jpg|thumb|Dehesa Boyal (meadow for grazing animals), Par del Condado, Huelva.farming has recently undergone rapid expansion in Andalusia, mainly for export to European markets but with increasing demand developing in Spain.()Andalusia has a long tradition of husbandry and livestock farming, but it is now restricted mainly to mountain meadows, where there is less pressure from other potential uses. The raising of livestock now plays a semi-marginal role in the Andalusian economy, constituting only 15 percent of the primary sector, half the number for Spain taken as a whole.()Extensive raising of livestock grazes the animals on natural or cultivated pastures, whereas intensive raising of livestock is based in fodder rather than pasture. Although the productivity is higher than with extensive techniques, the economics are quite different. While intensive techniques now dominate in Europe and even in other regions of Spain, most of Andalusias cattle, virtually all of its sheep and goats, and a good portion of its pigs are raised by extensive farming in mountain pastures. This includes the Iberian pigs that are the source of ibrico. Andalusias native sheep and goats present a great economic opportunity in a Europe where animal products are generally in strong supply, but the sheep and goat meat, milke, and leather (and the products derived from these) are relatively scarce.Hunting remains relatively important in Andalusia, but has largely lost its character as a means of obtaining food.It is now more of a leisure activity linked to the mountain areas and complementary to forestry and the raising of livestock.()The Andalusian forests are important for their extent50 percent of the territory of Andalusiaand for other less quantifiable environmental reasons, such as their value in preventing erosion, regulating the flow of water necessary for other flora and fauna. For these reasons, there is legislation in place to protect the Andalusian forests.() The value of forest products as such constitutes only 2 percent of agricultural production. This comes mostly from cultivated specieseucalyptus in Huelva and poplar in Granadaas well as naturally occurring oak in the Sierra Morena.() Fishing Fishing is a longstanding tradition on the Andalusian coasts. Fish and other seafood have long figured prominently in the local diet and in the local gastronomic culture: fish (pescaito frito in local dialect), white prawns, almadraba tuna, among others. The Andalusian fishing fleet is Spains second largest, after Galicia, and Andalusias 38 fishing ports are the most of any Spanish autonomous community.() Commercial fishing produces only 0.5 percent of the product of the regional primary sector by value, but there are areas where it has far greater importance. In the province of Huelva it constitutes 20 percent of the primary sector, and locally in Umbra 70 percent of the work force is involved in commercial fishing.()Failure to comply with fisheries laws regarding the use of trawling, urban pollution of the seacoast, destruction of habitats by coastal construction (for example, alteration of the mouths of rivers, construction of ports), and diminution of fisheries by overexploitation()have created a permanent crisis in the Andalusian fisheries, justifying attempts to convert the fishing fleet. The decrease in fish stocks has led to the rise of aquaculture, including farming both on the coasts and in the interior.() Mining Despite the general poor returns in recent years, mining retains a certain importance in Andalusia. Andalusia produces half of Spains mining product by value. Of Andalusias production, roughly half comes from the province of Huelva. Mining for precious metals at de Riotinto in Huelva (see Tinto Group) dates back to pre-Roman times; the mines were abandoned in the Middle Ages and rediscovered in 1556. Other mining activity is coal mining in the Guadiato valley in the province of Crdoba; various metals at Aznalcllar in the province of Seville, and iron at Alquife in the province of Granada. In addition, limestone, clay, and other materials used in construction are well distributed throughout Andalusia.() Secondary sector: industry The Andalusian industrial sector has always been relatively small. Nevertheless in 2007, Andalusian industry earned 11.979 million euros and employed more than 290,000 workers. This represented 9.15 percent of regional GDP, far below the 15.08 the secondary sector represents in the economy of Spain as a whole.(IEA: Contabilidad Regional de Andaluca) By analyzing the different subsectors of the food industry Andalusian industry accounts for more than 16% of total production. In a comparison with the Spanish economy, this subsector is virtually the only food that has some weight in the national economy with 16.16%. Lies far behind the manufacturing sector of shipping materials just over 10% of the Spanish economy. Companies like Cruzcampo (Heineken Group), Puleva, Domecq, Santana Motors or Renault-Andalusia, are exponents of these two subsectors. Of note is the Andalusian aeronautical sector, which is second nationally only behind Madrid and represents approximately 21% of total turnover in terms of employment, highlighting companies like Airbus, Airbus Military, or the newly formed Aerospace Alestis. On the contrary it is symptomatic of how little weight the regional economy in such important sectors such as textiles or electronics at the national level.Andalusian industry is also characterized by a specialization in industrial activities of transforming raw agricultural and mineral materials. This is largely done by small enterprises without the public or foreign investment more typical of a high level of industrialization. Tertiary sector: services File:Castillo de Sancti Petri.JPG|thumb||Castle of Sancti Petri, located in Fernando, Cdiz. One of the largest components of the service sector is sun and sand tourism.In recent decades the Andalusian tertiary (service) sector has grown greatly, and has come to constitute the majority of the regional economy, as is typical of contemporary economies in developed nations.() In 1975 the service sector produced 51.1 percent of local GDP and employed 40.8 percent of the work force. In 2007, this had risen to 67.9 percent of GDP and 66.42 percent of jobs. This process of tertiarization of the economy has followed a somewhat unusual course in Andalusia.() This growth occurred somewhat earlier than in most developed economies and occurred independently of the local industrial sector. There were two principal reasons that tertiarization followed a different course in Andalusia than elsewhere:1. Andalusian capital found it impossible to compete in the industrial sector against more developed regions, and was obligated to invest in sectors that were easier to enter.2. The absence of an industrial sector that could absorb displaced agricultural workers and artisans led to the proliferation of services with rather low productivity. This unequal development compared to other regions led to a hypertrophied and unproductive service sector, which has tended to reinforce underdevelopment, because it has not led to large accumulations of capital.(()Tourism in AndalusiaFile:Rabida1.jpg|thumb|Rbida Monastery, de la Frontera, province of Huelva.File:Ronda La Ciudad2004.jpg|thumb|View of Ronda.File:Playas de Nerja 2.jpg|thumb|Nerja.Due in part to the relatively mild winter and spring climate, the south of Spain is attractive to overseas visitorsespecially tourists from Northern Europe. While inland areas such as Jan, Crdoba and the hill villages and towns remain relatively untouched by tourism, the coastal areas of Andalusia have heavy visitor traffic for much of the year.Among the autonomous communities, Andalusia is second only to Catalonia in tourism, with nearly 30 million visitors every year. The principal tourist destinations in Andalusia are the del Sol and (secondarily) the Sierra Nevada. As discussed above, Andalusia is one of the sunniest and warmest places in Europe, making it a center of sun and sand tourism.() 70 percent of the lodging capacity and 75 percent of the nights booked in Andalusian hotels are in coastal municipalities. The largest number of tourists come in August13.26 percent of the nights booked throughout the yearand the smallest number in December5.36 percent.On the west (Atlantic) coast are the de la Luz (provinces of Huelva and Cdiz), and on the east (Mediterranean) coast, the del Sol (provinces of Cdiz y Mlaga), Tropical (Granada and part of Almera) and the de Almera. In 2004, the Flag beach program of the non-profit for Environmental Education recognized 66 Andalusian beaches and 18 pleasure craft ports as being in a good state of conservation in terms of sustainability, accessibility, and quality. Nonetheless, the level of tourism on the Andalusian coasts has been high enough to have a significant environmental impact, and other organizationssuch as the Spanish in Action (Ecologistas en Accin) with their description of Black Flag beaches() or Greenpeace()have expressed the opposite sentiment.Together with sand and sun tourism, there has also been a strong increase in nature tourism in the interior, as well as tourism, sport tourism, and conventions. One example of sport and nature tourism is the ski resort at Sierra Nevada National Park.As for cultural tourism, Andalusia has some notable monuments dating back to the Muslim era: the Mosque of Crdoba (now a cathedral), the Alhambra in Granada and the Giralda in Seville. There are hundreds of cultural tourist destinations: cathedrals, castles, forts, monasteries, and historic city centers; the city centers of beda and Baeza in the province of Jan are UNESCO Heritage Sites.Each of the provinces shows a great variety of architectural styles: architecture, architecture, architecture and more modern styles. Further, there are the colombinos, significant places in the life of Columbus:(Decreto 553/1967, de 2 de marzo, por el que se declara conjunto histrico artstico el sector denominado Lugares Colombinos en la provincia de Huelva. BOE n 69 de 22/03/1967.) de la Frontera, Rbida Monastery, and Moguer) in the province of Huelva. There are also archeological sites of great interest: the Roman city of Italica, birthplace of Emperor Trajan and (most likely) Hadrian; Claudia near the Straits of Gibraltar; Azahara, the city-palace of the Cordoban caliph III, where major excavations still continue.Andalusia was the birthplace of such great painters as Velzquez and Murillo (Seville) and, more recently, Picasso (Mlaga); Picasso is memorialized by in his native city by the Picasso and Picasso Mlaga; the de Murillo was a museum 19821998, but is now mostly offices for the Andalusian Council of Culture. There are numerous other significant museums around the region, both of paintings and of archeological artifacts such as gold jewelry, pottery and other ceramics, and other works that demonstrate the regions artisanal traditions.The Council of Government has designated the following Municipios Tursticos: in Almera, de Mar; in Cdiz, de la Frontera, Chipiona, de la Frontera, Grazalema, Rota, and Tarifa; in Granada, Almucar; in Huelva, Aracena; in Jan, Cazorla; in Mlaga, Benalmdena, Fuengirola, Nerja, de la Victoria, Ronda, and Torremolinos; in Seville, Santiponce.Monuments and features* Torcal,    Antequera (Mlaga)* Azahara,  Crdoba* Mezquita,     Crdoba* Alhambra,     Granada* of Charles V Granada* Alcazaba, Almera* Charterhouse, Granada* Albayzn, Granada* Alcazaba, Mlaga* Nuevo, Ronda (Mlaga)* Giralda,    Seville* del Oro, Seville* Plaza de Espaa, Seville* Cathedral, Seville* of Seville, Seville* beda and Baeza, Jan* Rabida Monastery, de la Frontera (Huelva)* of Nerja, Nerja (Mlaga)InfrastructureTransportAs in any modern society, transport systems are an essential structural element of the functioning of Andalusia. The transportation network facilitates territorial coordination, economic development and distribution, and intercity transportation.()In urban transport, underdeveloped public transport systems put pedestrian traffic and other non-motorized traffic are at a disadvantage compared to the use of private vehicles. Several Andalusian capitalsCrdoba, Granada and Sevillehave recently been trying to remedy this by strengthening their public transport systems and providing a better infrastructure for the use of bicycles.()For over a century, the conventional rail network has been centralized on the regional capital, Seville, and the national capital, Madrid; in general, there are no direct connections between provincial capitals. High-speed AVE trains run from Madrid via Crdoba to Seville and Mlaga. Further AVE routes are under construction.(Productos Alta Velocidad, RENFE/AVE. Accessed online 2009-12-11.) The Madrid-Crdoba-Seville route was the first high-velocity route in Spain (operating since 1992). Other principal routes are the one from Algeciras to Seville and from Almera via Granada to Madrid.File:Puerto malaga.jpg|thumb|left|of Mlaga.File:Puerto Bans Marbella.jpg||left|thumb|Bans, port of Marbella.Most of the principal roads have been converted into access highways known as autovas. The Autova del Este (A-4) runs from Madrid through the Despeaperros Natural Park, then via Bailn, Crdoba, and Seville to Cdiz, and is part of route E05 in the E-road network. The other main road in the region is the portion of route E15, which runs as the Autovia del Mediterrneo along the Spanish Mediterranean coast. Parts of this constitute the superhighway AP-7, while in other areas it is A-7. Both of these roads run generally east-west, although the Autova A-4 turns to the south in western Andalusia.Other first-order roads include the A-48 roughly along the Atlantic coast from Cdiz to Algeciras, continuing European route E05 to meet up with route E15; the Autova del Quinto Centenario (A-49), which continues west from Seville (where the Autova A-4 turns toward the south) and goes on to Huelva and into Portugal as route E01; the Autova Ruta de la Plata (A-66), route E803, which roughly corresponds to the ancient Roman Route from the mines of northern Spain, and runs north from Seville; the Autova de Mlaga (A-45), which runs south from Crdoba to Mlaga; and the Autova de Sierra Nevada (A-44), part of route E902, which runs south from Jan to the Mediterranean coast at Motril. As of 2008 Andalusia has six public airports, all of which can legally handle international flights; however the Airport is dominant, handling 60.67 percent of passengers() and 85 percent of its international traffic. The Airport handles another 20.12 percent of traffic, and the Airport 7.17 percent, so that these three airports account for 87.96 percent of traffic.(Mlaga Airport is the international airport that offers a wide variety of international destinations. It has a daily link with twenty cities in Spain and over a hundred cities in Europe (mainly in Great Britain, Central Europe and the Nordic countries but also the main cities of Eastern Europe: Moscow, Petersburg, Sofia, Riga or Bucharest), North Africa, Middle East (Riyadh, Jeddah and Kuwait) and North America (York, Toronto and Montreal).The main ports are Algeciras (for freight and container traffic) and Mlaga for cruise ships. Algeciras is Spains leading commercial port, with  of cargo in 2004.() Seville has Spains only commercial river port. Other significant commercial ports in Andalusia are the ports of the of Cdiz and Huelva.The Council of Government has approved a Plan of Infrastructures for the Sustainability of Transport in Andalusia (PISTA) 20072013, which plans an investment of 30 billion euros during that period.() Energy infrastructure File:PS10 solar power tower 2.jpg|thumb|power tower PS10 in la Mayor.File:Trmica de Escombreras.jpg|thumb|de Almera Thermal Power Station,  Province of Almera.The lack of high-quality fuels in Andalusia has led to a strong dependency on petroleum imports. Still, Andalusia has a strong potential for the development of energy, above all energy. The Andalusian Energy Agency established in 2005 by the autonomous government, is a new governmental organ charged with the development of energy policy and provision of a sufficient supply of energy for the community.( The infrastructure for production of electricity consists of eight large power stations, more than 70 hydroelectric power plants, two farms, and 14 major cogeneration facilities. Historically, the largest Andalusian business in this sector was the Sevillana de Electricidad, founded in 1894, absorbed into Endesa in 1996.The power tower PS10 was built by the Andalusian firm Abengoa in la Mayor in the province of Seville, and began operating in March 2007. It is the largest existing solar power facility in Europe.(Abengoa opens the first EU commercial concentrating Solar Power Tower, RenewableEnergyMagazine.com, 2007-04-02.) Smaller solar power stations, also recent, exist at Cllar and Granada, inaugurated by Geosol and Granada. Two more large thermosolar facilities, Andasol I y II, planned at Hoya de Guadix in the province of Granada are expected to supply electricity to half a million households.(La central solar de alta temperatura de Andasol 2 ya ha puesto la primera piedra, Energas Renovables, 2007-07-12.) The Solar de Almera (PSA) in the Tabernas Desert is an important center for the exploration of the solar energy.(Plataforma Solar de Almeria, Institute of Technical Thermodynamics, German Aerospace Center. Accessed online 2009-12-11.)The largest wind power firm in the region is the Elica de Andaluca, formed by the merger of Elica del Sur S.A. and Elica del Estrecho S.A. Education File:portadafacultad.gif|thumb|Law School of the of Granada.As throughout Spain, basic education in Andalusia is free and compulsory. Students are required to complete ten years of schooling, and may not leave school before the age of 16, after which students may continue on to a baccalaureate, to intermediate education, to intermediate-level schooling in arts and design, to intermediate sports studies, or to the working world.Andalusia has a tradition of higher education dating back to the Ages and the of Granada, of Baeza, and of Osuna.As of 2009, there are ten private or public universities in Andalucia. University studies are structured in cycles, awarding degrees based on ECTS credits in accord with the process, which the Andalusian universities are adopting in accord with the other universities of the Higher Education Area.HealthcareResponsibility for healthcare jurisdictions devolved from the Spanish government to Andalusia with the enactment of the Statute of Autonomy. Thus, the Health Service (Servicio Andaluz de Salud) currently manages almost all public health resources of the Community, with such exceptions as health resources for prisoners and members of the military, which remain under central administration.Science and technologyAccording to the Outreach Program for Science in Andalusia, Andalusia contributes 14 percent of Spains scientific production behind only Madrid and Catalonia among the autonomous communities,(www.andaluciainvestiga.com) even though regional investment in and development (R&D) as a proportion of GDP is below the national average.(Plan Andaluz de Investigacin, Desarrollo e Innovacin. PAIDI. 2005-05-01.) The lack of research capacity in business and the low participation of the private sector in research has resulted in R&D taking place largely in the public sector.The Council of Innovation, Science and Business is the organ of the autonomous government responsible for universities, research, technological development, industry, and energy. The council coordinates and initiates scientific and technical innovation through specialized centers an initiatives such as the Center for Marine Science and Technology (Centro Andaluz de Ciencia y Tecnologa Marina) and Corporation of Andalusia (Corporacin Tecnolgica de Andaluca).Within the private sphere, although also promoted by public administration, technology parks have been established throughout the Community, such as the Park of Andalucia (Parque Tecnolgico de Andaluca) in Campanillas on the outskirts of Mlaga, and 93 in Seville. Some of these parks specialize in specific sector, such as Aerpolis in aerospace or Geolit in technology. The Andalusian government deployed 600,000 Ubuntu desktop computers in their schools.MediaAndalusia has international, national, regional, and local media organizations, which are active gathering and disseminating information (as well as creating and disseminating information entertainment).The most notable is the public y Televisin de Andaluca (RTVA), broadcasting on two regional television channels, Sur and Sur 2, four regional radio stations, Sur Radio, Fiesta Radio, Andaluca Informacin and Flamenco Radio, as well as various digital signals, most notably Televisin available on cable TV throughout Spain.( That web page gives a rather complete listing of Andalusian media organizations.)NewspapersDifferent newspapers are published for each Andalusian provincial capital, comarca, or important city. Often, the same newspaper organization publishes different local editions with much shared content, with different mastheads and different local coverage. There are also popular papers distributed without charge, again typically with local editions that share much of their content.No single Andalusian newspaper is distributed throughout the region, not even with local editions. In eastern Andalusia the Ideal has edition in the provinces if Almera, Granada, and Jan. Joly is based in Andalucia, backed by Andalusian capital, and publishes eight daily newspapers there. Efforts to create a newspaper for the entire autonomous region have not succeeded (the most recent as of 2009 was the de Andaluca). The national press (Pas, El Mundo, ABC, etc.) include sections or editions specific to Andalusia. Public television Estacin de Tren y Sede de RTVA en Crdoba, Espaa.jpg|thumb|RTVAs headquarters, a former train station in Crdoba.Andalusia has two public television stations, both operated by y Televisin de Andaluca (RTVA):* Sur first broadcast on 28 February 1989 (de Andaluca).* Sur 2 first broadcast 5 June 1998. Programming focuses on culture, sports, and programs for children and youth.In addition, RTVA also operates the national and international cable channel Televisin, which first broadcast in 1996. Radio There are four public radio stations in the region, all operated by RTVA:* Sur Radio first broadcast October 1988.* Fiesta Radio first broadcast January 2001.* Andaluca Informacin first broadcast September 1998.* Flamenco Radio, first broadcast 29 September 2008.Art and cultureFile:FlamencoSevilla.jpg|thumb|right|Flamenco culture is native to Andalusia.The culture of Andalusia has been shaped by its particular history and geography, as well as its complex flows of population. Andalusia has been home to a succession of peoples and civilizations, many very different from one another, each impacting the settled inhabitants. The ancient Iberians were followed by Celts, Phoenicians and other Eastern Mediterranean traders, Romans, Visigoths, North African Muslims, and the Castilians and other Spanish of the Reconquista, not to mention the Jews, Romani people, and others who have lived in Andalusia in large numbers at one or another time, without ever being the holders of power. All have affected Andalusian identity and culture, which was already delineated in the 19th century and diffused widely in the literary and pictorial genre of the andaluz.()()In the 19th century, Andalusian culture came to be widely viewed as the Spanish culture par excellence, in part thanks to the perceptions of romantic travellers. In the words of Ortega y Gasset:ArtsAndalusia has been the birthplace of many great artists: the classic painters Velzquez, Murillo, and de Valds Leal; the sculptors Martnez Montas and Cano; and such modern painters as Vzquez Daz and Picasso. The composer de Falla was from Cdiz and incorporated typical Andalusian melodies in his works, as did Turina, from Seville. The great singer de la Isla was born in Fernando, Cdiz, and Segovia who helped shape the romantic-modernist approach to guitar, was born in Jan.ArchitectureFile:Alhambradesdegeneralife.jpg|thumb|left|The Alhambra, seen from the gardens of the Generalife in the Albaicn.Since the Neolithic era, Andalusia has preserved important megaliths, such as the dolmens at the de Menga and the de Viera, both at Antequera. Archeologists have found Age cities at Millares and Argar. Archeological digs at Doa Blanca in Puerto de Santa Mara have revealed the oldest Phoenicians city in the Iberian peninsula; major ruins have also been revealed at Roman Italica near Seville.()Some of the greatest architecture in Andalusia dates from the Muslim era: the Alhambra, portions of the Albaicn, and of Granada; the Mosque of Crdoba and the Giralda in Seville, now both converted into cathedrals; the of Seville, largely a mudjar achievement (that is, the work of Muslims who remained in Spain after the Reconquista).The traditional architecture of Andalusia retains its Roman and Arab roots, with a marked Mediterranean character strongly conditioned by the climate. Traditional urban houses are constructed with shared walls to minimize exposure to high exterior temperatures. Solid exterior walls are painted with lime to minimize the heating effects of the sun. In accord with the climate and tradition of each area, the roofs may be terraces or tiled in the Roman and tegula style. One of the most characteristic elements (and one of the most obviously influenced by Roman and North African architecture) is the interior patio or courtyard; the patios of Crdoba are particularly famous. Other characteristic elements are decorative (and functional) iron gratings, and the tiles known as azulejos. Landscapingboth for common private homes and on a more lavish scalealso carries on older traditions, with plants, flowers, and fountains, pools, and streams of water. Beyond these general elements, there are also specific local architectural styles, such as the roofs, roofed chimneys, and radically extended balconies of the Alpujarra, the cave dwellings of Guadix and of Granadas Sacromonte, or the traditional architecture of the Marquisate of Zenete.()File:Gran Teatro Falla.jpg|thumb|left|Teatro Falla in Cdiz.The monumental architecture of the centuries immediately after the Reconquista often displayed an assertion of Christian hegemony through architecture that referenced non-Arab influences. Some of the greatest Renaissance buildings in Andalusia are from the then-kingdom of Jan: the Cathedral, designed in parte by de Vandelvira, served as a model for the of Malaga and of Guadix; the centers of beda and Baeza, dating largely from this era, are UNESCO Heritage Sites. Seville and its kingdom also figured prominently in this era, as is shown by the consistorial de Sevilla, the de las Cinco Llagas or the of Jerez de la Frontera. The of Charles V in Granada is uniquely important for its Italianate purism.() Andalusia also has such Baroque-era buildings as the of San Telmo in Seville (seat of the current autonomic presidency), the of Our Lady of Reposo in Campillos, and the Charterhouse.() Academicism gave the region the Tobacco Factory in Seville and Neoclassicism the nucleus of Cdiz, such as its city hall, Royal Prison and the Oratorio de la Santa Cueva.Revivalist architecture in the 19th and 20th centuries contributed the buildings of the Exposition of 1929 in Seville, including the Neo-Mudjar Plaza de Espaa. Andalusia also preserves an important industrial patrimony related to various economic activities.Besides the architecture of the cities, there is also much outstanding rural architecture: houses, as well as ranch and farm buildings.() Sculpture File:Entierro cristo museo sevilla.jpg|thumb|Crying Over the Dead Christ, Pedro Milln, of Fine Arts of Seville.The Iberian reliefs of Osuna, of Baza, and de Bujalance, the Phoenecian sarcophagi of Cdiz, and the sculptures of the Baetic cities such as Italica give evidence of traditions of sculpture in Andalusia dating back to antiquity.() There are few significant surviving sculptures from the time of al-Andalus; two notable exceptions are the lions of the Alhambra and of the of Granada (the Muslim-era hospital in the Albaicn).The school of sculpture dating from the 13th century onward and the Granadan school beginning toward the end of the 16th century both focused primarily on Christian religious subject matter, including many wooden altarpieces. Notable sculptors in these traditions include Mercadante de Bretaa, Milln, Martnez Montas, Roldn, de Arce, Jernimo Balbs, Cano, and de Mena.() Non-religious sculpture has also existed in Andalusia since antiquity. A fine example from the Renaissance era is the decoration of the de Pilatos in Seville. Nonetheless, non-religious sculpture played a relatively minor role until such 19th century sculptors as Susillo. Painting File:Pablo picasso 1.jpg|thumb|Ruiz Picasso, born in Mlaga.As in sculpture, there were Sevillian and the Granadan schools of painting. The latter has figured prominently in the history of Spanish art since the 15th century and includes such important artists as Zurbarn, Velzquez and Murillo, as well as theoreticians of art such as Pacheco. The of Fine Arts of Seville is considered Spains second most important museum after The Prado.() Both contain numerous representative works of the Sevillian school of painting.A specific romantic genre known as andaluz depicts traditional and folkloric Andalusian subjects. Important artists in this genre include Barrn, Garca Ramos, Bilbao Martnez and Romero de Torres. The genre is well represented in the private Thyssen-Bornemisza Collection, part of which is on display at Madrids Museum.()Mlaga has a foundation and museum dedicated to its native son, the 20th century artist Picasso. Literature and philosophy File:Grammatica Nebrissensis.JPG|thumb|left|upright|The 1492 Gramtica by de Nebrija.Andalusia plays a significant role in the history of language literature, however not all of the important literature associated with Andalusia was written in Spanish. Before 1492, there was the literature written in Arabic. Hispano-Arabic authors native to the region include Hazm, Zaydun, Tufail, Al-Mutamid, al-Jatib, al-Yayyab, and Zamrak.() Twelfth century writer Quzman crafted poems in the colloquial Andalusian language.()In 1492 de Nebrija published his celebrated de la lengua castellana (Grammar of the Castilian language), the first such work for a modern European language. In 1528 Delicado wrote La lozana andaluza, a novel in the orbit of Celestina, and in 1599 the Sevillian Alemn wrote the first part of de Alfarache, the first novel with a known author. The prominent humanist literary school of Seville included such writers as de Mal Lara, de Herrera, de Cetina, Barahona de Soto, de la Cueva, Argote de Molina, and Caro. The Cordoban Luis de Gngora was the greatest exponent of the culteranismo of Baroque poetry in the de Oro;() indeed, the style is often referred to as Gngorismo.Literary Romanticism in Spain had one of its great centers in Andalusia, with such authors as de Saavedra, Duke of Rivas, Cadalso and Adolfo Bcquer. Costumbrismo andaluz existed in literature as much as in visual art, with notable examples being the Escenas andaluzas of Estbanez Caldern and the works of Antonio de Alarcn. Andalusian authors Ganivet, Gmez-Moreno, Manuel and Machado, and Villaespesa are all generally counted in the of 98. Also of this generation were the lvarez Quintero, dramatists who faithfully captured Andalusian dialects and idiosyncrasies. Also of note, 1956 Prize-winning poet Ramn Jimnez was a native of Moguer, near Huelva. A large portion of the garde of 27 who gathered at the de Sevilla on the 300th anniversary of Gngoras death were Andalusians: Garca Lorca, Cernuda, Alberti, Altolaguirre, Prados, and 1977 Nobel laureate Aleixandre.()Certain Andalusian fictional characters have become universal archetypes: Merimes gypsy Carmen, Beaumarchaiss Fgaro, and de Molinas Don Juan.As in most regions of Spain, the principal form of popular verse is the romance, although there are also strophes specific to Andalusia, such as the sole or the soleariya. Ballads, lullabies, street vendors cries, nursery rhymes, and work songs are plentiful.Among the philosophers native to the region can be counted Seneca, Maimonides, Averroes, Prez de Oliva, Fox Morcillo, Ganivet, Giner de los Ros, and Zambrano. Music of Andalusia File:Baile por Bulerias.jpg|thumb|upright|Baile por buleras, by Garca Ramos.The music of Andalusia includes traditional and contemporary music, folk and composed music, and ranges from flamenco to rock. Conversely, certain metric, melodic and harmonic characteristics are considered Andalusian even when written or performed by musicians from elsewhere.Flamenco, perhaps the most characteristically Andalusian genre of music and dance, originated in the 18th century, but is based in earlier forms from the region. The influence of the traditional music and dance of the Romani people or Gypsies is particularly clear. The genre embraces distinct vocal (flamenco), guitar (flamenco), and dance (flamenco) styles.()The Andalusian Statute of Autonomy reflects the cultural importance of flamenco in its Articles 37.1.18 and 68:Fundamental in the history of Andalusian music are the composers de Morales, Francisco Guerrero, Correa de Arauxo, Manuel Garca, de Falla, Turina, and Castillo, as well as the father of modern guitar, the guitarist Segovia. Mention should also be made of the great folk artists of the (music) and the hondo, such as Jurado, Flores (La Faraona, the pharaoh), Valderrama and the revolutionary de la Isla.()Prominent Andalusian rock groups include Triana and Medina Azahara. The duo del Ro from Hermanas had international success with their Macarena, including playing at a Bowl half-time show in the States, where their song has also been used as campaign music by the Democratic Party.() Other notables include the singer, songwriter, and poet Sabina, Pantoja, Lpez, who represented Spain at Eurovision in 2002, and Bisbal.()() Film The portrayal of Andalusia in film is often reduced to archetypes: flamenco, bullfighting, Catholic pageantry, brigands, the property-rich and cash-poor seorito andaluz and emigrants. These images particularly predominated from the 1940s through the 1960s, and helped to consolidate a cliched image of the region. In a very different vein, the province of Almera was the filming location for many Westerns, especially (but by no means exclusively) the Italian-directed Westerns. During the dictatorship of Franco, this was the extent of the film industry in Andalusia.Nonetheless, Andalusian film has roots as far back as Val del Omar in the pre-Franco years, and since the transition to democracy has brought forth numerous nationally and internationally respected directors: Cuadri (of the Earth), Gutirrez (Poniente), Carabante (Against the World), Alberto Rodrguez (Virgins), Banderas (Summer Rain), and Zambrano (Solas).Counting together feature films, documentaries, television programs, music videos etc., Andalusia has boomed from 37 projects shooting in 1999 to 1,054 in 2007, with the figure for 2007 including 19 feature films.(Andaluca alcanza los 1.000 rodajes gestionados por la Red de Ciudades de Cine de AFC, 2008-07-30, www.andaluciafilm.com. Accessed online 2009-12-16.) Although feature films are the most prestigious, commercials and television are currently more economically important to the region.The de Andaluca, headquartered in Crdoba, is a government-run entity in charge of the investigation, collection and diffusion of Andalusian cinematic heritage. Other important contributors to this last activity are such annual film festivals as the Festival of Spanish Film, the Festival of European Film (SFCE), the Festival of Short Films - Almera in Short, the Festival of Latin American Film, the Film Show in Cdiz, the Festival of Film and Televison and the Film Festival of Tarifa.CultureCustoms and SocietyAndalusia has a wide array of social customs, many of which have their roots in the Islamic traditions integrated into the area under Muslim rule.  Each sub region in Andalusia has its own unique customs that are closely tied to a combination Catholicism and local folklore. Traditional dress in all areas of Andalusia tends to be colorful and involve various head coverings reminiscent of a Muslim past.  Cities like Almeria are influenced by both Granada and Murcia, with the use of traditional head coverings.  The sombrero de Labrador, meaning workers hats made of black velvet are a signature style of this area. In Cadiz costumes in society often show rural roots with bullfights and massive parties occurring on many of the large estates. The tablado flamenco  and the cante jondo originate from Granada. They are believed to have their roots in oriental, Gregorian, Moorish, and Jewish music. Presently this music tends to be performed by gypsies. Gypsies are more common in Granada than anywhere else in Spain. In Huelva, one of the most distinct events is the gypsy Romeria del Rocio in May. It consists of a pilgrimage to a statue of the Virgin Mary, which was supposedly hidden from the Muslims. Legend has it that when it was rediscovered and moved the Virgin asked to be returned to the woods. After it was moved back a hermitage was build and many believers join this pilgrimage around Easter time every year. In Jaen, the saeta is a type of expression popular in the region. It is a form of chanting to the Virgin Mary, which is supposed to show ones religious devotion. Malaga, is the birthplace of Spanish bull-fighting. The region also has a rich musical tradition that is mostly derived from Arab songs called cartageneras.  Seville the largest province in Andalusia holds the Semana Santa the largest festival in Spain. During the festival religious fraternities dress as penitents (pilgrim worshipers) carrying huge altars. Songs and dances known as sevilanas, which demonstrate Middle-Easter origins are performed at such festivals. Overall, all the regions of Andalusia have developed distinct customs, but all share a connectedness to Catholicism and the regions Arabic cultural past.()Andalusian SpanishFile:Andaluca ceceante y seseante.PNG|thumb|300px|Most Spanish dialects in Spain differentiate between the sound of z and c (before e and i), pronounced , and that of s, pronounced . This distinction is lost in many Andalusian-speaking areas. In some mostly southerly areas, shown here in red, all three letters are pronounced , which is known as Ceceo. In other areas, all three letters are pronounced (), which is known as Seseo. Still other areas retain the distinction found elsewhere in Spain.Spanish is one of the most widely spoken forms of Spanish in Spain, and because of emigration patterns was very influential on American Spanish. Rather than a single dialect, it is really a range of dialects sharing some common features; among these is the retention of more Arabic words than elsewhere in Spain,()() as well as some phonological differences compared with Spanish. The isoglosses that mark the borders of Andalusian Spanish overlap to form a network of divergent boundaries, so there is no clear border for the linguistic region.(For some maps of various isoglosses, see the online Isogloss maps for Iberian Peninsula Spanish, according to ALPI.)Mythology and religionThe territory now known as Andalusia fell within the sphere of influence of ancient Mediterranean mythological beliefs. Phoenician colonization brought the cults of Baal and Melqart; the latter lasted into Roman times as Hercules, mythical founder of both Cdiz and Seville. The de Sancti Petri held the supposed tomb of Hercules, with representations of his Twelve labors; the region was the traditional site of the tenth labor, obtaining the cattle of the monster Geryon. Traditionally, the of Hercules flank the of Gibraltar. Clearly, the European pillar is the of Gibraltar; the African pillar was presumably either Hacho in Ceuta or Jebel Musa in Morocco. The road that led from Cdiz to Rome was known by several names, one of them being Herculea, Hercules route returning from his tenth labor. The present of arms of Andalusia shows Hercules between two lions, with two pillars behind these figures.The principal characteristic of the local popular form of Catholicism is devotion to the Mary; Andalusia is sometimes known as la tierra de Mara Santsima (the land of Most Holy Mary).(See http://buscon.rae.es/draeI/SrvltConsulta?TIPO_BUS3&LEMAtierra la tierra de Mara Santsima in the dictionary of the Academia Espaola.) Also characteristic are the processions during Week, in which thousands of penitents (known as nazarenos) sing saetas. Andalusia is the site of such pilgrim destinations as the de Nuestra Seora de la Cabeza in Andjar and the of El Roco in Almonte.BullfightingFile:joselito natural.jpg|thumb|Gmez Ortega: Joselito El Gallo.While some trace the lineage of the Fighting Bull back to Roman times, todays fighting bulls in the Iberian peninsula and in the former Empire trace back to Andalusia in the 15th and 16th centuries.() Andalusia remains a center of bull-rearing and bullfighting: its 227 fincas de ganado where fighting bulls are raised cover .( In the year 2000, Andalusias roughly 100 bullrings hosted 1,139 corridas.(The oldest bullring still in use in Spain is the neoclassical Plaza de toros in Ronda, built in 1784. The Andalusian Autonomous Government sponsors the Rutas de Andaluca taurina, a touristic route through the region centered on bullfighting.FestivalsFile:Cruz de mayo bailio.jpg|thumb|left|de mayo of the confraternity Hermandad de la Paz y Esperanza (Brotherhood of Peace and Hope), del Bailo, Crdoba.The Andalusian festivals provide a showcase for popular arts and traditional costume. Among the most famous of these are the Fair or Feria de Abril in Seville, now echoed by smaller fairs in Madrid and Barcelona, both of which have many Andalusian immigrants; the de Agosto in Mlaga; the de Jerez or Feria del Caballo in Jerez; the Festival of Corpus Christi in Granada; the de Nuestra Seora de la Salud in Crdoba; the Festivals (Fiestas Colombinas) in Huelva; the de la Virgen del Mar in Almera; and the Feria de San Lucas in Jan, among many others.Festivals of a religious nature are a deep Andalusian tradition and are met with great popular fervor. There are numerous major festivals during Week. An annual pilgrimage brings a million visitors to the Hermitage of El Roco in Almonte (population 16,914 in 2008); similarly large crowds visit the Santuario de Nuestra Seora de la Cabeza in Andjar every April.Other important festivals are the of Cdiz and the de las Cruces or de mayo in Granada and Crdoba; in Crdoba this is combined with a competition for among the patios (courtyards) of the city.Andalusia hosts an annual festival for the dance of Flamenco in the summer-time.CuisineFile:Tomato gazpacho.jpg|thumb|Gazpacho served with tropezones (chopped vegetables).The Andalusian diet varies, especially between the coast and the interior, but in general is a diet based on oil, cereals, legumes, vegetables, fish, fruits and nuts, and meat; there is also a great tradition of drinking wine.()fishpescato fritoand seafood are common on the coast and also eaten well into the interior under coastal influence. bluefin tuna (Thunnus thynnus) from the Almadraba areas of the of Cdiz, prawns from de Barrameda (known as langostino de Sanlcar), and Rose Shrimp (Parapenaeus longirostris) from Huelva are all highly prized. Fishing for the Transparent Goby or Chanquete (minuta), a once-popular small fish from Mlaga, is now banned because the techniques used to catch them trap too many immature fish of other species.(Resolucin del 20 de junio de 1988 de la Direccin General de Pesca, por la que se establece una pesca indefinida para la pesca del Aphia minuta (chanquete) y similares (BOJA n57 de 19 de julio de 1988).) File:Jamn de Huelva.jpg|thumb|left|The name Jamn de Huelva is protected as a de Origen.The mountainous regions of the Sierra Morena and Sierra Nevada produce cured hams, notably including serrano and ibrico. These come from two different types of pig, (jamn serrano from white pigs, the more expensive jamn ibrico from the Iberian pig. There are several Denominaciones de Origen, each with its own specifications including in just which microclimate region ham of a particular denomination must be cured. alpujarreo is another mountain specialty, a dish combining ham, sausage, sometimes other pork, egg, potatoes, and olive oil.Confectionery is popular in Andalusia. Almonds and honey are common ingredients. Many enclosed convents of nuns make and sell pastries, especially Christmas pastries: mantecados, polvorones, pestios, alfajores, de San Leandro, as well as churros or tejeringos, meringue cookies (merengadas), and amarguillos.Cereal-based dishes include migas de harina in eastern Andalusia (a bit closer to a porridge than what migas means elsewhere in Spain) and a sweeter, more aromatic porridge called pole in western Andalusia.Vegetables form the basis of such dishes as alborona (similar to ratatouille) and the chopped salad known as pipirrana or piriaca. Hot and cold soups based in olive oil, garlic, bread, tomato and peppers include gazpacho, salmorejo, antequerana, caliente, campera, orusing almonds instead of tomatoajoblanco.()Wine has a privileged place at the Andalusian table. Andalusian wines are known worldwide, especially wines such as sherry (jerez), aged in soleras. These are enormously varied; for example, dry sherry may be the very distinct fino, manzanilla, amontillado, oloroso, or Cortado and each of these varieties can each be sweetened with Ximnez or Moscatel to produce a different variety of sweet sherry.()() Besides sherry, Andaluca has five other Denominaciones de Origen for wine: Condado de Huelva, Manzanilla-Sanlcar de Barrameda, D.O. Mlaga, Montilla-Moriles, and D.O. Sierras de Mlaga.(For greater specificity on the Denominaciones de Origen, see M.A.P.A., in Spanish.) Most Andalusian wine comes from one of these regions, but there are other historic wines without a Geographical Status, for example de Rota, Pajarete, de Chipiona and de Umbrete. Andalusia also produces D.O. vinegar and brandy: Vinagre de Jerez and Brandy de Jerez.(Other TraditionsThe traditional dress of 18th century Andalusia was strongly influenced by majismo within the context of casticismo (purism, traditionalism, authenticity). The archetype of the majo and maja was that of a bold, pure Spaniard from a lower-class background, somewhat flamboyant in his or her style of dress. This emulation of lower-class dress also extended to imitating the clothes of brigands and Romani (Gypsy) women.The of Arts and Traditions of Sevilla  has collected representative samples of a great deal of the history of Andalusian dress, including examples of such notable types of hat as the cordobs, calas, de catite and the pavero, as well as the corto and de flamenca.Andalusia has a great artisan tradition in tile, leather (see cordovan), weaving (especially of the heavy jarapa cloth), marquetry, and ceramics (especially in Jan, Granada, and Almera), lace (especially Granada and Huelva), embroidery (in Andvalo), ironwork, woodworking, and basketry in wicker, many of these traditions a heritage of the long period of Muslim rule.()Andalusian equestrianism, institutionalized in the Andalusian School of Equestrian Art is known well beyond the borders of Spain. The horse is strongly built, compact yet elegant, distinguished in the area of dressage and jumping, and is also an excellent horse for driving. They are known for their elegant dancing gait.(Real Escuela Andaluza de Arte Ecuestre, official site.) Sports Team sportsIn Andalusia, as throughout Spain, football is the predominant sport. Introduced to Spain by British men who worked in mining for Rio Tinto in the province of Huelva, the sport soon became popular with the local population. A Spains oldest existing soccer club, de Huelva, founded 1889, is known as El Decano (the Dean).()As of 2009, four Andalusian teams compete in Spains First Division Liga: Almera, FC, Betis, CD, and CF. Of those, only Sevilla FC has ever won La Liga (in the 19451946 season) or an international competition (the UEFA Super Cup).()(2006: Sevilla win big in Monaco, 25 August 2006, UEFA.com. Accessed 2009-12-17.) Four more are in Spains Second Division Liga Adelante: CF, CF, and de Huelva; all have been in the first division at one time or another.The autonomous football team is not in any league, and plays only friendly matches. In recent years, they have played mostly during the Christmas break of the football leagues. They play mostly against national teams from other countries, but would not be eligible for international league play, where Spain is represented by a single national team.In recent decades, basketball has become increasingly popular, with Mlaga (also known as Unicaja Mlaga, who have won the ACB in 2007 and the Cup in 2001 and usually play the Euroleague), Sevilla (Cajasol), and Granada competing at the top level in the ACB.(For a detailed history of basketball in Andalucia, see: )Unlike basketball, handball has never really taken off in Andalusia. There are two Andalusian teams in the Liga Asobal, Spains premier handball league: Antequera and Ciudad de Almera (Keymare Almera). Neither has a following or media coverage comparable to football or basketball, and neither is a national contender.Andalusias strongest showing in sports has been in Pong. There are two professional teams: Priego TM and Granada TM, the latter being Spains leading table tennis team, with more than 20 league championships in nearly consecutive years and 14 consecutive Copas del Rey, dominating the ENEB. Cajasur is also one of the leagues leading teams.(LIGAS NACIONALES / Liga Arteal Ventanas Superdivisin Masculina, Real Federacin Espaola de Tenis de Mesa, accessed 2009-12-17 cites for the current prominent status of these teams.) Olympics220 Andalusian athletes have competed in a total of 16 summer or winter Games. The first was Sinz de la Maza, part of the silver-medal-winning polo team at the Summer Olympics in Antwerp, Belgium. In all, Andalusians have won 6 gold medals, 11 silver, and 2 bronze. Winners of multiple medals include the Cordoban boxer Lozano (bronze in the Summer Olympics at Georgia, USA and silver in the Summer Olympics in Sydney, Australia); sailor Zabell, Malaguea by adoption (gold medals at Barcelona in 1992 and Atlanta in 1996). Other notable winners have been Granadan tennis player Orantes (silver in the mens singles of the demonstration tournament in Cityin 1968), Jerezano riders Rambla and Soto (silver in dressage in Athens in 2004) and the racewalker Fernndez from Guadix (silver in Athens in 2004). The largest number of Olympic appearances were by the Malaguea swimmer Pelez (five appearances), the Granadan skier Jos Rienda (four), the Sevillian rider Astolfi (four), and the Sevillian rower Climent Huerta (four, including a silver at Angeles, California, USA in 1984.()Seville has been a pre-candidate to host the Summer Olympics in two occasions, 2004 and 2008, and Granada has been a pre-candidate to host the winter Olympics; neither has ever succeeded in its candidature.Other sportsOther sporting events in Andalusia include surfing, kitesurfing and windsurfing competitions at Tarifa, various golf tournaments at courses along the coast, and racing and polo at several locations in the interior. Andalusia hosted the World Championships in Athletics (Seville), the Mediterranean Games (Almera) and the Alpine World Ski Championships 1996 (Granada), among other major events. There is also the annual a Andaluca bicycle road race and the chess tournament. Sister region Andalusia has a sister region relationship with Aires, Argentina since 2001.(Hermanamientos de la Ciudad Autnoma de Buenos Aires, official site of Buenos Aires.)See also* people* of Andalusians* Spanish* nationalism* of Andalusia* cuisine* Flamenco* Towns of Andalusia* Roman Btica RouteReferencesNotes Maps & Information of Southern SpainInteresting facts on Southern SpainExternal links* Official portal* Official Tourism Website of Andalusia* Official website for Culture in Andalusia Tertulia Andaluza* Andalusia Events - Organization of Events & Activities in Andalusia - Spainkbd:af:Andalusials:Andalusienar:an:Andalucaroa-rup:Andalucafrp:Andalosieast:Andalucaaz:Andalusiyabn:zh-min-nan:Andalucabe:be-x-old:bs:Andaluzijabr:Andalouziabg:ca:Andalusiacs:Andalusiecy:Andalucada:Andalusiende:Andalusienet:Andaluusiael:es:Andalucaeo:Andaluzioext:Andaluziaeu:Andaluziafa:fo:Andalusiafr:Andalousiefy:AndalsjeAndalisgv:Andalucagd:Andalusiagl:Andalucaglk:got:/Wandalitjahy:hi:hr:Andaluzijaio:Andaluziaid:Andalusiaia:Andalusiaos:is:Andalsait:Andalusiahe:jv:Andalusiapam:Andalusiaka:kw:Andalousisw:Andalusia(herm)lad:Andaluziyakrc:la:Vandalitialv:Andalzijalb:Andalusienlt:Andalzijahu:Andalziamk:mi:Andalusiamr:arz:ms:Andalusianah:Andalucanl:Andalusija:pih:Andalusiano:Andalucann:Andalucanov:Andalucaoc:Andalosiapnb:pms:Andalusapl:Andaluzjapt:Andaluziaro:Andaluziarmy:Andalusiyaqu:Andalusiyaru:stq:Andalusienscn:Andalusiasimple:Andalusiask:Andalziasr:sh:Andaluzijafi:Andalusiasv:Andalusientl:Andalucaroa-tara:Andalusiatet:Andaluziath:(zerk topluluk)uk:ug:Andalusiyevec:Andalusavi:Andalusiawar:Andalucazh:
2833
Abitibi
Abitibi may refer to:* Canyon, Ontario, community adjacent to the Abitibi Canyon Generating Station* Canyon Generating Station, Canadian hydroelectric power plant* Abitibi-Tmiscamingue (Canada), a region of Quebec* AbitibiBowater, a pulp and paper manufacturing company:Abitibi-Consolidated, the company that merged with Bowater to create AbitibiBowater* AbitibiTmiscamingue (Canada), a federal electoral district* AbitibiBaie-JamesNunavikEeyou (Canada), a former federal electoral district* Abitibi, a former Quebec provincial electoral district* County, Quebec (Canada), an historical county* Regional County Municipality, Quebec (Canada)* River (Canada)* Abitibi (Canada)* The Abitibi (train), a Via Rail passenger train in Quebec* Eskimos, a junior A hockey club based in Iroquois Falls, Ontario, playing in the Northern Ontario Junior Hockey League* gold belt, a gold mining region spanning the border of Ontario and Quebecde:Abitibi(homonymie)gl:Abitibihr:Abitibi(desambiguao)sh:Abitibisv:Abitibi
2862
AI-complete
In the field of intelligence, the most difficult problems are informally known as AI-complete or AI-hard, implying that the difficulty of these computational problems is equivalent to solving the central artificial intelligence problemmaking computers as intelligent as people, or AI.(Shapiro, Stuart C. (1992). Artificial Intelligence In Stuart C. Shapiro (Ed.), Encyclopedia of Artificial Intelligence (Second Edition, pp. 54&ndash;57). New York: John Wiley. (Section 4 is on AI-Complete Tasks.))  To call a problem AI-complete reflects an attitude that it would not be solved by a simple specific algorithm.  AI-complete problems are hypothesised to include vision, language understanding, and dealing with unexpected circumstances while solving any real world problem.With current technology, AI-complete problems cannot be solved by computer alone, but also require computation.  This property can be useful, for instance to test for the presence of humans as with CAPTCHAs, and for security to circumvent attacks.(Luis von Ahn, Manuel Blum, Nicholas Hopper, and John Langford. CAPTCHA: Using Hard AI Problems for Security. In Proceedings of Eurocrypt, Vol. 2656 (2003), pp. 294-311.)(Richard Bergmair. Natural Language Steganography and an AI-complete Security Primitive. January 7, 2006. (unpublished?))HistoryThe term was coined by Montalvo by analogy with NP-complete and NP-hard in complexity theory, which formally describes the most famous class of difficult problems.(.) Early uses of the term are in Erik Muellers 1987 Ph.D. dissertation(Mueller, Erik T. (1987, March). Daydreaming and Computation (Technical Report CSD-870017) Ph.D. dissertation, University of California, Los Angeles. (Daydreaming is but one more AI-complete problem: if we could solve any one artificial intelligence problem, we could solve all the others, p. 302)) and in Eric Raymonds 1991 File.(Raymond, Eric S. (1991, March 22). Jargon File Version 2.8.1 (Definition of AI-complete first added to jargon file.))AI-complete problemsAI-complete problems are hypothesised to include:*vision (and subproblems such as recognition)*language understanding (and subproblems such as mining, translation, and sense disambiguation)*Dealing with unexpected circumstances while solving any real world problem, whether its navigation or planning or even the kind of reasoning done by systems.Machine translationTo translate accurately, a machine must be able to understand the text. It must be able to follow the authors argument, so it must have some ability to reason. It must have extensive world knowledge so that it knows what is being discussed  it must at least be familiar with all the same commonsense facts that the average human translator knows. Some of this knowledge is in the form of facts that can be explicitly represented, but some knowledge is unconscious and closely tied to the human body: for example, the machine may need to understand how an ocean makes one feel to accurately translate a specific metaphor in the text. It must also model the authors goals, intentions, and emotional states to accurately reproduce them in a new language. In short, the machine is required to have wide variety of human intellectual skills, including reason, knowledge and the intuitions that underlie motion and manipulation, perception, and social intelligence. translation, therefore, is believed to be AI-complete: it may require AI to be done as well as humans can do it.Software brittlenessAI systems can solve very simple restricted versions of AI-complete problems, but never in their full generality. When AI researchers attempt to scale up their systems to handle more complicated, real world situations, the programs tend to become excessively brittle without knowledge or a rudimentary understanding of the situation: they fail as unexpected circumstances outside of its original problem context begin to appear.  When human beings are dealing with new situations in the world, they are helped immensely by the fact that they know what to expect: they know what all things around them are, why they are there, what they are likely to do and so on. They can recognize unusual situations and adjust accordingly. A machine without AI has no other skills to fall back on.()Formalisationcomplexity theory deals with the relative computational difficulty of functions.  By definition it does not cover problems whose solution are unknown or have not been characterised formally.  Since many AI problems have no formalisation yet, conventional complexity theory does not allow the definition of AI-completeness.To address this problem, a complexity theory for AI has been proposed.(Dafna Shahaf and Eyal Amir (2007) Towards a theory of AI completeness. Commonsense 2007,  8th International Symposium on Logical Formalizations of Commonsense Reasoning.) It is based on a of computation that splits the computational burden between a computer and a human: one part is solved by computer and the other part solved by human.  This is formalised by a human-assisted machine.  The formalisation defines algorithm complexity, problem complexity and reducibility which in turn allows classes to be defined.The complexity of executing an algorithm with a human-assisted Turing machine is given by a pair \langle\Phi_{H},\Phi_{M}\rangle, where the first element represents the complexity of the humans part and the second element is the complexity of the machines part.ResultsThe complexity of solving the following problems with a human-assisted Turing machine is:(* character recognition for printed text: \langle O(1), poly(n) \rangle * test:** for an n-sentence conversation where the oracle remembers the conversation history (persistent oracle): \langle O(n), O(n) \rangle ** for an n-sentence conversation where the conversation history must be retransmitted: \langle O(n), O(n^2) \rangle ** for an n-sentence conversation where the conversation history must be retransmitted and the person takes linear time to read the query\langle O(n^2), O(n^2) \rangle * game: \langle O(n), O(n) \rangle * Image labelling (based on the protocol): \langle O(n), O(n) \rangle * Image classification: human only: \langle O(n), O(n) \rangle , and with less reliance on the human: \langle O(\log n), O(n \log n) \rangle .See also*ASR-complete*of open problems in computer science*intelligenceReferences(bg:AI-completefr:IA-completit:IA-completoja:AI
2928
Association_for_Computing_Machinery
The Association for Computing Machinery (ACM) is a society for computing. It was founded in 1947 as the worlds first scientific and educational computing society.  Its membership is more than 92,000 as of 2009.  Its headquarters are in York City.Activitiesthumb|right|altStreet view of top half of skyscraper against the sky; its outside is dominated by vertical black and white lines|Two Penn Plaza site of the ACM headquarters in New York CityACM is organized into over 170 local chapters and 35 Interest Groups (SIGs), through which it conducts most of its activities.  Additionally, there are over 500 college and university chapters. The first student chapter was founded in 1961 at the of Louisiana at Lafayette.Many of the SIGs, like SIGGRAPH, SIGPLAN, SIGCSE and SIGCOMM, sponsor regular conferences which have become famous as the dominant venue for presenting new innovations in certain fields.  The groups also publish a large number of specialized journals, magazines, and newsletters.ACM also sponsors other computer science related events such as the worldwide International Collegiate Programming Contest (ICPC), and has sponsored some other events such as the chess match between Kasparov and the Deep Blue computer.ServicesACM Press publishes a prestigious academic journal,of the ACM, and general magazines for computer professionals, of the ACM (also known as Communications or CACM) and Queue.  Other publications of the ACM include:*ACM XRDS, formally Crossroads and renamed and designed in 2010, the most popular student computing magazine in the US.*ACM interactions, an interdisciplinary HCI publication focused on the connections between experiences, people and technology, and the third largest ACM publication. (http://doi.acm.org/10.1145/1897239.1897240)(http://delivery.acm.org/10.1145/1900000/1897240/p5-wakkary.html?ip67.34.143.195&CFID44596637&CFTOKEN44967240&__acm__1316999391_2787abbb2aacb2555d1377d1e08471e5)*A number of journals, specific to subfields of computer science, titled ACM Transactions.  Some of the more prominent transactions include:**Transactions on Computer Systems (TOCS)**Transactions on Database Systems (TODS)**Transactions on Graphics (TOG)**Transactions on Mathematical Software (TOMS)**Transactions on Programming Languages and Systems (TOPLAS)Although Communications no longer publishes primary research, and is not considered a prestigious venue, many of the great debates and results in computing history have been published in its pages.ACM has made almost all of its publications available to paid subscribers online at its Digital Library and also has a Guide to Computing Literature. Individual members additionally have access to Books Online and Books24x7. The ACM also offers insurance, online courses, and other services to its members.Digital LibraryThe ACM Digital Library, a part of the Portal, contains a comprehensive archive of the organizations journals, magazines, and conference proceedings.  Online services include a forum called Ubiquity and Tech News digest.ACM requires the copyright of all submissions to be assigned to the organization as a condition of publishing the work.(ACM Copyright Policy)  Authors may post the documents on their own websites, but they are required to link back to the digital librarys reference page for the paper.  Though authors are not allowed to charge for access to copies of their work, downloading a copy from the ACM site requires a paid subscription.CompetitionACMs primary historical competitor has been the Computer Society, which is the largest subgroup of the of Electrical and Electronics Engineers.  The IEEE focuses more on hardware and standardization issues than theoretical science, but there is considerable overlap with ACMs agenda.  They occasionally cooperate on projects like developing computing curricula.()  Some of the major awards in science are given jointly by ACM and the IEEE-CS.(See, e.g., Kennedy Award)There is also a mounting challenge to the ACMs publication practices coming from the open access movement.  Some authors see a centralized peer-review process as less relevant and publish on their home pages or on unreviewed sites like arXiv.  Other organizations have sprung up which do their peer review entirely free and online, such as Journal of Artificial Intelligence Research (JAIR), Journal of Machine Learning Research (JMLR) and the of Research and Practice in Information Technology.Membership gradesIn addition to student and regular members, ACM has several advanced membership grades to recognize those with multiple years of membership and demonstrated performance that sets them apart from their peers.(ACM Senior Members-An Overview)FellowsThe ACM Fellows Program was established by Council of the Association for Computing Machinery in 1993 to recognize and honor outstanding ACM members for their achievements in computer science and information technology and for their significant contributions to the mission of the ACM.There are presently about 500 Fellows(List of ACM Fellows) out of about 60,000 professional members.Other membership gradesIn 2006 ACM began recognizing two additional membership grades. Senior Members have ten or more years of membership and demonstrated performance.  Distinguished Engineers and Distinguished Scientists have at least 15 years of membership who have made a significant impact on the computing field.ChaptersACM has three kinds of chapters: Interest Groups(), Professional Chapters, and Student Chapters.()Special Interest Groups* SIGACCESS: Accessible Computing* SIGACT: Algorithms and Computation Theory* SIGAda: Ada Programming Language* SIGAPP: Applied Computing* SIGARCH: Computer Architecture* SIGART: Artificial Intelligence* SIGBED: Embedded Systems* SIGCAS: Computers and Society* SIGCHI: Computer-Human Interaction* SIGCOMM: Data Communication* SIGCSE: Computer Science Education* SIGDA: Design Automation* SIGDOC: Design of Communication* SIGecom: Electronic Commerce* SIGEVO: Genetic and Evolutionary Computation* SIGGRAPH: Computer Graphics and Interactive Techniques* SIGIR: Information Retrieval* SIGITE: Information Technology Education* SIGKDD: Knowledge Discovery and Data Mining* SIGMETRICS: Measurement and Evaluation* SIGMICRO: Microarchitecture* SIGMIS: Management Information Systems* SIGMM: Multimedia* SIGMOBILE: Mobility of Systems, Users, Data and Computing* SIGMOD: Management of Data* SIGOPS: Operating Systems* SIGPLAN: Programming Languages* SIGSAC: Security, Audit, and Control* SIGSAM: Symbolic and Algebraic Manipulation* SIGSIM: Simulation and Modeling* SIGSOFT: Software Engineering* SIGSPATIAL: Spatial Information* SIGUCCS: University and College Computing Services* SIGWEB: Hypertext, Hypermedia, and WebProfessional ChaptersAs of 2011, ACM has professional chapters in 56 countries.(Professional Chapters http://campus.acm.org/public/chapters/geo_listing/index.cfm?ctProfessional&inus0)These chapters include:* Baltimore ACM Chapter (BACM): official website* Boston Greater Boston Chapter of the ACM (GBCACM): official website* of Columbia ACM Chapter (DCACM): official websiteStudent ChaptersAs of 2011, there exist ACM student chapters in 38 different countries.(Student Chapters http://campus.acm.org/public/chapters/geo_listing/index.cfm?ctStudent&inus0)These chapters include:* Institute of Technology Mesra (BIT-ACM): blog* Institute of Technology and Science (BITS-ACM)* University: website* State University, Long Beach (CSULBACM): official website* State University, Sacramento (CSUSACM): official website* of Engineering, Guindy, Anna University (AU CEG ACM)* University (ACSU), official website* Institute of Technology (GTACM) official website* Institute of Technology, Delhi ACM@IITD : Website* Hopkins University (JHUACM): official website* State University (ACM@LSU): official website* Jersey Institute of Technology: official website* College: Official website* State University: official website* University: official website* College of Technology (PSG Tech ACM) : official website* Vallabhbhai National Institute of Technology, Surat: official Website* Illinois University Carbondale: official website* at Buffalo (UB ACM): official website* of Alabama in Huntsville: official website* of California, Los Angeles (UCLA ACM): official website* of California, San Diego (CSES): official website* of California, Santa Barbara (UCSB ACM): official website* of California, Santa Cruz (UCSC ACM): official website* of Illinois, Chicago (UIC ACM): official website* of Illinois, Urbana-Champaign (UIUC ACM): official website* of Iowa: official website* of Minnesota Twin Cities (UofM): official website* of the Philippines (UPACM): official website* of Tehran (UTACM): Website* of Texas, Austin (UTACM): official website* Ulm: official website* Institute of Technology, Mumbai* Washington University (WWU ACM): official website* Polytechnic Institute (WPIACM): official website* Chavan College of Engineering (YCCE): official websiteConferencesThe ACM sponsors numerous conferences listed below.  Most of the special interest groups also have an annual conference.  ACM conferences are often very popular publishing venues and are therefore very competitive.  For example, the 2007 SIGGRAPH conference attracted about 30000 visitors, and CIKM only accepted 15% of the long papers that were submitted in 2005.* CHI: on Human Factors in Computing Systems* CIKM: on Information and Knowledge Management(http://www.cikmconference.org/)* DAC: Automation Conference* FCRC: Computing Research Conference* GECCO: and Evolutionary Computation Conference(http://www.sigevo.org/gecco-2009/)* SIGGRAPH: Conference on Computer Graphics and Interactive Techniques* Hypertext: on Hypertext and Hypermedia(http://www.ht2009.org/)* JCDL: Conference on Digital Libraries(http://www.jcdl.org/)* OOPSLA: on Object-Oriented Programming, Systems, Languages, and Applications* WWW: Wide Web ConferenceThe ACM is a co-presenter and founding partner of the Grace Hopper Celebration of Women in Computing (GHC) with the Borg Institute for Women and Technology.()LeadershipThe President of the ACM for 2010&ndash;2012(ACM Elects New Leaders Committed to Expanding International Initiatives) is Chesnais, a French citizen living in Toronto where he runs his company named Visual Transitions. He is the successor of Hall of the of Southampton.ACM is led by a Council consisting of the President, Vice-President, Treasurer, Past President, SIG Governing Board Chair, Publications Board Chair, three representatives of the SIG Governing Board, and seven Members-At-Large.  This institution is often referred to simply as Council in Communications of the ACM.InfrastructureACM has five Boards that make up various committees and subgroups, to help Headquarters staff maintain quality services and products. These boards are as follows:# Publications Board# SIG Governing Board# Education Board# Membership Services Board# Professions BoardACM-W: Association for Computing Machinery Committee on WomenACM-W, the ACMs committee on in computing, is set up to support, inform, celebrate, and work with women in computing. Dr. Borg was a great supporter of ACM-W. ACM-W provides various resources for women in computing as well as high school girls interested in the field. ACM-W also reaches out internationally to those women who are involved and interested in computing.See also* Classification Scheme* of Information Technology Professionals* Galler, former president* Presidents of the Association for Computing Machinery* science* Computing* Berkeley, co-founder* Franz Alt, former president* Murray Hopper Award, awarded by the ACM* Kennedy Award, awarded by ACM and the Computer Society* of computing 2400 BC1949* AwardReferencesExternal links* * ACM portal for publications* ACM Digital Library for Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machinery for Computing Machineryko:ACMfor Computing Machineryid:ACMfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machinery for Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryth:for Computing Machineryfor Computing Machineryzh-yue:zh:
3055
Accrington
 shire_countyLancashireAccrington is a town in Lancashire, within the borough of Hyndburn. It lies about  east of Blackburn,  west of Burnley,  north of city centre and is situated on the mostly culverted Hyndburn. The town has a population of 35,203 according to the 2001 census and the urban area has a population of over 70,000.The town is a former centre of the cotton and textile machinery industries. The town is famed for manufacturing the hardest and densest building bricks in the world, The Accrington NORI (iron), which were used in the construction of the State Building and for the foundations of Tower; famous for its football team and for having Europes largest collection of Glass.Accrington is commonly abbreviated by locals to Accy.() History The name Accrington appears to be Anglo-Saxon in origin. Its derivation is uncertain. In the records it variously appears as Akarinton in 1194; Akerunton, Akerinton and Akerynton in 1258; Acrinton in 1292; Ackryngton in 1311 and Acryngton in 1324.()The name may mean acorn farmstead from Anglo-Saxon cern meaning acorn and tun meaning farmstead or village.( The southern part of Accrington, the township of New Accrington, was formerly in the Forest of Blackburnshire and the presence of oak trees may be inferred from local place names like Broad Oak and Oak Hill. The products of oak trees were once an important food for swine and a farmstead may have been named for such produce.( Anglo-Saxon  cerntun might become English Akerenton, Akerinton and the like.( Also worth considering is that in the Lancashire dialect  acorn was akran.()There is no known Old English personal name from which the first element can be derived. But if the Frisian names Akkrum, Akkeringa and Dutch name Akkerghem, are derived from the personal name Akker there may be a corresponding Old English name from which Accrington may be derived.(The town we now call Accrington covers two medieval townships; those of Old Accrington and New Accrington which were merged in 1878 with the incorporation of the borough council.() There have been settlements there since the medieval period, likely in the Grange Lane and Black Abbey area,(() and the Highway which passes above the town was at one time used by the kings and queens of England when they used the area for hunting when the Forest of Accrington was one of the four forests of the hundred of Blackburnshire. de Lacy gave the manor of Accrington to the monks of Kirkstall in the 12th century. The monks built a grange there; removing the inhabitants to make room for it. The locals got their revenge by setting fire to the new building, destroying its contents and in the process killing the three lay brothers who occupied it.( Regardless of whatever happened Accrington did not remain under monastic control for long before reverting back to the Lacys. It is thought the monks of Kirkstall may have built a small chapel there during their tenure for the convenience of those in charge residing there and their tenants, but the records are uncertain.( What is known is that there was a chapel in Accrington prior to 1553 ( where the vicar of Whalley was responsible for the maintenance of divine worship. However it did not have its own minister and it was served, when at all, by the curate of one of the adjacent chapels. In 1717 Accrington was served by the curate of Church, who preached there only once a month.( St. Jamess Church was built in 1763, replacing the old chapel( however it did not achieve parochial status until as late as 1870.(  Until around 1830 visitors considered Accrington to be just a considerable village.( The Revolution, however, resulted in large changes and Accringtons location on the confluence of a number of streams made it attractive to industry and a number of mills were built in the town in the mid-eighteenth century. Further industrialisation then followed in the late eighteenth century and local landowners began building mansions in the area on the outskirts of the settlement where their mills were located while their employees lived in overcrowded unsanitary conditions in the centre.(Industrialisation resulted in rapid population growth during the nineteenth century, as people moved from over north-west England to Accrington,() with the population increasing from 3,266 in 1811 to 10,376 in 1851 to 43,211 in 1901( to its peak in 1911 at 45,029.() This fast population growth and slow response from the established church allowed non-conformism to flourish in the town. By the mid-nineteenth century there were Wesleyan, Primitive Methodist, United Free Methodist, Congregationalist, Baptist, Swedenborgian, Unitarian, Roman Catholic and Catholic Apostolic churches in the town.( The Swedenborgian church was so grand that it was considered to be the Cathedral of that denomination.(For many decades the textiles industry, the engineering industry and coal mining were the central activities of the town. mills and dye works provided work for the inhabitants; but often in very difficult conditions. There was regular conflict with employers over wages and working conditions. On the 24th April 1826 over 1,000 men and women, many armed, gathered at Whinney Hill in Clayton-le-Moors to listen to a speaker from where they marched on Sykess Mill at Higher Grange Lane, near the site of the modern police station and Magistrates Courts, and smashed over 60 looms. These riots spread from Accrington through Oswaldtwistle, Blackburn, Darwen, Rossendale, Bury and Chorley. In the end after three days of riots 1,139 looms were destroyed, 4 rioters and 2 bystanders shot dead by the authorities in Rossendale and 41 rioters sentenced to death (all of whose sentences were commuted).()() In the 1842 plug riots  a strike spread from town to town due to conditions in the town. In a population of 9,000 people as few as 100 were fully employed.(An alarming statement of distress, the Newcastle Courant, 1 July 1842) From the 15th August 1842 the situation boiled over and bands of men entered the mills which were running and stopped the machinery by knocking out the boiler plugs. This allowed the water and steam to escape shutting down the mill machinery.()  Thousands of strikers walked over the hills from one town to another to persuade people to join the strike in civil disturbances that lasted about a week.(Riot in Accrington, the Preston Chronicle, 3 September 1842)(Disturbances in the Manufacturing Districts, the Liverpool Mercury, 19 August 1842) The strike was associated with the Chartist movement but eventually proved unsuccessful in its aims.(State of Trade, the Preston Chronicle, 12 November 1842)In the early 1860s the cotton famine badly affected Accrington, although less so than the wider area due to its more diverse economy,(The Distress in Lancashire, The Leeds Mercury, 25 October 1862) with as many as half of the towns mill employees out of work at one time.(State of Employment, The Preston Guardian, 3 December 1864)Conditions were such that a Local Board of Health was constituted in 1853 and the town itself incorporated in 1878 allowing the enforcement of local laws to improve the town.((A further wave of rioting hit the town in 1962 when local men and youths clashed with some of the Asian and Caribbean Commonwealth immigrants who had settled in the town since the late 1940s.() Accrington Pals One well-known association the town has is with the Pals, the nickname given to the smallest home town battalion of volunteers formed to fight in the first world war. The battalions were a peculiarity of the 1914-18 war: Lord Kitchener, the of State for War, believed that it would help recruitment if friends and work-mates from the same town were able to join up and fight together. Strictly speaking, the Accrington Pals battalion is properly known as the 11th Lancashire Regiment: the nickname is a little misleading, since of the four 250-strong companies that made up the original battalion only one was actually composed of men from Accrington. The rest volunteered from other east Lancashire towns such as Burnley, Blackburn and Chorley. The Pals first day of action, Saturday July 1, 1916, took place in Serre in the north of France. It was part of the Big Push (later known as the Battle of the Somme) that was intended to force the Army into a retreat from the Western Front, a line they had held since late 1914. The German defences in Serre were supposed to have been obliterated by sustained, heavy, British shelling during the preceding week; however, as the battalion advanced it met with fierce resistance. 235 men were killed and a further 350 wounded &mdash; more than half of the battalion &mdash; within half an hour. Similarly desperate losses were suffered elsewhere on the front, in a disastrous day for the British Army.Later in the year, the East Lancashire Regiment was rebuilt with new volunteers &mdash; in all, 865 Accrington men were killed during War I. All of these names are recorded on a war memorial, an imposing white stone cenotaph, which stands in Oak Hill Park in the south of the town. The cenotaph also lists the names of 173 local fatalities from War II.After War I and until 1986, Accrington Corporation buses were painted in the regimental colours of red and blue with gold lining. The mudguards were painted black as a sign of mourning.DemographyThe 2001 census gave the population of Accrington town as 35,203. The figure for the urban area was 71,224, up 1.1% from 70,442 in 1991. This total includes Accrington, Church, Clayton-le-Moors, Harwood and Oswaldtwistle. For comparison purposes that is approximately the same size as Aylesbury, Carlisle, Guildford or Scunthorpe urban areas.The borough of Hyndburn as a whole has a population of 81,496. This includes Accrington Urban Area and other outlying towns and villages such as; Altham, Baxenden, part of Belthorn, Huncoat, Rishton and Stanhill.EconomyThe town centre is home to a number of high street multiples, including: Farmfoods, Greggs, Argos, Specsavers, Wilkinsons, Zone, Superdrug, Coffee, Sports, Generator, Gamestation, GAME, Poundland, Timpson, Althams Travel, Ladbrokes, Power, Claires, Games, Post Office, Thomas Cook, Thomson, Burton, & Barrett, Perkins, Blockbuster, WHSmith, Samuel, Iceland, Carphone Warehouse, 4U, New Look, Cards, Opticians, Factory, Subway, Boots, Store Twenty One, Poundworld, Peacocks, Bargains, Wetherspoons and a mix of other shops. There is a Homebase, Asda, VUE as well as a Extra which opened on 22 November 2010. Discount supermarkets include; Lidl and Aldi.Fast-food restaurants include; McDonalds and KFC.As well as motor dealerships from Ford (Greyhound), Vauxhall & Chevrolet (Accrington Garages), the town was home to a Clark car dealer which closed down in 2010.The towns shopping centre is called the Accrington Centre.A retail park near the town centre, Eastgate Retail Park, has stores such as Bargains, United Carpets Woodfloor & Beds, Morrisons (formley Netto) and Poundstretcher.The main shopping street is called Broadway.Shell, Esso, Texaco (x2) and BP operate garages in the town.GeographyAccrington is a hill town located at the western edge of the Pennines within a bowl that is largely encircled by surrounding hills. Hill settlements origins were as the economic foci of the district engaging in the spinning and weaving of woolen cloth. Wool lead and coal were other local industries.TransportThe town has strong local travel links as railway station lies on the Lancashire Line serving trains running locally and trains running from Blackpool to York. However, recent changes to the train timetables have been a disservice to Accrington, increasing the journey time to Preston (a vital link to London or Scotland) by up to 1.5 hours. However, there are still buses to Manchester every thirty minutes as well as more frequent services to other towns in east Lancashire.  The main road running through the town centre is the A680 running from Rochdale to Whalley. The town is served by junction seven of the M65 and is linked from the A680 and the A56 carriageway which briefly merge; linking to the motorway heading towards Manchester. The closest airports are Airport at , Airport at  and Bradford Airport at .There was once a rail link south to Manchester via Haslingden and Bury, but this was closed in the 1960s as part of cuts following the Report. The trackbed from Accrington to Baxenden is now a linear treelined cycleway/footpath.The small minibus operator M & M Coaches and its main competitor Transdev United provide service in Accrington,() with routes to places such as Blackburn, Oswaldtwistle, Rishton, Burnley and Clitheroe.()SocialGovernanceAccrington is represented in parliament as a part of the constituency of Hyndburn. Note that the constituency boundaries do not align exactly with those of the district of the same name.Accrington was first represented nationally after the of Seats Act 1885 after the 1885 general election by (UK Parliament constituency). This seat was abolished in the 1983 general election and replaced with the present constituency of (UK Parliament constituency).Hyndburn consists of 16 wards of 35 councillors. Due to its size Accrington is represented by a number of wards in the Borough of Hyndburn. The town largely consists of the Milnshaw, Peel, Central, Barnfield and Spring Hill wards, although some parts of those wards are in other towns in the borough.Accrington became incorporated as a borough in 1878. Under the Government Act 1972, since 1974, the town has formed part of the larger Borough of Hyndburn including the former Districts of Oswaldtwistle, Church, Clayton-le-Moors, Harwood and Rishton.thumb|left|Accrington LibraryEducationThe schools of Accrington include:*St Christophers C of E High, a Church of England secondary school which holds specialist College status.*Academy, a specialist College* The Hollins Technology College*and Rossendale College, now named Across, is a further education college for 14-19 Year olds.*Carmel Roman Catholic High School, a secondary school serving the Catholic community of Hyndburn and those who support its ethos.The school holds specialist College status.Rhyddings Business and Enterprise High School, in nearby Oswaldtwistle, also serves the area.thumb|left|Accrington Acorn PHCC under constructionHealthThe local hospital is Accrington Victoria Hospital however, as it only deals with minor issues, A&E is provided by the Royal Blackburn Hospital. Other services are provided at the Accrington Pals Primary Health Care Centre and the Accrington Acorn Primary Health Care Centre. Some wards in Accrington rank amongst the most deprived in terms of healthcare and life expectancy in the country. According to the 1991 census 28% of houses in the borough were considered unfit, chiefly those in Accrington and Church. A current urban regeneration scheme, Elevate East Lancashire, is attempting to remedy these problems.MediaThe chief publications in the area are the Accrington Observer, part of MEN media, and the Lancashire Telegraph. Sports The towns other famous association is with Stanley F.C.,(Accrington Stanley F.C.) the butt of many (largely affectionate) jokes.  The clubs name is often invoked as a symbol of British sports legion of plucky but hopeless causes.The club entered the Football League in 1921 with the formation of the old Division (North); after haunting the lower reaches of English football for forty years, they eventually resigned from the League in 1962, due to financial problems, and folded in 1965. The club was reformed three years later and then worked its way through the non-league divisions to reach the Nationwide Conference in 2003. In the 2005&ndash;06 season, Stanley, after winning against Woking with 3 matches to spare, secured a place back in the Football League and the town celebrated with a small parade and honours placed on senior executives of the team. Coincidentally, one of the teams relegated&mdash;and thus being replaced by Stanley&mdash;were Oxford United, who were voted into the Football League to replace the previous Accrington Stanley. The football stadium is called the Crown Ground. Accrington is the smallest town in and Wales with a League club.(Towns Represented in League Two 2007-8)Accrington Stanley Football Club has officially had its own pub in the town, the Crown, since July 2007.(http://www.accringtonstanley.co.uk/index.php/commercial/crown Accringtonstanley.co.uk)The club was ridiculed during the 1980s with a milk advert on television, in which a young boy boasted that Rush had told him that if he didnt drink lots of milk, when he grew up, hed only be good enough to play for Accrington Stanley.(http://www.youtube.com/watch?vpieK7b4KLL4 Youtube.com)An earlier club, F.C., were one of the twelve founder members of the League in 1888. However, their time in league football was even less successful and considerably briefer than that of Accrington Stanley: they dropped out of the league in 1893 and folded shortly afterwards due to financial problems. The town of Accrington thus has the unique distinction of having lost two separate clubs from league football. Tiffany Glass The Haworth Art Gallery(Haworth Art Gallery) in Accrington contains an outstanding collection of glassware presented to the town by Joseph Briggs, an Accrington man who had joined Tiffanys in the late 19th century and eventually became art director and assistant manager. The Nouveau vases are considered to be the most important such group in Europe. One of the most striking items is a glass mosaic exhibition piece, designed by Briggs himself and entitled Sulphur Crested Cockatoos.RegenerationAccrington and the townships that make up the Borough are being gradually transformed by the ambitious regeneration plans, which are being put in place. One of the most important pieces of the regeneration jigsaw for the Borough is reviving Accrington town centre.  The town centre is a principal engine of economic revival not only for all communities across the Borough, but also for Pennine Lancashire.The Council recognized expert help was required to help shape what the town centre should look like over the next 1015 years and how to make this happen. The Council using funding from the Single Regeneration Budget appointed URBED (Urban, Built, Environment Design), consultants based in Manchester to help the Council, our partners and the local community develop a new vision for Accrington town centre. Notable residents *Anderson, singer with rock band Yes, was born there*Birtwistle, composer*Birtwistle, trade unionist*Duxbury, footballer, was born in the town*Fowler, cricketer, former England batsman, cricket coach and occasional pundit on BBC Radios Test Match Special*Andy Hargreaves, academic*Hesmondhalgh, actor, Cropper in the TV Soap Street*Entwistle, actor, Battersby in the TV Soap Street*Hill, long-distance and marathon runner*Hughes, World War I veteran, died in 2009, aged 108*David Lloyd, cricketer, now a pundit for Sports*Meg, astrologer, born in the town as Margaret Anne Lake in 1952*Ormerod, mining engineer and inventor of the Ormerod safety link for use in coal mines*Ramsbottom, professional cyclist*Steel, Got Talent finalist of 2009*Vickers, singer-songwriter, stage actress and fashion designer*Virtue, artist*Rex Whinfield, chemist, inventor of Terylene (polyester), the first completely synthetic fibre invented in UK*Winterson, author, Are Not the Only Fruit is an account of her childhood in the townSee also* & BulloughReferencesFurther reading*William Turner. Pals: the 11th (Service) Battalion (Accrington), East Lancashire Regiment. Barnsley, South Yorkshire: Pen & Sword, 1998. ISBN 978-0-85052-360-7 External links * Hyndburn Borough Council* Accrington Observer Local newspapers website* Accrington Web Accrington forum and town information* The Bee The local radio station* Its HYNDBURN Local news and information portal* Accrington Market Accrington Victorian Market Hall and Out Door Market* Accrington Moorhead Sports College* A 3D map of Accrington You can see the town of Accrington and parkingda:Accringtoneo:Accringtonfr:Accringtonid:Accringtonit:Accringtonlt:Akringtonasnl:Accringtonno:Accringtonnn:Accringtonpl:Accringtonro:Accringtonsimple:Accringtonsv:Accringtontr:Accringtonvo:Accringtonzh:
3120
Andersonville,_Georgia
footnotes                Andersonville is a city in Sumter County, Georgia, United States. The population was 331 at the 2000 census (174 in 1910). It is located in the southwest part of the state, about  southwest of Georgia on the of Georgia railroad. During the Civil War, it was the site of a camp which is now National Historic Site.Andersonville is part of the Americus Micropolitan Statistical Area.GeographyAndersonville is located at  (32.197008, 84.141701).According to the States Census Bureau, the city has a total area of , all of it land. History The little hamlet of Anderson was named for Mr. John Anderson who was a Director in the South Western Railroad at the time it was extended from Oglethorpe to Americus in 1853.  It was known as Anderson Station until the post office was established in November 1855 and the government changed the name of the station from Anderson to Andersonville in order to avoid confusion with the post office in Anderson, South Carolina.During the Civil War, the Confederate army established Camp Sumter to house incoming Union prisoners of war. The town served as a supply depot during the period,and it included a post office, a depot, a blacksmith shop and stable, a couple of general stores, two saloons, a school, a Methodist church, and about a dozen houses. (Ben Dykes, who owned the land on which the prison was built, was both depot agent and postmaster.)Until the establishment of the prison, the area was entirely dependent on agriculture, and, after the close of the prison, the town continued economically dependent on agriculture. The town changed very little over the years, until 1968 when the large scale mining of kaolin, bauxitic kaolin, and bauxite was begun by Mulcoa, Mullite Company of America, which turned  of scrub oak wilderness into a massive mining and refining operation. The company now ships more than 2000 tons of refined ore from Andersonville each week.In 1974, long-time mayor Lewis Easterlin and a group of concerned citizens decided to promote tourism in the town by turning the clock back and making Andersonville look much as it did during the American Civil War. Now today Andersonville welcomes tourists from all over the world who come for the history, museums, and to step back in time.DemographicsAs of the census of 2000, there were 331 people, 124 households, and 86 families residing in the city. The density was 254.1 people per square mile (98.3/km). There were 142 housing units at an average density of 109.0 per square mile (42.2/km). The racial makeup of the city was 65.26% white and 34.74% African American. 1.21% of the population were Hispanic or Latino.There were 124 households out of which 34.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 46.0% were married couples living together, 17.7% had a female householder with no husband present, and 30.6% were non-families. 26.6% of all households were made up of individuals and 10.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.67 and the average family size was 3.21.In the city the population was spread out with 27.8% under the age of 18, 9.4% from 18 to 24, 31.4% from 25 to 44, 19.3% from 45 to 64, and 12.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females there were 105.6 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.5 males.The median income for a household in the city was $29,107, and the median income for a family was $30,972. Males had a median income of $26,591 versus $20,000 for females. The capita income for the city was $15,168. About 19.8% of families and 23.0% of the population were below the line, including 29.3% of those under age 18 and 13.5% of those age 65 or over.Climate References External links*Official website of Andersonville, Georgia* AmericusGeorgia.net  Area info... by and for Andersonville Locals(Georgia)(Gorgie)Georgia(Georgia)Georgienl:Andersonvillept:Andersonvillevo:Andersonville
3229
Outback
Image:Yalgoo Shire.jpg|thumb|280px|A tourism sign post Western AustraliaImage:Dogfence.jpg|thumb|right||The Fence near PedyImage:Fitzgerald River National Park DSC04436.JPG|thumb|right|River National Park in Western AustraliaThe Outback is the vast, remote, arid area of Australia,  term colloquially can refer to any lands outside the main areas. The term the outback is generally used to refer to locations that are comparatively more remote than those areas named bush.OverviewThe outback is home to a diverse set of animal species, such as the kangaroo, emu and dingo. The Fence was built to restrict dingo movements into agricultural areas towards the south east of the continent. The marginally fertile parts are primarily utilised as rangelands and have been traditionally used for sheep or cattle grazing, on stations which are leased from the Federal Government. While small areas of the outback consist of clay soils the majority has exceedingly infertile palaeosols. Riversleigh, in Queensland, is one of Australias most renowned fossil sites and was recorded as a Heritage site in 1994. The  area contains fossil remains of ancient mammals, birds and reptiles of Oligocene and Miocene age.HistoryEarly European exploration of inland Australia was sporadic. More focus was on the more accessible and fertile coastal areas. The first party to successfully cross the Blue Mountains just outside Sydney was led by Blaxland in 1813, 25 years after the colony was established. People starting with Oxley in 1817, 1818 and 1821, followed by Sturt in 18291830 attempted to follow the westward-flowing rivers to find an inland sea, but these were found to all flow into the River and River which turn south.Over the period 1858 to 1861, McDouall Stuart led six expeditions north from Adelaide into the outback, culminating in successfully reaching the north coast of Australia and returning, without the loss of any of the partys members lives. This contrasts with the ill-fated and Wills expedition in 186061 which was much better funded, but resulted in the deaths of three of the four members of the transcontinental party.The Telegraph line was constructed in the 1870s along the route identified by Stuart, who had found enough water to support the needed repeater stations.Exploration of the outback continued in the 1950s when Beadell explored, surveyed and built many roads in support of the nuclear weapons tests at Field and Maralinga and rocket testing on the Prohibited Area. Mineral exploration continues as new mineral deposits are identified and developed.While the early explorers used horses to cross the outback, the first woman to make the journey riding a horse was Hingley, who rode from Broome to Cairns in 2006.(First woman conquers Outback)MiningOther than agriculture and tourism, the main economic activity in this vast and sparsely settled area is mining. Owing to the complete absence of mountain building and glaciation since the Permian (in many areas since the Cambrian) ages, the outback is extremely rich in iron, aluminium, manganese and uranium ores, and also contains major deposits of gold, nickel, iron, lead and zinc ores. Because of its size, the value of grazing and mining is considerable. Major mines and mining areas in the outback include opals at Coober Pedy, Lightning Ridge and White Cliffs, metals at Broken Hill, Tennant Creek, Olympic Dam and the remote Mine. Oil and gas are extracted in the Basin around Moomba.In Western Australia the diamond mine in the (Western Australia) is the worlds biggest producer of natural diamonds and contributes approximately one-third of the worlds natural supply. The Pilbara regions economy is dominated by mining and petroleum industries.(The Pilbaras oil and gas industry is the regions largest export industry earning $5.0 billion in 2004/05 accounting for over 96% of the States production. source  WA.gov.au) Most of Australias ore is also mined in the Pilbara and it also has one of the worlds major manganese mines, Woodie Woodie. Population Owing to the low and erratic rainfall over most of the outback, combined with soils which are usually not very fertile, inland Australia is relatively sparsely settled. More than 90 percent of Australians live in urban areas on the coast. However the outback and the history of its exploration and settlement provides Australians with a culturally valued backdrop, and stories of swagmen, squatters, and bushrangers are central to the national ethos. The song Matilda, which is about a swagman and squatters, is probably Australias best internationally known and most well-loved song.Aboriginal communities in outback regions have not been displaced as they have been in areas of intensive agriculture and large cities, in coastal areas. So a significant proportion of the countrys indigenous population lives in the Outback,(World Book Encyclopedia) in areas such as the Pitjantjatjara Yankunytjatjara lands in northern South Australia.MedicineImage:Outback.jpg|thumb|right|Flying over western South Wales. Near the bottom of the picture, a squiggly line appears; apparently, a creek created by recent rain.EducationIn most outback communities, the number of children is too small for a conventional school to operate. Children are educated at home by the of the Air. Originally the teachers communicated with the children via radio, but now satellite telecommunication is used instead.Some children attend boarding school, mostly only those in secondary school.TerminologyCulturally, many urban Australians have had very generalised terms for the otherwise complex range of environments that exist within the inland and tropical regions of the continent. Regional terminology can be very specific to specific locations in each mainland state.The concept of back country, which initially meant land beyond the settled regions, was in existence in 1800. Crossing of the Blue Mountains and other exploration of the inland however gave a different dimension to the perception. The term outback was first used in print in 1869, when the writer clearly meant west of Wagga Wagga, New South Wales.(Coupe, Sheena (ed.),  Frontier Country, Vol. 1, Weldon Russell Publishing, Willoughby, 1989, ISBN 1 875202 01 3)It is colloquially said that the outback is located beyond the Stump. The location of the black stump may be some hypothetical location or may vary depending on local custom and folklore. It has been suggested that the term comes from the Black Stump Wine Saloon that once stood about 10 kilometres out of New South Wales on the Gunnedah Road. It is claimed that the saloon, named after the nearby Black Stump Run and Black Stump Creek, was an important staging post for traffic to north-west New South Wales and it became a marker by which people gauged their journeys.()Image:West MacDonnell National Park.JPG|thumb|left|The MacDonnell Ranges in the Territory are found in the centre of the country.The Never-Never is a term referring to remoter parts of the Australian outback. The outback can be also referred to as back of beyond,  back o Bourke although these terms are more frequently used when referring to something a long way from anywhere, or a long way away. The well-watered north of the continent is often called the End and the arid interior The Red Centre, owing to its vast amounts of red soil and sparse greenery amongst its landscape.Wildlifethumb|100px|right|A Brumby in the OutbackThe Australian Outback is full of very well-adapted wildlife, although much of it may not be immediately visible to the casual observer.  Many animals, such as kangaroos and dingoes, hide in bushes to rest and keep cool during the heat of the day.Birdlife is prolific, most often seen at waterholes at dawn and dusk.  Huge flocks of budgerigars, cockatoos, corellas and galahs are often sighted. On bare ground or roads during the winter, various species of snakes and lizards bask in the sun, but they are rarely seen during the summer months.Feral animals such as camels thrive in central Australia, brought to Australia by the early Afghan drivers. Feral horses known as brumbies are station horses that have run wild.  Feral pigs, foxes, cats and rabbits are also imported animals that degrade the environment, so time and money is spent eradicating them in an attempt to help protect fragile rangelands.TourismFile:Coober-Pedy-Oodnadatta-4WD-Mail-Truck-In-The-Outback.JPG|thumb|The Pedy Oodnadatta One Day Mail Run OKA bus in the outback. The bus serves as a tour bus and mail carrier.Image:ISS007 Gosses Bluff.jpg|thumb|right|Bluff crater, one of a number of meteor craters that can be found across outback Australia.There are many popular tourist attractions in the outback. Some of the well known destinations include:*Springs, Northern Territory*Stockmans Hall of Fame*Queensland*Hill, New South Wales*Broome*Pedy, South Australia*Marbles*National Park*Western Australia*Tjuta (The Olgas)*Katherine Gorge*Kings Canyon (Watarrka)*Ranges*Mia*Isa, Queensland*Augustus National Park*Creek, Northern Territory*Uluru (Ayers Rock)*Lakes RegionVisitors to the outback often drive their own or rented vehicles, or take organised tours. Travel through remote areas on main roads is easily done and requires no planning.  However travel through very remote areas, on isolated tracks, requires planning and a suitable, reliable vehicle (usually a drive). On very remote routes considerable supplies and equipment may be required, this can include prearranged caches. It is not advisable to travel into these especially remote areas with a single vehicle, unless fully equipped with good communication technology (e.g. a satellite phone, EPIRB etc.).  Many visitors prefer to travel in these areas in a convoy. Deaths from tourists and locals becoming stranded on outback trips occasionally occur, sometime because insufficient water and food supplies were taken, or because people have walked away from their vehicle in search of help.  Travellers through very remote areas should always inform a reliable person of their route and expected destination arrival time, and remember that a vehicle is much easier to locate in an aerial search, than a person, so in the event of a breakdown, they must not leave their vehicle.Transportthumb|right|A road sign warning of potentially dangerous conditions ahead.The outback is criss-crossed by historic tracks. Most of the major highways have an excellent bitumen surface and other major roads are usually well-maintained dirt roads.  Tracks in very sandy or exceedingly rocky areas may require high-clearance four wheel drives and spare fuel, tyres, food and water before attempting to travel them, however most outback roads are easily traversed in ordinary vehicles, provided care is taken.  Drivers unused to dirt roads should be especially cautious  it is recommended that drivers reduce their speed, drive with extra care, and avoid driving at night because animals can stray on to roads.  Travelling in remote areas in northern Australia is not advisable during the wet season (November to April), as heavy tropical downpours can quickly make dirt roads impassable. In the remotest parts of Australia fuel sellers are located hundreds of kilometres apart, so spare fuel must be carried or refuelling spots calculated carefully in order not to run out of fuel in between towns. In addition, multiple trailer trucks (known as Road Trains) traverse these roads and extreme care must be taken when around these vehicles, due to their weight, length (often three full trailers long) and amount of dust thrown up by 46+ tyres.The Highway runs from north to south through the centre of the continent, roughly paralleled by the railway. There is a proposal to develop some of the roads running from the SW to the NE to create an all-weather road named the Highway, crossing the continent diagonally from Western Australia (north of Kalgoorlie, through the Northern Territory to Winton, in Queensland.Air transport is relied on for mail delivery in some areas, owing to sparse settlement and wet-season road closures.  Most outback mines have an airstrip and many have a fly-out workforce. Most outback stations and stations have an airstrip and quite a few have their own light plane. Medical and ambulance services are provided by the Flying Doctor Service. The of the Air is a radio-based school using the RFDS radios.* Track* Developmental Road* Stock Route* Track* Sue Highway* French Line* Highway* River Road* Central Road* Highway* Line* Road* Track* Highway* Track* Developmental Road* Highway* Road* Highway* Track* Track* Track* LineSee also*Australia*Country*outback literature of the 20th centuryReferencesFurther reading*Dwyer Andrew (2007) Outback - Recipes and Stories from the Campfire Miegunyah Press ISBN 978 0 522 85380 3* Read, Ian G.(1995) Australias central and western outback : the driving guide Crows Nest, N.S.W. Little Hills Press. Little Hills Press explorer guides ISBN 1863150617* Year of the Outback 2002, Western Australia Perth, W.A.External links*From this Broken Hill*Beautiful Australian Outback - slideshow by magazineca:Outbackda:Outbackde:Outbackes:Outbackeu:Outbackfr:Outbackko:it:Outbackhu:Outbacknl:Outbackja:nn:Outbackpt:Outbacksimple:Outbacksl:Outbacksv:Outback
3292
Brass
die, along with zinc and copper samples.Brass is an alloy of copper and zinc; the proportions of zinc and copper can be varied to create a range of brasses with varying properties.(Engineering Designer, v 30, n 3, MayJune 2004, 69) In comparison, bronze is principally an alloy of copper and tin.(Machinery Handbook, Industrial Press Inc, New York, Edition 24, p. 501) Bronze does not necessarily contain tin, and a variety of alloys of copper, including alloys with arsenic, phosphorus, aluminum, manganese, and silicon, are commonly termed bronze. The term is applied to a variety of brasses and the distinction is largely historical.() Brass is a alloy. It is used for decoration for its bright gold-like appearance; for applications where low friction is required such as locks, gears, bearings, doorknobs, ammunition, and valves; for plumbing and electrical applications; and extensively in musical instruments such as horns and bells for its acoustic properties. It is also used in zippers. Because it is softer than most other metals in general use, brass is often used in situations where it is important that sparks not be struck, as in fittings and tools around explosive gases.(OSH Answers: Non-sparking tools)Brass has a muted yellow color which is somewhat similar to gold. It is relatively resistant to tarnishing, and is often used as decoration and for coins. In antiquity, polished brass was often used as a mirror. Lead contentTo enhance the machinability of brass, lead is often added in concentrations of around 2%. Since lead has a lower point than the other constituents of the brass, it tends to migrate towards the grain boundaries in the form of globules as it cools from casting. The pattern the globules form on the surface of the brass increases the available lead surface area which in turn affects the degree of leaching. In addition, cutting operations can smear the lead globules over the surface. These effects can lead to significant lead leaching from brasses of comparatively low lead content.()Silicon is an alternative to lead; however, when silicon is used in a brass alloy, the scrap must never be mixed with leaded brass scrap because of contamination and safety problems.(Chase Brass & Copper Company, Inc)In October 1999 the California State Attorney General sued 13 key manufacturers and distributors over lead content. In laboratory tests, state researchers found the average brass key, new or old, exceeded the California Proposition 65 limits by an average factor of 19, assuming handling twice a day.(News & Alerts  California Dept. of Justice  Office of the Attorney General, October 12, 1999) In April 2001 manufacturers agreed to reduce lead content to 1.5%, or face a requirement to warn consumers about lead content. Keys plated with other metals are not affected by the settlement, and may continue to use brass alloys with higher percentage of lead content.(News & Alerts  California Dept. of Justice  Office of the Attorney General, April 27, 2001)(San Francisco Superior Court, People v. Ilco Unican Corp., et a. (No. 307102) and Mateel Environmental Justice Foundation v. Ilco Unican Corp., et al. (No. 305765))Also in California, lead-free materials must be used for each component that comes into contact with the wetted surface of pipes and pipe fittings, plumbing fittings and fixtures. On January 1, 2010, the maximum amount of lead in lead-free brass in California was reduced from 4% to 0.25% lead. The common practice of using pipes for electrical grounding is discouraged, as it accelerates lead corrosion.(AB 1953 Assembly Bill  Bill Analysis)(Requirements for Low Lead Plumbing Products in California, Fact Sheet, Department of Toxic Substances Control, State of California, February 2009)Corrosion-resistant brass for harsh environments The so called dezincification resistant (DZR or DR) brasses are used where there is a large corrosion risk and where normal brasses do not meet the standards. Applications with high water temperatures, chlorides present or deviating water qualities (water) play a role. DZR-brass is excellent in water boiler systems. This brass alloy must be produced with great care, with special attention placed on a balanced composition and proper production temperatures and parameters to avoid long-term failures. Germicidal/antimicrobial applications Main article: copper-alloy touch surfaces.See also: properties of copper, alloys in aquacultureThe copper in brass makes brass germicidal. Depending upon the type and concentration of pathogens and the medium they are in, brass kills these microorganisms within a few minutes to eight hours of contact.(EPA registers copper-containing alloy products, May 2008, http://www.epa.gov/opp00001/factsheets/copper-alloy-products.htm)(Michel, James H., Moran, Wilton, R., Michels, Harold T., and Estelle, Adam A., Antimicrobial copper displaces stainless steel, germs for medical applications: Alloys have natural germ-killing properties, Tube and Pipe Journal, June 2011, http://www.fma-communications.com/TPJ/)(Noyce, J.O., Michels, H., and Keevil, C.W., 2006, Potential use of copper surfaces to reduce survival of epidemic methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in the healthcare environment, Journal of Hospital Infection,  63, 289-297,www.elsevierhealth.com/journals/jhin and available online at www.sciencedirect.com)The bactericidal properties of brass have been observed for centuries and were confirmed in the laboratory in 1983.(Kuhn, Phyllis J., Ph.D., 1983, Doorknobs: A Source of Nosocomial Infection?, Diagnostic Medicine, http://members.vol.at/schmiede/MsgverSSt.html Doorknobs: A Source of Nosocomial Infection?) Subsequent experiments by research groups around the world reconfirmed the antimicrobial efficacy of brass, as well as copper and other copper alloys.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antimicrobial_copper-alloy_touch_surfaces)(EPA registers copper-containing alloy products, May 2008, http://www.epa.gov/opp00001/factsheets/copper-alloy-products.htm)(Michel, James H., Moran, Wilton, R., Michels, Harold T., and Estelle, Adam A., 2011, Antimicrobial copper displaces stainless steel, germs for medical applications: Alloys have natural germ-killing properties, Tube and Pipe Journal, June 2011, http://www.fma-communications.com/TPJ/)(Noyce, J.O., Michels, H., and Keevil, C.W., 2006, Potential use of copper surfaces to reducesurvival of epidemic methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in the healthcare environment, Journal of Hospital Infection, Vol. 63, 289-297, www.elsevierhealth.com/journals/jhin available online at www.sciencedirect.com) Extensive structural membrane damage to bacteria was noted after being exposed to copper.In 2007, Department of Defenses Telemedicine and Advanced Technologies Research Center (TATRC) began to study the antimicrobial properties of copper alloys, including four brasses (C87610, C69300, C26000, C46400) in a multi-site clinical hospital trial conducted at the Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center (New York City), the University of South Carolina, and the Ralph H. Johnson VA Medical Center (South Carolina).(http://www.biomedcentral.com/content/pdf/1753-6561-5-s6-o53.pdf and http://www.coppertouchsurfaces.org) Commonly-touched items, such as bed rails, over-the-bed tray tables, chair arms, nurses call buttons, IV poles, etc. were retrofitted with antimicrobial copper alloys in certain patient rooms (i.e., the coppered rooms) in the Care Unit (ICU). Early results disclosed in 2011 indicate that the coppered rooms demonstrated a 97% reduction in surface pathogens versus the non-coppered rooms. This reduction is the same level achieved by terminal cleaning regimens conducted after patients vacate their rooms. Furthermore, of critical importance to health care professionals, the preliminary results indicated that patients in the coppered ICU rooms had a 40.4% lower risk of contracting a acquired infection versus patients in non-coppered ICU rooms.(http://www.biomedcentral.com/content/pdf/1753-6561-5-s6-o53.pdf) (http://www.coppertouchsurfaces.org/press/releases/20110701.html)(World Health Organizations 1st International Conference on Prevention and Infection Control (ICPIC) in Geneva, Switzerland on July 1st, 2011) The U.S. Department of Defense investigation contract, which is ongoing, will also evaluate the effectiveness of copper alloy touch surfaces to prevent the transfer of microbes to patients and the transfer of microbes from patients to touch surfaces, as well as the potential efficacy of copper-alloy based components to improve air quality.In the U.S., the Protection Agency regulates the registration of antimicrobial products. After extensive antimicrobial testing according to the Agencys stringent test protocols, 355 alloys, including many brasses, were found to kill more than 99.9% of methicillin-resistant aureus (MRSA), E. coli O157:H7, aeruginosa, aureus, aerogenes, and vancomycin-resistant Enterococci (VRE) within two hours of contact.(EPA registers copper-containing alloy products, May 2008, http://www.epa.gov/opp00001/factsheets/copper-alloy-products.htm)(355 Copper Alloys Now Approved by EPA as Antimicrobial,Jun 28, 2011, http://www.appliancemagazine.com/news.php?article1498614&zone0&first1) Normal tarnishing was found to not impair antimicrobial effectiveness.Antimicrobial tests have also revealed significant reductions of MRSA as well as two strains of epidemic MRSA (EMRSA-1 and EMRSA-16) on brass (C24000 with 80% Cu) at room temperature (22 degrees Celsius) within three hours. Complete kills of the pathogens were observed within 4  hours. These tests were performed under wet exposure conditions. The kill timeframes, while impressive, are nevertheless longer than for pure copper, where kill timeframes ranged between 45 to 90 minutes.(Noyce, J.O., Michels, H., and Keevil, C.W., 2006, Potential use of copper surfaces to reduce survival of epidemic methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus in the healthcare environment, Journal of Hospital Infection, Vol.  63, 289-297, www.elsevierhealth.com/journals/jhin, available online at www.sciencedirect.com)A novel assay that mimics dry bacterial exposure to touch surfaces was developed because this test method is thought to more closely replicate real world touch surface exposure conditions.  In these conditions, copper alloy surfaces were found to kill several million Colony Forming Units of coli within minutes.(Esprito Santo, C., Taudte, N., Nies, D.H., Grass, G., 2008, Contribution of Copper Ion Resistance to Survival of Escherichia coli on Metallic Copper Surfaces, Applied and Environmental Microbiology, Feb 2008, pp. 977-986) This observation, and the fact that kill timeframes shorten as the percentage of copper in an alloy increases, is proof that copper is the ingredient in brass and other copper alloys that kills the microbes.(Michels, H.T., Wilks, S.A., Noyce, J.O., and Keevil, C.W., 2005, Copper Alloys for Human Infectious Disease Control, Materials Science and Technology Conference: Copper for the 21st Century Symposium, September 25-28, Pittsburgh, P.A.)The mechanisms of antimicrobial action by copper and its alloys, including brass, is a subject of intense and ongoing investigation.(Michel, James H., Moran, Wilton, R., Michels, Harold T., and Estelle, Adam A., 2011, Antimicrobial copper displaces stainless steel, germs for medical applications: Alloys have natural germ-killing properties, Tube and Pipe Journal, June 2011,  http://www.fma-communications.com/TPJ/)(Esprito Santo, Christopher, Taudte,  Nadine, Nies, Dietrich H.,  and Grass, Gregor, 2008, Contribution of copper ion resistance to survival of Escherichia coli on metallic copper surfaces, Appl. and Envir Micrbiol., Feb. 2008, p. 977986 )(Esprito Santo, Christopher et al., Bacterial Killing by Dry Metallic Copper Surfaces, Appl. and Envir Micrbiol., Feb. 2011, pp. 794802) It is believed that the mechanisms are multifaceted and include the following: 1) Potassium or glutamate leakage through the outer membrane of bacteria; 2) Osmotic balance disturbances; 3) Binding to proteins that do not require or utilize copper; 4) stress by peroxide generation.Research is being conducted at this time to determine whether brass, copper, and other copper alloys can help to reduce cross contamination in public facilities and reduce the incidence of infections (hospital acquired infections) in healthcare facilities.Also, due to its antimicrobial/algaecidal properties that prevent biofouling, in conjunction with its strong structural and corrosion-resistant benefits for marine environments, brass alloy netting cages are currently being deployed in commercial-scale aquaculture operations in Asia, South America, and the USA. (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copper_alloys_in_aquaculture)(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copper_alloys_in_aquaculture#Types_of_copper_alloys)(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fish_farming#Cage_system)Season crackingBrass is susceptible to corrosion cracking, especially from ammonia or substances containing or releasing ammonia. The problem is sometimes known as cracking after it was first discovered in brass cases used for rifle ammunition during the 1920s in the Army. The problem was caused by high stresses from cold forming of the cases during manufacture, together with chemical attack from traces of ammonia in the atmosphere. The cartridges were stored in stables and the ammonia concentration rose during the hot summer months, so initiating brittle cracks. The problem was resolved by annealing the cases, and storing the cartridges elsewhere.Brass types*Admiralty brass contains 30% zinc, and 1% tin which inhibits dezincification in many environments.*Aichs alloy typically contains 60.66% copper, 36.58% zinc, 1.02% tin, and 1.74% iron. Designed for use in marine service owing to its corrosion resistance, hardness and toughness. A characteristic application is to the protection of ships bottoms, but more modern methods of cathodic protection have rendered its use less common. Its appearance resembles that of gold.(A Dictionary of Alloys by E.N. Simons.)*Alpha brasses with less than 35% zinc, are malleable, can be worked cold, and are used in pressing, forging, or similar applications. They contain only one phase, with cubic structure. *Princes metal or Prince Ruperts metal is a type of alpha brass containing 75% copper and 25% zinc. Due to its beautiful yellow color, it is used as an imitation of gold.(National Pollutant Inventory  Copper and compounds fact sheet) The alloy was named after Rupert of the Rhine.*Alpha-beta brass (metal), also called duplex brass, is 3545% zinc and is suited for hot working. It contains both  and  phase; the -phase is cubic and is harder and stronger than . Alpha-beta brasses are usually worked hot.*Aluminium brass contains aluminium, which improves its corrosion resistance. It is used for seawater service(Material Properties Data: Aluminum Brass) and also in coins (gold).*Arsenical brass contains an addition of arsenic and frequently aluminium and is used for boiler fireboxes.*Beta brasses, with 4550% zinc content, can only be worked hot, and are harder, stronger, and suitable for casting.*Cartridge brass is a 30% zinc brass with good working properties. Used for ammunition cases.*Common brass, or rivet brass, is a 37% zinc brass, cheap and standard for cold working.*DZR brass is dezincification resistant brass with a small percentage of arsenic.*metal is the softest type of brass commonly available. An alloy of 95% copper and 5% zinc, gilding metal is typically used for ammunition jackets, e.g. full metal jacket bullets.*High brass contains 65% copper and 35% zinc, has a high strength and is used for springs, screws, and rivets.*Leaded brass is an alpha-beta brass with an addition of lead. It has excellent machinability.*Lead-free brass as defined by California Assembly Bill AB 1953 contains not more than 0.25 percent lead content.(*Low brass is a copper-zinc alloy containing 20% zinc with a light golden color and excellent ductility; it is used for flexible metal hoses and metal bellows.*Manganese brass is a brass most notably used in making golden dollar coins in the United States. It contains roughly 70% copper, 29% zinc, and 1.3% manganese.(manganese brass: Definition from Answers.com)*metal is about 60% copper, 40% zinc and a trace of iron, used as a lining on boats.*Nickel brass is composed of 70% copper, 24.5% zinc and 5.5% nickel used to make pound coins in the pound sterling currency.*Naval brass, similar to admiralty brass, is 40% zinc and 1% tin.*gold, used in 10, 20 and 50 cts euro coins, contains 89% copper, 5% aluminium, 5% zinc, and 1% tin.*Red brass is both an American term for the copper-zinc-tin alloy known as gunmetal, and an alloy which is considered both a brass and a bronze. It typically contains 85% copper, 5% tin, 5% lead, and 5% zinc.()() Red brass is also an alternative name for copper alloy C23000, which is composed of 1416% zinc, 0.05% iron and lead, and the remainder copper.() It may also refer to metal, another copper-zinc-tin alloy.*Rich low brass (Tombac) is 15% zinc. It is often used in jewelry applications.*Tonval brass (also called CW617N or CZ122 or OT58) is a copper-lead-zinc alloy. It is not recommended for seawater use, being susceptible to dezincification.(Print Layout 1)*White brass contains more than 50% zinc and is too brittle for general use. The term may also refer to certain types of silver alloys as well as Cu-Zn-Sn alloys with high proportions (typically 40%+) of tin and/or zinc, as well as predominantly zinc casting alloys with copper additive.*Yellow brass is an American term for 33% zinc brass.HistoryAlthough forms of brass have been in use since prehistory,(Thornton, C. P. (2007) Of brass and bronze in prehistoric southwest Asia in La Niece, S. Hook, D. and Craddock, P.T. (eds.) Metals and mines: Studies in archaeometallurgy London: Archetype Publications. ISBN 1904982190) its true nature as a copper-zinc alloy was not understood until the post medieval period because the zinc vapor which reacted with copper to make brass was not recognised as a metal.(de Ruette, M. (1995) From Contrefei and Speauter to Zinc: The development of the understanding of the nature of zinc and brass in Post Medieval Europe in Hook, D.R. and Gaimster, D.R.M (eds) Trade and Discovery: The Scientific Study of Artefacts from Post Medieval Europe and Beyond London: British Museum Occasional Papers 109) The James Bible makes many references to brass.(Crudens Complete Concordance p. 55) The English form of the word brass can mean any bronze alloy, or copper, rather than the strict modern definition of brass.  The earliest brasses may have been natural alloys made by smelting zinc-rich copper ores.(Craddock, P.T. and Eckstein, K (2003) Production of Brass in Antiquity by Direct Reduction in Craddock, P.T. and Lang, J. (eds) Mining and Metal Production Through the Ages London: British Museum p.226-7) By the Roman period brass was being deliberately produced from metallic copper and zinc minerals using the cementation process and variations on this method continued until the mid 19th century.(Rehren and Martinon Torres 2008, pp.1705) It was eventually replaced by speltering, the direct alloying of copper and zinc metal which was introduced to Europe in the 16th century.(Early copper zinc alloysIn Asia and the Mediterranean early copper zinc alloys are now known in small numbers from a number of third Millennium BC sites in the Aegean, Iraq, the Arab Emirates, Kalmikia, Turkmenistan and Georgia and from 2nd Millennium BC sites in India, Uzbekistan, Iran, Syria, Iraq and Palestine.(Thornton 2007,189201) However, isolated examples of copper-zinc alloys are known in China from as early as the 5th Millennium BC.(Zhou Weirong, (2001) The Emergence and Development of Brass Smelting Techniques in China Bulletin of the Metals Museum of the Japan Institute of Metals 34. p.8798.)The compositions of these early brass objects are very variable and most have zinc contents of between 5% and 15% wt which is lower than in brass produced by cementation.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003 p.217) These may be alloys manufactured by smelting zinc rich copper ores in reducing conditions. Many have similar tin contents to contemporary bronze artefacts and it is possible that some copper-zinc alloys were accidental and perhaps not even distinguished from copper.( However the large number of copper-zinc alloys now known suggests that at least some were deliberately manufactured and many have zinc contents of more than 12% wt which would have resulted in a distinctive golden color.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003 p.217, Thornton, C.P and Ehlers, C.B. (2003) Early Brass in the ancient Near East in IAMS Newsletter 23 p.27-36)By the 8th7th century BC Assyrian cuneiform tablets mention the exploitation of the copper of the mountains and this may refer to natural brass.(Bayley 1990, p.8) Oreichalkos, the Greek translation of this term, was later adapted to the Latin aurichalcum meaning golden copper which became the standard term for brass.(Rehren and Martinon Torres 2008, p.169) In the 4th century BC Plato knew oreichalkos as rare and nearly as valuable as gold(Craddock, P.T. (1978) The Composition of Copper Alloys used by the Greek, Etruscan and Roman Civilisations: 3 The Origins and Early Use of Brass in Journal of Archaeological Science 5 p.8) and Pliny describes how aurichalcum had come from Cypriot ore deposits which had been exhausted by the 1st century AD.(Pliny the Elder Historia Naturalis XXXIV 2)Brass making in the Roman WorldDuring the later part of first Millennium BC the use of brass spread across a wide geographical area from Britain(Craddock, P.T., Cowell, M. and Stead, I. (2004) Britains first brass in Antiquaries Journal 84 p33946.) and Spain(Montero-Ruis, I and Perea, A (2007) Brasses in the early metallurgy of the Iberian Peninsula in La Niece, S. Hook, D. and Craddock, P.T. (eds.) Metals and mines: Studies in archaeometallurgy London: Archetype:p.136-40) in the west to Iran, and India in the east.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, p.216-7) This seems to have been encouraged by exports and influence from the Middle-East and eastern Mediterranean where deliberate production of brass from metallic copper and zinc ores had been introduced.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 217) The 4th century BC writer Theopompus, quoted by Strabo, describes how heating earth from Andeira in Turkey produced droplets of false silver, probably metallic zinc, which could be used to turn copper into oreichalkos.(Bayley 1990, p.9) In the 1st century BC the Greek Dioscorides seems to have recognised a link between zinc minerals and brass describing how Cadmia (oxide) was found on the walls of furnaces used to heat either zinc ore or brass and explaining that it can then be used to make brass.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, p.222-4. Bayley 1990, p.10.) By the first century BC brass was available in sufficient supply to use as coinage in Phrygia and Bithynia,(Craddock, P.T. Burnett, A and Preston K. (1980) Hellenistic copper-based coinage and the origins of brass in Oddy, W.A. (ed) Scientific Studies in Numismatics British Museum Occasional Papers 18 p.53-64) and after the Augustan reform of 23 BC it was also used to make Roman dupondii and sestertii.(Caley, E.R. (1964) Orichalcum and Related Ancient Alloys New York; American Numismatic Society) The uniform use of brass for coinage and military equipment across the world may indicate a degree of state involvement in the industry,(Bayley 1990, p.21)() and brass even seems to have been deliberately boycotted by Jewish communities in Palestine because of its association with Roman authority.(Ponting, M (2002) Keeping up with the Roman Romanisation and Copper Alloys in First Revolt Palestine, IAMS 22 p.3-6) Brass was produced by the cementation process where copper and zinc ore are heated together until zinc vapor is produced which reacts with the copper. There is good archaeological evidence for this process and crucibles used to produce brass by cementation have been found on period sites including Xanten() and Nidda(Bachmann, H. (1976) Crucibles from a Roman Settlement in Germany in Journal of the Historical Metallurgy Society 10(1) p.34-5) in Germany, Lyon in France(Rehren and Martinon Torres 2008, pp.1701) and at a number of sites in Britain.(Bayley 1990) They vary in size from tiny acorn sized to large amphorae like vessels but all have elevated levels of zinc on the interior and are lidded.( They show no signs of slag or metal prills suggesting that zinc minerals were heated to produce zinc vapor which reacted with metallic copper in a state reaction. The fabric of these crucibles is porous, probably designed to prevent a build up of pressure, and many have small holes in the lids which may be designed to release pressure( or to add additional zinc minerals near the end of the process. Dioscorides mentioned that zinc minerals were used for both the working and finishing of brass, perhaps suggesting secondary additions.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, p.224) Brass made during the early Roman period seems to have varied between 20% to 28% wt zinc.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 224) The high content of zinc in coinage and brass objects declined after the first century AD and it has been suggested that this reflects zinc loss during recycling and thus an interruption in the production of new brass.(Caley 1964) However it is now thought this was probably a deliberate change in composition(Dungworth, D (1996) Caleys Zinc Decline reconsidered in Numismatic Chronicle 156 p.228-234) and overall the use of brass increases over this period making up around 40% of all alloys used in the Roman world by the 4th century AD.(Craddock 1978, p.14)Brass making in the medieval periodFile:Renier de Huy JPG0.jpg|thumb|right|300px|of Christ on the 12th century Baptismal font at St Bartholomews Church, Lige.Little is known about the production of brass during the centuries immediately after the collapse of the Empire. Disruption in the trade of tin for bronze from Europe may have contributed to the increasing popularity of brass in the east and by the 6th7th centuries AD over 90% of alloy artefacts from Egypt were made of brass.(Craddock, P.T. La Niece, S.C and Hook, D. (1990) Brass in the Medieval Islamic World in Craddock, P.T. (ed.) 2000 Years of Zinc and Brass London: British Museum p.73) However other alloys such as low tin bronze were also used and they vary depending on local cultural attitudes, the purpose of the metal and access to zinc, especially between the Islamic and Byzantine world.(Ponting, M. (1999) East Meets West in Post-Classical Betshan in Journal of Archaeological Science 26 p.1311-21) Conversely the use of true brass seems to have declined in Western Europe during this period in favour of gunmetals and other mixed alloys(Bayley 1990, p.22) but by the end of the first Millennium AD brass artefacts are found in Scandinavian graves in Scotland,(Eremin, K Graham-Campbell, J. and Wilthew, P. (2002) Analysis of Copper alloy artefacts from Pagan Norse Graves in Scotland in Biro, K.T and Eremin, K. (eds) Proceedings of the 31st International Symposium on Archaeometry Oxford: Archaeopress BAR pp.3429) brass was being used in the manufacture of coins in Northumbria(Gilmore, G.R. and Metcalf, D.M (1980) The alloy of the Northumbrian coinage in the mid-ninth century in Metcalf, D and Oddy, W. Metallurgy in Numismatics 1 p.83-98) and there is archaeological and historical evidence for the production of brass in Germany(Rehren 1999) and Low Countries(Day 1990, pp.123150) areas rich in calamine ore which would remain important centres of brass making throughout the medieval period,(Day 1990, pp.12433) especially Dinant  brass objects are still collectively known as dinanterie in French. The font at St Bartholomews Church, Lige in modern Belgium (before 1117) is an outstanding masterpiece of Romanesque brass casting.The cementation process continued to be used but literary sources from both Europe and the world seem to describe variants of a higher temperature liquid process which took places in open topped crucibles.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, p.224-5) Islamic cementation seems to have used zinc oxide known as tutiya or tutty rather than zinc ores for brass making resulting in a metal with lower iron impurities.(Craddock et al 1990, 78) A number of Islamic writers and the 13th century Italian Polo describe how this was obtained by sublimation from zinc ores and condensed onto clay or iron bars, archaeological examples of which have been identified at Kush in Iran.(Craddock et al 1990, p.73-6) It could then be used for brass making or medicinal purposes. In 10th century Yemen al-Hamdani described how spreading al-iglimiya, probably zinc oxide, onto the surface of molten copper produced tutiya vapor which then reacted with the metal.(Craddock et al 1990, p.75) The 13th century Iranian writer al-Kashani describes a more complex process whereby tutiya was mixed with raisins and gently roasted before being added to the surface of the molten metal. A temporary lid was added at this point presumably to minimise the escape of zinc vapor.(Craddock et al 1990, p.76) In Europe a similar liquid process in open topped crucibles took place which was probably less efficient than the Roman process and the use of the term tutty by Magnus in the 13th century suggests influence from Islamic technology.(Rehren, T (1999) The same...but different: A juxtaposition of Roman and Medieval brass making in Europe in Young, S.M.M. (ed.) Metals in antiquity Oxford: Archaeopress pp.2527) The 12th century German monk Theophilus described how preheated crucibles were one sixth filled with powdered calamine and charcoal then topped up with copper and charcoal before being melted, stirred then filled again. The final product was cast, then again melted with calamine. It has been suggested that this second melting may have taken place at a lower temperature to allow more zinc to be absorbed.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 226) Albertus Magnus noted that the power of both calamine and tutty could evaporate and described how the addition of powdered glass could create a film to bind it to the metal.(Rehren and Martinon Torres 2008, pp.1768) German brass making crucibles are known from Dortmund dating to the 10th century AD and from Soest and Schwerte in Westphalia dating to around the 13th century confirm Theophilus account as they are open topped, although ceramic discs from Soest may have served as loose lids which may have been used to reduce zinc evaporation, and have slag on the interior resulting from a liquid process.(Rehren and Martinon Torres 2008, pp.1735)Brass making in Renaissance and post medieval EuropeThe Renaissance saw important changes to both the theory and practice of brassmaking in Europe. By the 15th century there is evidence for the renewed use of lidded cementation crucibles at Zwickau in Germany.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2002, pp.95111) These large crucibles were capable of producing c.20 kg of brass.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2002, pp.1056) There are traces of slag and pieces of metal on the interior. Their irregular composition suggesting that this was a lower temperature not entirely liquid process.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2002, p.103) The crucible lids had small holes which were blocked with clay plugs near the end of the process presumably to maximise zinc absorption in the final stages.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2002, p.104) Triangular crucibles were then used to melt the brass for casting.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2002, p.100) 16th century technical writers such as Biringuccio, Ercker and Agricola described a variety of cementation brass making techniques and came closer to understanding the true nature of the process noting that copper became heavier as it changed to brass and that it became more golden as additional calamine was added.(Martinon Torres and Rehren 2008, 1812, de Ruette 1995) Zinc metal was also becoming more commonplace By 1513 metallic zinc ingots from India and China were arriving in London and pellets of zinc condensed in furnace flues at the Rammelsberg in Germany were exploited for cementation brass making from around 1550.(de Ruette 1995, 198)Eventually it was discovered that metallic zinc could be alloyed with copper to make brass; a process known as speltering(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 228) and by 1657 the German chemist Glauber had recognised that calamine was nothing else but unmeltable zinc and that zinc was a half ripe metal.(de Ruette 1995, 1989) However some earlier high zinc, low iron brasses such as the 1530 Wightman brass memorial plaque from England may have been made by alloying copper with zinc and include traces of cadmium similar those found in some zinc ingots from China.( However the cementation process was not abandoned and as late as the early 19th century there are descriptions of solid state cementation in a domed furnace at around 900950 degrees Celsius and lasting up to 10 hours.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 2267.) The European brass industry continued to flourish into the post medieval period buoyed by innovations such as the 16th century introduction of water powered hammers for the production of wares.(Day 1990, p.131) By 1559 the Germany city of Aachen alone was capable of producing 300,000 cwt of brass per year.( After several false starts during the 16th and 17th centuries the brass industry was also established in England taking advantage of abundant supplies of cheap copper smelted in the new coal fired furnace.(Day 1991, pp.13544) In 1723 Bristol brass maker Champion patented the use of granulated copper, produced by pouring molten metal into cold water.(Day 1990, 138) This increased the area of the copper helping it react and zinc contents of up to 33% wt were reported using this new technique.(Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 227) In 1738 Nehemiahs son William Champion patented a technique for the first industrial scale distillation of metallic zinc known as distillation per descencum or the English process.(Day 1991, pp.17981)(Dungworth, D and White, H (2007) Scientific examination of zinc-distillation remains from Warmley, Bristol. Historical Metallurgy 41, 7783) This local zinc was used in speltering and allowed greater control over the zinc content of brass and the production of high zinc copper alloys which would have been difficult or impossible to produce using cementation, for use in expensive objects such as instruments, clocks, brass buttons and jewellery.(Day 1991, p.183) However Champion continued to use the cheaper calamine cementation method to produce lower zinc brass ( and the archaeological remains of bee-hive shaped cementation furnaces have been identified at his works at Warmley.(Day, J. (1988) The Bristol Brass Industry: Furnaces and their associated remains in Journal of Historical Metallurgy 22(1) p.24) By the mid late 18th century developments in cheaper zinc distillation such as Donys horizontal furnaces in Belgium and the reduction of tariffs on zinc(Day 1991, pp.1869) as well as demand for corrosion resistant high zinc alloys increased the popularity of speltering and as a result cementation was largely abandoned by the mid 19th century.(Day 1991, pp.1923, Craddock and Eckstein 2003, 228)See also*bed*rubbing*of copper alloysReferencesBibliography*Bayley, J. (1990) The Production of Brass in Antiquity with Particular Reference to Roman Britain in Craddock, P.T. (ed.) 2000 Years of Zinc and Brass London: British Museum*Craddock, P.T. and Eckstein, K (2003) Production of Brass in Antiquity by Direct Reduction in Craddock, P.T. and Lang, J. (eds) Mining and Metal Production Through the Ages London: British Museum*Day, J. (1990) Brass and Zinc in Europe from the Middle Ages until the 19th Century in Craddock, P.T. (ed.) 2000 Years of Zinc and Brass London: British Museum*Day, J (1991) Copper, Zinc and Brass Production in Day, J and Tylecote, R.F (eds) The Industrial Revolution in Metals London: The Institute of Metals *Martinon Torres, M. and Rehren, T. (2002) Agricola and Zwickau: Theory and Practice of Renaissance Brass Production in SE Germany in Historical Metallurgy 36(2) pp. 95111*Rehren, T. and Martinon Torres, M. (2008) Naturam ars imitate: European brassmaking between craft and science in Martinon-Torres, M and Rehren, T. (eds) Archaeology, History and Science Integrating Approaches to Ancient Material: Left Coast PressExternal links*Brass.orgbn:be:be-x-old:bs:Mesingbg:ca:Llautcv:cs:Mosazda:Messingde:Messinget:Messingel:es:Latneo:Latunoeu:Letoi()fr:Laitongd:Prisko:hi:hr:Mjedio:Latuno(logam)is:Ltn(lega)he:kn:ka:kk:lbe:la:Orichalcumlv:Misilb:Messenglt:alvarisjbo:lastuhu:Srgarzml:mr:(metaallegering)ja:no:Messingnn:Massingpl:Mosidzpt:Latoksh:Messingro:Alamru:sco:Bressscn:Uttunisimple:Brasssk:Mosadz(kemija)szl:Mesingsr:sh:Mesingfi:Messinkisv:Mssingta:te:th:(alam)uk:thaufiu-vro:Messingzh:
3335
Baltic_Sea
 frozen             Image:Baltic Sea (Darlowo).JPG|thumb|240px|Baltic Sea in Darowo.The Baltic Sea is a brackish mediterranean sea located in Europe, from 53N to 66N latitude and from 20E to 26E longitude. It is bounded by the Peninsula, the mainland of Europe, and the Danish islands. It drains into the Kattegat by way of the resund, the Belt and the Belt. The Kattegat continues through Skagerrak into the Sea and the Ocean. The Baltic Sea is connected by man-made waterways to the Sea via the Sea Canal, and to the North Sea via the Canal. The Baltic Sea might be considered to be bordered on its northern edge by the of Bothnia, on its northeastern edge by the of Finland, and on its eastern edge by the of Riga. These various gulfs can also be considered part of the Baltic Sea. Geophysical data thumb|Baltic Sea in winterThe Baltic Sea is a brackish inland sea, perhaps the largest body of brackish water in the world (other possibilities include the Sea, Bay and the Sea).  The Baltic Sea occupies a basin formed by glacial erosion during the last few Ages.DimensionsThe Baltic sea is about 1600 km (1000 mi) long, an average of 193 km (120 mi) wide, and an average of 55 m (180 ft, 30 fathoms) deep. The maximum depth is 459 m (1506 ft), on the Swedish side of the center. The surface area is about 377,000 km (145,522 sq mi) and the volume is about 20,000 km (5040 cubic miles). The periphery amounts to about 8000 km (4968 mi) of coastline. (Geography of the Baltic Sea Area. Web.archive.org (2006-04-21). Retrieved on 2011-06-23.) Etymology While Tacitus called it Suebicum(Tacitus, (book): Ergo iam dextro Suebici maris litore Aestiorum gentes adluuntur, quibus ritus habitusque Sueborum, lingua Britannicae propior.http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/tacitus/tac.ger.shtml#45  Upon the right of the Suevian Sea the AEstyan nations reside, who use the same customs and attire with the Suevians; their language more resembles that of Britain.http://www.gutenberg.org/files/2995/2995-h/2995-h.htm) after the Germanic people of the Suebi, the first to name it also as the Baltic Sea (Mare Balticum) was eleventh century German chronicler of Bremen. The origin of the latter name is speculative. It might be connected to the Germanic word belt, a name used for two of the Danish straits, Belts, while others claim it to be derived from Latin balteus (belt).( Balteus in familjebok.) However it should be noted that the name of the Belts might be connected to Danish blte, which also means belt. Furthermore of Bremen himself compared the Sea with a belt stating that the Sea is named so because it stretches through the land as a belt (Balticus, eo quod in modum baltei longo tractu per Scithicas regiones tendatur usque in Greciam). He might also have been influenced by name of legendary island mentioned in The Natural History by the Elder. Pliny mentions an island named Baltia (or Balcia) with reference to accounts of Pytheas and Xenophon. It is possible that Pliny refers to island named Basilia (kingdom or royal) in On the Ocean by Pytheas. Baltia also might be derived from belt and means near belt of sea (strait). Meanwhile others have concluded that the name of the island originates from the Indo-European root *bhel meaning white, fair. Yet another explanation is that, while derived from the afore mentioned root, the name of the sea is related to naming for various forms of water and related substances in several European languages, that might have been originally associated with colors found in swamps. In Albanian, the oldest Indo-European language still alive, the name Baltic may derive by the word balt, meaning mud, due to its muddy water colors.  Another explanation is that the name was related to swamp and originally meant enclosed sea, bay as opposed to open sea.()Other possible origin of name Balticum is the Gaelic language, as bel means gulf. It a historical reality that Cymr people (Galitzians and Walshes) lived around Balticum for more than 2500 years ago, which it witnessed by numerous toponimia as Simrisham in Southern Sweden, Fyn en Denmark, Nybl in Northen Germany.Swedish historians believe the name is for Nordic mytologins name, the cripple secondary god Balder. In the Ages the sea was known by variety of names, the name Baltic Sea started to dominate only after 16th century. Usage of Baltic and similar terms to denote the region east from the sea started only in 19th century.Name in other languagesThe Baltic Sea, in ancient sources known as Suebicum (also known as Germanicum),(Schedel 1493 map http://www.nada.kth.se/~ovidiu/maps/images/1493-schedel-europa.jpg) is also known by the equivalents of East Sea, West Sea, or Baltic Sea in different languages:* In languages, except English, East Sea is used: Afrikaans (Oossee), Danish (stersen), Dutch (Oostzee), German (Ostsee), Icelandic and Faroese (Eystrasalt), Norwegian (stersjen), and Swedish (stersjn). In English it was known as Osts.* In addition, Finnish, a Baltic-Finnic language, has calqued the Swedish term as Itmeri East Sea, disregarding the geography (the sea is west of Finland), though understandably since Finland was a part of Sweden from Middle Ages until 1809.* In another Baltic-Finnic language, Estonian, it is called the West Sea (Lnemeri), with the correct geography (the sea is west of Estonia).* Baltic Sea is used in English; in the languages Latvian (Baltijas jra) and Lithuanian (Baltijos jra); in Latin (Mare Balticum) and the languages French (Mer Baltique), Italian (Mar Baltico), Portuguese (Mar Bltico), Romanian (Marea Baltic) and Spanish (Mar Bltico); in Greek ( ); in Albanian (Deti Balltik); in the languages Polish (Morze Batyckie or Batyk), Czech (Baltsk moe or Balt), Croatian (Baltiko more), Slovenian (Baltsko morje), Bulgarian (Baltijsko More ( ), Kashubian (Bt), Macedonian (  / Baltiko More), Ukrainian (  (Baltijske More), Belarusian (  (Baltyjskaje Mora), Russian (  (Baltiyskoye Morye) and Serbian (  / Baltiko more); in the language (Balti-tenger); and also in Basque (Itsaso Baltikoa).Sea iceOn the long-term average, the Baltic Sea is ice-covered for about 45% of its surface area at the maximum annually. The ice-covered area during such a typical winter includes the of Bothnia, the of Finland, of Riga, Vinameri in the Estonian archipelago, the archipelago and the Sea. The remainder of the Baltic itself does not freeze during a normal winter, with the exception of sheltered bays and shallow lagoons such as the Lagoon. The ice reaches its maximum extent in February or March; typical ice thickness in the northernmost areas in the Bay, the northern basin of the Gulf of Bothnia, is about  for landfast sea ice. The thickness decreases farther south.Freezing begins in the northern extremities of of Bothnia typically in middle of November, reaching the open waters of Bay in early January. The Sea, the basin south Kvarken, freezes on average in late February. The Gulf of Finland and the Gulf of Riga freeze typically in late January. In 2011, the Gulf of Finland was completely frozen on 15 February.(Sanomat, 16 February 2011, p. A8.)The ice extent depends on whether the winter is mild, moderate or severe. Severe winters can lead to ice formation around southern Sweden and even in the straits. According to William Derham, during the severe winters of 1703 and 1708 the ice cover permeated as far as the Danish straits, parts of the Gulf of Bothnia and Gulf of Finland, in addition to coastal fringes in more southerly locations such as the Gulf of Riga . This description would actually have meant that the whole of the Baltic Sea had been covered with ice.It is known that since 1720, the Baltic Sea has frozen over entirely only 20 times. The most recent case was in early 1987, which was the most severe winter in Scandinavia since that date. The ice then covered 400 000 km2. During the winter of 2010/11, which was quite severe compared to those of the last decades, the maximum ice cover was 315 000 km2, which was reached on 25 February 2011. The ice then extended from the north down to the northern tip of Gotland, with small ice free areas on its either side, and the east coast of the Baltic Sea was covered by an ice sheet ca.  wide all the way down to Gdask. This was brought about by a stagnant area that lingered over central and northern Scandinavia from ca. 10 February to 24 February. After this, strong southern winds pushed the ice further into the north, and much of the waters north of Gotland were again free of ice, which had then packed against the shores of southern Finland.(Sanomat, 10 February 2011, p. A4.)(Sanomat, 25 February 2011, p. A5.)(Sanomat, 11 June 2011, p. A12.) The effects of the afore-mentioned high-pressure area did not reach the southern parts of the Baltic Sea, and thus the entire sea did not freeze over. However, floating ice was additionally observed near winoujcie harbour in January 2010.In the recent years prior to 2011, Bay and the Sea were frozen with solid ice near the Baltic coast and dense floating ice far from it. In 2007 there was almost no ice formation except for a short period in March.(Sea Ice survey, Space Science and Engineering Centre, University of Wisconsin, http://www.ssec.wisc.edu)File:Jmed Puhtulaiul 1.JPG|thumb|Piles of drift ice on the shore of Puhtulaid, near Virtsu, Estonia, in late AprilDuring winter, ice, which is attached to the shoreline, develops first, rendering the ports unusable without the services of icebreakers. ice, sludge, ice or ice form in the more open regions. The gleaming expanse of ice is similar to the Arctic, with wind-driven pack ice and ridges up to 15 m. Offshore of the landfast ice, the ice remains very dynamic all year, and it is relatively easily moved around by winds and therefore forms ice, made up of large piles and ridges pushed against the landfast ice and shores.In spring, the Gulf of Finland and the Gulf of Bothnia normally thaw during in late April, with some ice ridges persisting until May in the eastern extremities of the Gulf of Finland. In the northernmost reaches of the Bothnian Bay, ice usually stays until late May; by early June it is practically always gone.The ice cover is the main habitat for two larger animal species. They are the seal (Halichoerus grypus) and the ringed seal (Pusa hispida botnica) that both feed underneath and breed on the ice. Of these two seals, only the Baltic ringed seal suffers when there is not an adequate ice in the Baltic Sea, as it feeds its young only on ice. The grey seal is adapted to reproducing also with no ice in the sea. The sea ice also harbours several species of algae that live in the bottom and inside brine pockets in the ice.HydrographyThe Baltic Sea flows out through the straits; however, the flow is complex. A surface layer of brackish water discharges 940 km per year into the Sea. Due to the difference in salinity, a sub-surface layer of more saline water moving in the opposite direction brings in 475 km per year. It mixes very slowly with the upper waters, resulting in a salinity gradient from top to bottom, with most of the salt water remaining below 40 to 70 m deep. The general circulation is counter-clockwise: northwards along its eastern boundary, and south along the western one (Alhonen 88).The difference between the outflow and the inflow comes entirely from fresh water. More than 250 streams drain a basin of about 1.6 million km, contributing a volume of 660 km per year to the Baltic. They include the major rivers of north Europe, such as the Oder, the Vistula, the Neman, the Daugava and the Neva. Additional fresh water comes from the difference of precipitation less evaporation, which is positive.An important source of salty water are infrequent inflows of Sea water into the Baltic. Such inflows, important to the Baltic ecosystem because of the oxygen they transport into the Baltic deeps, used to happen on average every four to five years until the 1980s. In recent decades they have become less frequent. The latest three occurred in 1983, 1993 and 2003 suggesting a new inter-inflow period of about ten years.The water level is generally far more dependent on the regional wind situation than on tidal effects. However, tidal currents occur in narrow passages in the western parts of the Baltic Sea.The wave height is generally much lower than that of the Sea. Violent and sudden storms often sweep the surface, due to large transient temperature differences and a long reach of wind. Seasonal winds also cause small changes in sea level, of the order of 0.5 m (Alhonen 88).SalinityThe Baltic Seas salinity is much lower than that of ocean water (which averages 35), as a result of abundant freshwater runoff from the surrounding land, combined with the shallowness of the sea itself; indeed, runoff contributes roughly one-fortieth its total volume per year, as the volume of the basin is about 21,000 km and yearly runoff is about 500 km. The open surface waters of the central basin have salinity of 6 to 8 . At the semi-enclosed bays with major freshwater inflows, such as head of Finnish Gulf with Neva mouth and head of Bothnian gulf with close mouths of Lule, Tornio and Kemi, the salinity is considerably lower. Below 40 to 70 m, the salinity is between 10 and 15  in the open Baltic Sea, and more than this near Danish Straits.The flow of fresh water into the sea from approximately two-hundred rivers and the introduction of salt from the South builds up a gradient of salinity in the Baltic Sea. Near the straits the salinity is close to that of the Kattegat, but still not fully oceanic, because the saltiest water that passes the straits is still already mixed with considerable amounts of outflow water. The salinity steadily decreases towards North and East. At the northern part of the of Bothnia the water is no longer salty and many fresh water species live in the sea. The salinity gradient is paralleled by a temperature gradient. These two factors limit many species of animals and plants to a relatively narrow region of Baltic Sea.The most saline water is vertically stratified in the water column to the north, creating a barrier to the exchange of oxygen and nutrients, and fostering completely separate maritime environments.(, Jan Thulin and Andris Andrushaitis, Religion, Science and the Environment Symposium V on the Baltic Sea (2003).)Regional emergenceImage:Suomi jaakauden jalkeen.png|thumb|x200px|Much of modern Finland is former seabed or archipelago: illustrated are sea levels immediately after the last ice age.The land is still emerging isostatically from its subsident state, which was caused by the weight of the last glaciation. The phenomenon is known as rebound. Consequently, the surface area and the depth of the sea are diminishing. The uplift is about eight millimetres per year on the Finnish coast of the northernmost Gulf of Bothnia. In the area, the former seabed is only gently sloped, leading to large areas of land being reclaimed in, geologically speaking, relatively short periods (decades and centuries). Geographic data ExtentThe Hydrographic Organization defines the limits of the Baltic Sea as follows:()Bordered by the coasts of Denmark, Sweden, Finland, Russia, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland and Germany extends north-eastward of the following limits:In the Belt. A line joining Falshft () and Vejsns Nakke (r: ).In the Belt. A line joining Gulstav (South extreme of Langeland Island) and Kappel Kirke () on Island of Laaland.In Guldborg Sound. A line joining Flinthorne-Rev and Skjelby ().In the Sound. A line joining Stevns Lighthouse () and Falsterbo Point ().Subdivisionsthumb|left|280px|Regions and basins of the Baltic SeaThe northern part of the Baltic Sea is known as the of Bothnia, of which the northernmost part is the Bay of Bothnia  or Bay. The more rounded southern basin of the gulf is called Sea and immediately to the south of it lies the of land. The of Finland connects the Baltic Sea with Petersburg. The of Riga lies between the Latvian capital city of Riga and the Estonian island of Saaremaa.The Northern Baltic Sea lies between the Stockholm area, southwestern Finland and Estonia. The Western and Eastern Gotland Basins form the major parts of the Central Baltic Sea or Baltic proper. The Basin is the area east of Bornholm, and the shallower Basin extends from Bornholm to the Danish isles of Falster and Zealand.In the south, the of Gdask lies east of the peninsula on the Polish coast and west of Sambia in Oblast. The of Pomerania lies north of the islands of Usedom and Wolin, east of Rgen. Between Falster and the German coast lie the of Mecklenburg and of Lbeck. The westernmost part of the Baltic Sea is the of Kiel. The three straits, the Belt, the Belt and The Sound (/resund), connect the Baltic Sea with the Kattegat bay and Skagerrak strait in the Sea.Land useImage:2 SPN 01.jpg|thumb|right|290px|Polish coast dunes.The Baltic sea drainage basin is roughly four times the surface area of the sea itself. About 48% of the region is forested, with Sweden and Finland containing the majority of the forest, especially around the Gulfs of Bothnia and Finland.About 20% of the land is used for agriculture and pasture, mainly in Poland and around the edge of the Baltic Proper, in Germany, Denmark and Sweden. About 17% of the basin is unused open land with another 8% of wetlands. Most of the latter are in the Gulfs of Bothnia and Finland.The rest of the land is heavily populated.DemographicsAbout 85 million people live in the Baltic drainage basin, 15 million within  of the coast and 29 million within  of the coast. Around 22 million live in population centers of over 250,000. 90% of these are concentrated in the  band around the coast. Of the nations containing all or part of the basin, Poland includes 45% of the 85 million, Russia 12%, Sweden 10% and the others (see below) less than 6% each. Geologic history Image:Baltic History 7500-BC.svg|thumb|290px|Lake around 8 700 years BP. The relic of Scandinavian Glacier in white. The river Svea lv (Svea river) formed an outlet to the Atlantic.The Baltic Sea somewhat resembles a riverbed, with two tributaries, the of Finland and of Bothnia. Geological surveys show that before the Pleistocene instead of the Baltic Sea, there was a wide plain around a big river called the Eridanos. Several glaciation episodes during the Pleistocene scooped out the river bed into the sea basin. By the time of the last, or Stage (MIS 5e), the Eemian sea was in place. Instead of a true sea, the Baltic can even today also be understood as the common estuary of all rivers flowing into it.From that time the waters underwent a geologic history summarized under the names listed below. Many of the stages are named after marine animals (e.g. the Littorina mollusk) that are clear markers of changing water temperatures and salinity.The factors that determined the seas characteristics were the submergence or emergence of the region due to the weight of ice and subsequent isostatic readjustment, and the connecting channels it found to the Sea-Atlantic, either through the straits of Denmark or at what are now the large lakes of Sweden, and the Sea-Sea.* Sea, 130,000115,000 (years ago)* ice lake, 12,60010,300* Sea, 10,3009500* Lake, 9,5008,000* Sea 8,0007,500* Sea, 7,5004,000* Post-littorina Sea 4,000present History At the time of the Empire, the Baltic Sea was known as the Mare Suebicum or Mare Sarmaticum. Tacitus in his AD 98 Agricola and Germania described the Mare Suebicum, named for the Suebi tribe, during the spring months, as a brackish sea when the ice on the Baltic Sea broke apart and chunks floated about. The Suebi eventually migrated south west to reside for a while in the Rhineland area of modern Germany, where their name survives in the historic region known as Swabia. The Sarmatian tribes inhabited Eastern Europe and southern Russia. Jordanes called it the Germanic Sea in his work the Getica.Since the age, the Scandinavians have called it the Eastern Lake (Austmarr, Eastern Sea, appears in the Heimskringla and Eystra salt appears in ttr), but Grammaticus recorded in Danorum an older name Gandvik, -vik being Norse for bay, which implies that the Vikings correctly regarded it as an inlet of the sea. (Another form of the name, Grandvik, attested in at least one English translation of Gesta Danorum, is likely to be a misspelling.)In addition to fish the sea also provides amber, especially from its southern shores. The bordering countries have traditionally provided lumber, wood tar, flax, hemp, and furs. Sweden had from early medieval times also a flourishing mining industry, especially on iron ore and silver. Poland had and still has extensive salt mines. All this has provided for rich trading since the Roman times.In the Middle Ages, Vikings of Scandinavia built their trade empire all around the Baltic. Later, there were fights for control over the sea with Wendish tribes dwelling on the southern shore. The Vikings also used the rivers of Russia for trade routes, finding their way eventually to the Sea and southern Russia. This Viking-dominated period is also referred to as Age.Lands next to the seas eastern shore were among the last in Europe to be converted into Christianity in the Crusades: Finland in the twelfth century by the Swedes, and what are now Estonia and Latvia in the early thirteenth century by the Danes and the Germans (Brothers of the Sword). The Knights gained control over parts of the southern and eastern shore of the Baltic Sea, where they set up their monastic state while fighting the Poles, the Danes, the Swedes, the Russians of ancient Novgorod, and the Lithuanians (the last Europeans to convert to Christianity).In the 12th century, there was intensification of Slavic piracy. Starting in the 11th century, the southern and eastern shores of the Baltic were settled by Germans (and to a lesser extent by Dutch, Danes and Scots) in the course of the Ostsiedlung. The Slavs were gradually assimilated by the Germans.(Wend  West Wend. Britannica.com. Retrieved on 2011-06-23.) Denmark gradually gained control over most of the Baltic coast, until she lost much of her possessions after being defeated in the 1227 Battle of Bornhved.File:Eerste fase van de Zeeslag in de Sont - First phase of the Battle of the Sound - November 8 1568 (Jan Abrahamsz Beerstraten, 1660).jpg|thumb|right|The naval of the Sound took place on 8 November 1658 during the War.In the 13th to 17th centuries, the strongest economic force in Northern Europe became the league, which used the Baltic Sea to establish trade routes between its member cities. In the seventeenth century the Dutch became the dominant traders. In the sixteenth and early seventeenth centuries, Commonwealth, Denmark and Sweden fought wars for Dominium Maris Baltici (Ruling over the Baltic Sea). Eventually, it was the Empire that virtually encompassed the Baltic Sea. In Sweden the sea was then referred to as Mare Nostrum Balticum (Our Baltic Sea).In the eighteenth century, Russia and Prussia became the leading powers over the sea. The Northern War, ending with Swedens defeat, brought Russia to the eastern coast. Since then, Russia was a dominating power in the Baltic. Russias Peter the Great saw the strategic importance of the Baltic and decided to found his new capital, Petersburg at the mouth of the Neva river at the east end of the of Finland. There was much trading not just within the Baltic region but also with the North Sea region, especially eastern England and the Netherlands: their fleets needed the Baltic timber, tar, flax and hemp.During the War, a joint British and French fleet attacked the Russian fortresses by bombarding Sveaborg, which guards Helsinki; Kronstadt, which guards Saint Petersburg; and by destroying Bomarsund in the Islands. After the unification of Germany in 1871, the whole southern coast became German. The First World War was partly fought in the Baltic Sea. After 1920 Poland was connected to the Baltic Sea by the Corridor and enlarged the port of Gdynia in rivalry with the port of the City of Danzig.Image:Cap Arcona burning.jpg|thumb|The burning Arcona shortly after the attacks, 3rd May 1945. Only 350 of the 4,500 prisoners who had been aboard the Cap Arcona survived.During the Second World War, Germany reclaimed all of the southern shore and much of the eastern by occupying Poland and the states. In 1945, the Baltic Sea became a mass grave for retreating soldiers and refugees on torpedoed troop transports. The sinking of the Wilhelm Gustloff remains the worst maritime disaster, killing (very roughly) 9,000 people. In 2005, a Russian group of scientists found over five thousand airplane wrecks, sunken warships, and other material mainly from the Second World War, lying at the bottom of the sea.Since the end of World War II, various nations, including the Soviet Union, the United Kingdom and the United States, have disposed of chemical weapons in the Baltic Sea, raising concerns of environmental contamination.(Chemical Weapon Time Bomb Ticks in the Baltic Sea Deutsche Welle, 1 February 2008.) Even now fishermen accidentally retrieve some of these materials: the most recent available report from the Helsinki Commission notes that four small scale catches of CW munitions representing approximately 105 kilograms (231 lbs) of material were reported in 2005. This is a reduction from the 25 incidents representing 1,110 kilograms (2,447 lbs) of material in 2003.(Activities 2006: Overview Baltic Sea Environment Proceedings No. 112. Commission.) Until now, the U.S. government refuses to disclose the exact coordinates of the wreck sites. Rotting bottles leak Lost and other substances, thus slowly poisoning a substantial part of the Baltic Sea.After 1945, the German population was expelled from all areas east of the line, making room for Polish and Russian settlers. Poland gained a vast stretch of the southern shore, Russia gained another access to the Baltic with the oblast. The states on the eastern shore were occupied by the Union, Poland and East Germany became communist states. The sea then was a border between opposing military blocs: in the case of military conflict, in parallel with a Soviet offensive towards the Ocean, communist Polands fleet was prepared to invade the Danish isles. This border status also impacted trade and travel, and came to an end only after the collapse of the communist regimes in Eastern and Central Europe in the late 1980s.Since May 2004, on the accession of the states and Poland, the Baltic Sea has been almost entirely surrounded by countries of the Union (EU). The only remaining non-EU areas are the Russian metropolis of Saint Petersburg and the Oblast exclave.Winter storms begin arriving in the region during October. These have caused numerous shipwrecks, and contributed to the extreme difficulties of rescuing passengers of the ferry Estonia en route from Tallinn, Estonia, to Stockholm, Sweden, in September 1994, which claimed the lives of 852 people. Older, wood-based shipwrecks such as the Vasa tend to remain well-preserved, as the Baltics cold and brackish water does not suit the shipworm. Biology Image:Phytoplankton bloom in the Baltic Sea (July 3, 2001).jpg|thumb|Phytoplankton bloom in the Baltic Proper, July 3, 2001.Approximately  of the Baltics seafloor (a quarter of its total area) is a variable dead zone. The more saline (and therefore denser) water remains on the bottom, isolating it from surface waters and the atmosphere. This leads to decreased oxygen concentrations within the zone. It is mainly bacteria that grow in it, digesting organic material and releasing hydrogen sulfide. Because of this large anaerobic zone, the seafloor ecology differs from that of the neighbouring Atlantic.Plans to artificially oxygenate areas of the Baltic that have experienced eutrophication have been proposed by the of Gothenburg and Inocean AB. The proposal intends to use wind-driven pumps to inject oxygen (air) into waters at, or around, 130m below sea level()The low salinity of the Baltic sea has led to the evolution of many slightly divergent species, such as the Baltic Sea herring, which is a smaller variant of the Atlantic herring. The benthic fauna consists mainly of affinis, which is originally a freshwater species. The lack of tides has affected the marine species as compared with the Atlantic.The most common fish species that can be found in the Baltic Sea are codfish, herring, hake, plaice, flounder, sea trout, eel and turbot.Satellite images taken in July 2010 revealed a massive bloom covering  in the Baltic Sea. The area of the bloom extends from Germany and Poland to Finland. Researchers of the phenomenon have indicated that algal blooms have occurred every summer for decades. Fertilizer runoff from surrounding agricultural land has exacerbated the problem and led to increased eutrophication.() Economy Image:Palangos tiltas1.jpg|thumb|Pedestrian pier at Palanga, the most popular sea resort in LithuaniaConstruction of the Belt Bridge in Denmark (completed 1997) and the Bridge-Tunnel (completed 1999), linking Denmark with Sweden, provided a highway and railroad connection between Sweden and the Danish mainland (the Peninsula). The undersea tunnel of the resund Bridge-Tunnel provides for navigation of large ships into and out of the Baltic Sea. The Baltic Sea is the main trade route for export of Russian petroleum. Many of the countries neighboring the Baltic Sea have been concerned about this, since a major oil leak in a seagoing tanker would be disastrous for the Balticgiven the slow exchange of water. The tourism industry surrounding the Baltic Sea is naturally concerned about oil pollution.Much shipbuilding is carried out in the shipyards around the Baltic Sea. The largest shipyards are at Gdask, Gdynia, and Szczecin, Poland; Kiel, Germany; Karlskrona, Sweden; Malm, Sweden; Rauma, Turku, and Helsinki, Finland; Riga, Ventspils, and Liepja (Latvia); Klaipda (Lithuania); and Petersburg, Russia.There are several cargo and passenger ferries that operate on the Baltic Sea, such as Scandlines, Line, Polferries, the Line, Tallink, and Ferries.Tourism around the seaEuropean Route of Brick GothicRoute of Brick Gothic is a touristic route connecting cities with Brick Gothic architecture in seven countries along the Baltic Sea: Sweden, Denmark, Germany, Poland, Lithuania, Latvia and Estonia.Piers* Liepaja, Latvia* Sopot, Poland* Midzyzdroje, Poland* Koobrzeg, Poland* Klaipeda, Lithuania* Heiligendamm, GermanyResort townsExamples:* winoujcie, Poland* Pomorski, Poland* Koobrzeg, Poland* Prnu, Estonia* Jrmala, Latvia* Palanga, Lithuania* Nida, Lithuania* Sopot, Poland* Ueckermnde, Germany* Ustka, Poland* Svetlogorsk, Russia The Helsinki Convention 1974 ConventionFor the first time ever, all the sources of pollution around an entire sea were made subject to a single convention, signed in 1974 by the then seven Baltic coastal states. The 1974 Convention entered into force on 3 May 1980.1992 ConventionIn the light of political changes and developments in international environmental and maritime law, a new convention was signed in 1992 by all the states bordering on the Baltic Sea, and the European Community. After ratification the Convention entered into force on 17 January 2000. The Convention covers the whole of the Baltic Sea area, including inland waters and the water of the sea itself, as well as the seabed. Measures are also taken in the whole catchment area of the Baltic Sea to reduce land-based pollution. The Convention on the Protection of the Marine Environment of the Baltic Sea Area, 1992, entered into force on 17 January 2000.The governing body of the Convention is the Helsinki Commission,(Helcom : Welcome. Helcom.fi. Retrieved on 2011-06-23.) also known as HELCOM, or Baltic Marine Environment Protection Commission. The present contracting parties are Denmark, Estonia, the European Community, Finland, Germany, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Russia and Sweden.The ratification instruments were deposited by the European Community, Germany, Latvia and Sweden in 1994, by Estonia and Finland in 1995, by Denmark in 1996, by Lithuania in 1997 and by Poland and Russia in November 1999. Countries Countries that border on the sea:Countries that are in the basin but do not border on the sea: Islands and archipelagoes Image:Archipelago062009.jpg|thumb|300px|Skerries which are part of the Islands, Finland.* Islands (Finland, autonomous)* Sea (Finland)** Pargas** Nagu** Korpo** Houtskr** Kustavi** Kimito* Bornholm (Denmark)* Gotland (Sweden)* Hailuoto (Finland)* Hiiumaa (Estonia)* Kotlin (Russia)* Muhu (Estonia)* land (Sweden)* Rgen (Germany)* Saaremaa (Estonia)* archipelago (Sweden)** Vrmdn (Sweden)* Usedom or Uznam (split between Germany and Poland)* Kvarken archipelago, including Valsrarna (Finland)* Wolin (Poland) Cities The biggest coastal cities (by population):* Petersburg (Russia) 4,700,000 (metropolitan area 6,000,000)* Stockholm (Sweden) 843,139  (metropolitan area 2,046,103)* Riga (Latvia) 709,000 (metropolitan area 842,000)* Helsinki (Finland) 579,016 (metropolitan area 1,303,126)* Copenhagen (Denmark) 502,204 (metropolitan area 1,823,109) (facing the Sound)* Gdask (Poland) 462,700 (metropolitan area 1,041,000)* Szczecin (Poland) 413,600 (metropolitan area 778,000)* Tallinn (Estonia) 401,774* Kaliningrad (Russia) 400,000* Malm (Sweden) 290,078 (facing the Sound)* Gdynia (Poland) 255,600 (metropolitan area 1,041,000)* Kiel (Germany) 250,000* Espoo (Finland) 234,400 (part of Helsinki metropolitan area)* Lbeck (Germany) 216,100* Rostock (Germany) 212,700* Klaipda (Lithuania) 194,400* Turku (Finland) 175,000* Oulu (Finland) 130,000Important ports (though not big cities):* Liepja (Latvia) 85,000File:Port of Kaliningrad.jpg|thumb|Port of Kaliningrad* Norrkping (Sweden) 84,000* Pori (Finland) 83,000* Gvle (Sweden) 69,000* Kotka (Finland) 55,000* winoujcie (Poland) 50,000* Koobrzeg (Poland) 46,000* Prnu (Estonia) 44,568* Ventspils (Latvia) 44,000* of Police (The Seaport on The Oder River) in Poland (34,319)* Trelleborg (Sweden) 26,000* Baltiysk (Russia) 20,000* Karlshamn (Sweden) 19,000* Maardu (Estonia) 16,570* Sillame (Estonia) 16,567* Wadysawowo (Poland) 15,000* Darowo (Poland) 14,000* Oxelsund (Sweden) 11,000* Mariehamn (Finland) 11,000* Hanko (Finland) 10,000* Sassnitz (Germany) 11,000 See also * Baltic* region* Sea Action Group (BSAG)* states* of the Baltic Sea States* of cities and towns around the Baltic Sea* of rivers of the Baltic Sea* Estonia* Stream* Europe* of the Baltic Sea* ScandinaviaReferences* Fairbridge, Rhodes. The Encyclopedia of Oceanography. Pentti Alhonen, Baltic Sea, pp. 8791. New York: Van Nostrand Reinhold Company, 1966. Further reading * Ojaveer H., Jaanus A., MacKenzie B. R., Martin G., Olenin S., et al. (2010). Status of Biodiversity in the Baltic Sea. ONE 5(9): e12467. doi:10.1371/journal.pone.0012467 External links * Baltic Sea clickable map and details.* Protect the Baltic Sea while its still not too late.* The Baltic Sea Portal  a site maintained by the Finnish Institute of Marine Research (FIMR) (in English, Finnish, Swedish and Estonian)* Encyclopedia of Baltic History* Old shipwrecks in the Baltic* How the Baltic Sea was changing  Prehistory of the Baltic from the Polish Geological Institute* Late Weichselian and Holocene shore displacement history of the Baltic Sea in Finland  more prehistory of the Baltic from the Department of Geography of the of Helsinki* Baltic Environmental Atlas: Interactive map of the Baltic Sea region* Can a New Cleanup Plan Save the Sea?  spiegel.de* List of all ferry lines in the Baltic Sea* The Helsinki Commission (HELCOM) HELCOM is the governing body of the Convention on the Protection of the Marine Environment of the Baltic Sea Area* Baltice.org  information related to winter navigation in the Baltic Sea.* Baltic Sea Wind  Marine weather forecasts* Ostseeflug  A short film (55), showing the coastline and the major German cities at the Baltic sea.af:Oosseeang:OstsBalticaBalticaBlticudnizizh-min-nan:Peh-hibar:OstseemoreBaltelBlticamoeMr Baltigda:stersende:Ostseemrjoet:LnemeriBlticoMaroeu:BaltikoaSeaBaltiquefy:EastseeBhailtVooir ValtaghMuir BaltachBlticomorjomoreio:BaltikoBaltikis:EystrasaltBalticoBaltikcsb:BtBaltekya BaltikiBaltikjiuramarejraMierjrali:Ooszeexamsihu:Balti-tengerBaltikaBaltikBlticohuytlnl:Oostzeends-nl:Oostzeeja:frr:stsiieno:stersjennn:AustersjenBalticapap:Baltikonds:OostseeBatyckieBlticoBalticda lOsthatun quchaSeasstq:AastseeBaltikBlticuSeamoremorjeMorzemorefi:Itmerisv:stersjnBaltikoth:DenizideziBltegoBalticfiu-vro:dagumeriBaltikora Balticzh-yue:jrazh:
3343
Belgium
 footnote2                 The .eu domain is also used, as it is shared with other European Union member states.Belgium ( ), officially the Kingdom of Belgium, is a federal state in Western Europe. It is a founding member of the Union and hosts the EUs headquarters, and those of several other major international organisations such as NATO.(Belgium is also a member of, or affiliated to, many international organisations, including ACCT, AfDB, AsDB, Group, Benelux, BIS, CCC, CE, CERN, EAPC, EBRD, EIB, EMU, ESA, EU, FAO, G-10, IAEA, IBRD, ICAO, ICC, ICRM, IDA, IDB, IEA, IFAD, IFC, IFRCS, IHO, ILO, IMF, IMO, IMSO, Intelsat, Interpol, IOC, IOM, ISO, ITU, MONUC (observers), NATO, NEA, NSG, OAS (observer), OECD, OPCW, OSCE, PCA, UN, UNCTAD, UNECE, UNESCO, UNHCR, UNIDO, UNMIK, UNMOGIP, UNRWA, UNTSO, UPU, WADB (non-regional), WEU, WHO, WIPO, WMO, WTrO, ZC.)Belgium covers an area of , and it has a population of about 11 million people. Straddling the cultural boundary between Germanic and Europe, Belgium is home to two main linguistic groups, the Dutch-speakers, mostly Flemish, and the French-speakers, mostly Walloons, plus a small group of German-speakers. Belgiums two largest regions are the Dutch-speaking region of Flanders in the north and the French-speaking southern region of Wallonia. The Region, officially bilingual, is a mostly French-speaking enclave within the Flemish Region.( * * * * )A German-speaking Community exists in eastern Wallonia.(  The (original) version in German language (already) mentions 73,000 instead of 71,500 inhabitants.)Belgiums linguistic diversity and related political and cultural conflicts are reflected in the political history and a complex system of government.( )( )Historically, Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg were known as the Countries, which used to cover a somewhat larger area than the current Benelux group of states.  The region was called Belgica in Latin because of the province Belgica which covered more or less the same area. From the end of the Ages until the 17th century, it was a prosperous centre of commerce and culture. From the 16th century until the Revolution in 1830, when Belgium seceded from the Netherlands, many battles between European powers were fought in the area of Belgium, causing it to be dubbed the battleground of Europe,( The book reviewer, Ha, attributes the expression in English to Howell in 1640. Howells original phrase the cockpit of Christendom became modified afterwards, as shown by:* and as such coined for Belgium:*  (See also Nuttall Encyclopaedia))a reputation strengthened by both World Wars.Upon its independence, Belgium participated in the Revolution( )( )and, during the course of the 20th century, possessed a number of colonies in Africa.( )The second half of the 20th century was marked by the rise of non-violent but fraught conflicts between the Flemings and the Francophones  fuelled by cultural differences on the one hand and an asymmetrical economic evolution of Flanders and Wallonia on the other hand. These still-active conflicts have caused far-reaching reforms of the formerly unitary Belgian state into a federal state which may lead to a complete partition of the country in the future.( )( )( )HistoryFile:Map-1477 Low Countries.png|thumb|left|The Provinces (orange, brown and yellow areas) and the of Lige (green)The name Belgium is derived from Belgica, a province in the northernmost part of Gaul that, before Roman invasion in 100 BC, was inhabited by the Belgae, a mix of Celtic and peoples.( )( Footnote: The Celtic and/or Germanic influences on and origin(s) of the Belgae remains disputed. Further reading e.g. )A gradual immigration by Germanic Frankish tribes during the 5th century brought the area under the rule of the Merovingian kings. A gradual shift of power during the 8th century led the kingdom of the Franks to evolve into the Empire.( Cook (2002), p. 3)The of Verdun in 843 divided the region into Middle and Francia and therefore into a set of more or less independent fiefdoms which, during the Ages, were vassals either of the of France or of the Roman Emperor.(Many of these fiefdoms were united in the Netherlands of the 14th and 15th centuries.( )Emperor Charles V extended the union of the Provinces in the 1540s, making it far more than a personal union by the Sanction of 1549 and increased his influence over the of Lige.( )The Years War (15681648) divided the Low Countries into the northern United Provinces (Belgica Foederata in Latin, the Federated Netherlands) and the Netherlands (Belgica Regia, the Royal Netherlands). The latter were ruled successively by the Spanish and the Austrian Habsburgs and comprised most of modern Belgium. This was the theatre of most Franco-Spanish and Franco-Austrian wars during the 17th and 18th centuries. Following the campaigns of 1794 in the French Revolutionary Wars, the Low Countriesincluding territories that were never nominally under Habsburg rule, such as the Prince-Bishopric of Ligewere annexed by the First Republic, ending Austrian rule in the region. The reunification of the Low Countries as the Kingdom of the Netherlands occurred at the dissolution of the French Empire in 1815.The 1830 Revolution led to the establishment of a Catholic and bourgeois, officially French-speaking and neutral, independent Belgium under a provisional government and a national congress.( )( )Since the installation of Leopold I as king on  1831 (which now celebrated as Belgiums Day()), Belgium has been a monarchy and democracy, with a laicist constitution based on the code. Although the franchise was initially restricted, suffrage for men was introduced after the general strike of 1893 (with voting until 1919) and for women in 1949.File:Wappers - Episodes from September Days 1830 on the Place de lHtel de Ville in Brussels.JPG|thumb|left|Episode of the Revolution of 1830 (1834), by Charles Gustave Wappers, Museum of Ancient Art, BrusselsThe main political parties of the 19th century were the Catholic Party and the Liberal Party, with the Labour Party emerging towards the end of the century. French was originally the single official language adopted by the nobility and the bourgeoisie. It progressively lost its overall importance as Dutch became recognised as well. This recognition became official in 1898 and in 1967 a Dutch version of the Constitution was legally accepted.( )The Conference of 1885 ceded control of the Free State to King Leopold II as his private possession. From around 1900 there was growing international concern for the extreme and savage treatment of the Congolese population under Leopold II, for whom the Congo was primarily a source of revenue from ivory and rubber production. In 1908 this outcry led the Belgian state to assume responsibility for the government of the colony, henceforth called the Congo.( )Germany invaded Belgium in 1914 as part of the Plan and much of the Western Front fighting of World War I occurred in western parts of the country. The opening months of the war were known as the of Belgium due to German atrocities. Belgium took over the colonies of Ruanda-Urundi (modern day Rwanda and Burundi) during the war, and they were mandated to Belgium in 1924 by the of Nations. In the aftermath of the First World War, the Prussian districts of Eupen and Malmedy were annexed by Belgium in 1925, thereby causing the presence of a German-speaking minority.The country was again invaded by Germany in 1940 and was occupied until its liberation by the Allies in 1944. After World War II, a general strike forced king Leopold III, who many saw as collaborating with the Germans during the war, to abdicate in 1951. The Belgian Congo gained independence in 1960 during the Crisis;( )Ruanda-Urundi followed with its independence two years later. Belgium joined NATO as a founding member and formed the Benelux group of nations with the Netherlands and Luxembourg. Belgium became one of the six founding members of the Coal and Steel Community in 1951 and of the Atomic Energy Community and Economic Community, established in 1957. The latter is now the European Union, for which Belgium hosts major administrations and institutions, including the Commission, the of the European Union and the extraordinary and committee sessions of the Parliament.PoliticsII.jpg|thumb|upright|Albert II, King of the BelgiansBelgium is a constitutional, monarchy and a parliamentary democracy. The bicameral federal parliament is composed of a Senate and a Chamber of Representatives. The former is made up of 40 directly elected politicians and 21 representatives appointed by the 3 Community parliaments, 10 co-opted senators and the children of the king, as Senators by Right who in practice do not cast their vote. The Chambers 150 representatives are elected under a voting system from 11 electoral districts. Belgium has voting and thus holds one of the highest rates of turnout in the world.( )The King (currently Albert II) is the of state, though with limited prerogatives. He appoints ministers, including a Prime Minister, that have the confidence of the Chamber of Representatives to form the government. The numbers of Dutch- and French-speaking ministers are equal as prescribed by the constitution (the Prime Minister not being counted).( )The judicial system is based on civil law and originates from the code. The Court of Cassation is the court of last resort, with the Court of Appeal one level below.Belgiums political institutions are complex; most political power is organised around the need to represent the main cultural communities.( )Since around 1970, the significant national Belgian political parties have split into distinct components that mainly represent the political and linguistic interests of these communities.( )The major parties in each Community, though close to the political centre, belong to three main groups: the right-wing Liberals, the socially conservative Christian Democrats and the socialists forming the left wing.()Further notable parties came into being well after the middle of last century, mainly around linguistic, nationalist, or environmental themes and recently smaller ones of some specific liberal nature.(File:Yves Leterme campagne foto cropped.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Prime Minister LetermeA string of Christian Democrat coalition governments from 1958 was broken in 1999 after the first dioxin crisis, a major food contamination scandal.()(ElAmin, Ahmed Belgium, Netherlands meat sectors face dioxin crisis, foodproductiondaily.com,  2006)( )A rainbow coalition emerged from six parties: the Flemish and the French-speaking Liberals, Social Democrats, Greens.( )Later, a purple coalition of Liberals and Social Democrats formed after the Greens lost most of their seats in the 2003 election.( )The government led by Prime Minister Verhofstadt from 1999 to 2007 achieved a balanced budget, some tax reforms, a labour-market reform, scheduled nuclear phase-out and instigated legislation allowing more stringent war crime and more lenient soft drug usage prosecution. Restrictions on withholding euthanasia were reduced and same-sex marriage legalized. The government promoted active diplomacy in Africa( The article shows an example of Belgiums recent African policies.) and opposed the invasion of Iraq.()Verhofstadts coalition fared badly in the June 2007 elections. For more than a year, the country experienced a political crisis.()  This crisis was such that many observers speculated on a possible of Belgium.((( From  2007 until  2008 the temporary III Government was in office. This coalition of the Flemish and Francophone Christian Democrats, the Flemish and Francophone Liberals together with the Francophone Social Democrats was an interim government until  2008. On that day a new government, led by Flemish Christian Democrat Leterme, the actual winner of the federal elections of , was sworn in by the king. On  2008 Leterme announced the resignation of the cabinet to the king, as no progress in constitutional reforms had been made.()In December 2008 he once more offered his resignation to the king after a crisis surrounding the sale of Fortis to Paribas.(CNN.com, Belgium Prime Minister offers resignation over banking deal) At this juncture, his resignation was accepted and Flemish Christian Democrat Van Rompuy was sworn in as Prime Minister on  2008.(Belgian king asks Van Rompuy to form government Reuters)After Herman Van Rompuy was designated the first permanent of the European Council on  2009, he offered the resignation of his government to King Albert II on  2009. A few hours later, the new government under Prime Minister Yves Leterme was sworn in. On  2010, Leterme again offered the resignation of his cabinet to the king() after one of the coalition partners, the OpenVLD, withdrew from the government, and on  2010 King Albert officially accepted the resignation.()The Parliamentary elections in Belgium on  2010 saw the Flemish nationalist N-VA become the largest party in Flanders, and the Socialist Party PS the largest party in Wallonia.() Belgium has since then been governed by Letermes caretaker government awaiting the end of the currently deadlocked negotiations for formation of a new government. By 30 March 2011 this set a new world record for the elapsed time without an official government, previously held by war-torn Iraq. As this time increases to more than a year, the general understanding that the incumbent will merely continue existing and perform only urgent business becomes increasingly questioned.()Communities and Regionsthumb|Communities:         Flemish & French Community / bilingual language areathumb|Regions:Following a usage which can be traced back to the Burgundian and Habsburgian courts,() in the 19th century it was necessary to speak French to belong to the governing upper class, and those who could only speak Dutch were effectively second-class citizens.() Late that century, and continuing into the 20th century, movements evolved to counter this situation.(Fitzmaurice (1996), p.31) While the Walloons and most Brusselers adopted French as their first language, the Flemings refused to do so and succeeded progressively in imposing Dutch as Flanders official language.( Following World War II, Belgian politics became increasingly dominated by the autonomy of its two main language communities.() Intercommunal tensions rose and the constitution was amended in order to minimise the conflict potentials.(Based on the four language areas defined in 196263 (the Dutch, bilingual, French and German language areas), consecutive revisions of the countrys constitution in 1970, 1980, 1988 and 1993 established a unique federal state with segregated political power into three levels:()( )# The federal government, based in Brussels.# The three language communities:#* the Community (Dutch-speaking);#* the French Community (French-speaking);#* the German-speaking Community.# The three regions:#* the Region, subdivided into five provinces;#* the Walloon Region, subdivided into five provinces;#* the Region.The constitutional language areas determine the official languages in their municipalities, as well as the geographical limits of the empowered institutions for specific matters.(Fitzmaurice (1996), p. 121) Although this would allow for seven parliaments and governments, when the Communities and Regions were created in 1980, Flemish politicians decided to merge both.(Fitzmaurice (1996), p. 122) Thus the Flemings just have one single institutional body of parliament and government is empowered for all except federal and specific municipal matters.(The Constitution set out seven institutions each of which can have a parliament, government and administration. In fact there are only six such bodies because the Flemish Region merged into the Flemish Community. This single Flemish body thus exercises powers about Community matters in the bilingual area of Brussels-Capital and in the Dutch language area, while about Regional matters only in the latter.)The overlapping boundaries of the Regions and Communities have created two notable peculiarities: the territory of the Brussels-Capital Region (which came into existence nearly a decade after the other regions) is included in both the Flemish and French Communities, and the territory of the German-speaking Community lies wholly within the Walloon Region. Conflicts jurisdiction between the bodies are resolved by the Court of Belgium. The structure is intended as a compromise to allow different cultures to live together peacefully.(The Federal States authority includes justice, defence, federal police, social security, nuclear energy, monetary policy and public debt, and other aspects of public finances. State-owned companies include the Post Group and Belgian Railways. The Federal Government is responsible for the obligations of Belgium and its federalized institutions towards the European Union and NATO. It controls substantial parts of public health, home affairs and foreign affairs.() The budgetwithout the debtcontrolled by the federal government amounts to about 50% of the national fiscal income. The federal government employs around 12% of the civil servants.()Communities exercise their authority only within linguistically determined geographical boundaries, originally oriented towards the individuals of a Communitys language: culture (including audiovisual media), education and the use of the relevant language. Extensions to personal matters less directly connected with language comprise health policy (curative and preventive medicine) and assistance to individuals (protection of youth, social welfare, aid to families, immigrant assistance services, and so on.).()Regions have authority in fields that can be broadly associated with their territory. These include economy, employment, agriculture, water policy, housing, public works, energy, transport, the environment, town and country planning, nature conservation, credit and foreign trade. They supervise the provinces, municipalities and intercommunal utility companies.()In several fields, the different levels each have their own say on specifics. With education, for instance, the autonomy of the Communities neither includes decisions about the compulsory aspect nor allows for setting minimum requirements for awarding qualifications, which remain federal matters.( Each level of government can be involved in scientific research and international relations associated with its powers.  The treaty-making power of the Regions and Communities Governments is the broadest of all the Federating units of all the Federations all over the world.( )( )( )GeographyFile:Diksmuide - Polders - IJzer.jpg|thumb|right|Polders along the Yser riverBelgium shares borders with France (), Germany (), Luxembourg () and the Netherlands (). Its total area, including surface water area, is 33,990 square kilometres; land area alone is 30,528 km2. It lies between latitudes 49 and 53 N, and longitudes 2 and 7 E.Belgium has three main geographical regions: the coastal plain in the north-west and the central plateau both belong to the Anglo-Belgian Basin; the Ardennes uplands in the south-east are part of the Hercynian orogenic belt. The Paris Basin reaches a small fourth area at Belgiums southernmost tip, Lorraine.()The coastal plain consists mainly of sand dunes and polders. Further inland lies a smooth, slowly rising landscape irrigated by numerous waterways, with fertile valleys and the northeastern sandy plain of the Campine (Kempen). The thickly forested hills and plateaus of the Ardennes are more rugged and rocky with caves and small gorges. Extending westward into France, this area is eastwardly connected to the Eifel in Germany by the Fens plateau, on which the de Botrange forms the countrys highest point at .()()The climate is maritime temperate with significant precipitation in all seasons (climate classification: Cfb), as is the case with all areas adjacent to the Sea, including The Netherlands and much of the United Kingdom. The average temperature is lowest in January at  and highest in July at . The average precipitation per month varies between  for February or April, to  for July.() Averages for the years 2000 to 2006 show daily temperature minimums of  and maximums of  and monthly rainfall of ; these are about 1 C and nearly 10 millimetres above last centurys normal values, respectively.( )Phytogeographically, Belgium is shared between the Atlantic European and Central European provinces of the Region within the Kingdom.(Takhtajan, Armen, 1986. Floristic Regions of the World. (translated by T.J. Crovello and A. Cronquist). of California Press, Berkeley.) According to the Wide Fund for Nature, the territory of Belgium belongs to the ecoregion of Atlantic mixed forests.(Atlantic mixed forests (PA0402), World Wildlife Fund, 2001.) Because of its high density, its location in the centre of Western Europe and inadequate political effort, Belgium faces serious environmental problems. A 2003 report suggested Belgian natural waters(rivers and groundwater) to have the lowest water quality of the 122 countries studied.()In the 2006 pilot Performance Index, Belgium scored 75.9% for overall environmental performance and was ranked lowest of the EU member countries, though it was only 39th of 133 countries.(Pilot 2006 Environmental Performance Index  Yale Center for Environmental Law & Policy and Columbia University Center for International Earth Science Information Network)EconomyBelgiums strongly globalized economy(Belgium ranked first in the KOF Globalisation Index 2009) and its transportation infrastructure are integrated with the rest of Europe. Its location at the heart of a highly industrialized region helped make it the worlds 15th largest trading nation in 2007.()() The economy is characterized by a highly productive work force, high GNP and high exports capita.() Belgiums main imports are raw materials, machinery and equipment, chemicals, raw diamonds, pharmaceuticals, foodstuffs, transportation equipment, oil products. Its main exports are machinery and equipment, chemicals, finished diamonds, metals and metal products, foodstuffs.()The Belgian economy is heavily service-oriented and shows a dual nature: a dynamic Flemish economy and a Walloon economy that lags behind.(()(The richest (capita income) of Belgiums three regions is the Region, followed by the Region and lastly the Region.  The ten municipalities with the highest reported income are: Laethem-Saint-Martin, Keerbergen, Lasne, Oud-Heverlee, Hove, Pinte, Meise, Knokke-Heist, Bierbeek.) One of the founding members of the European Union, Belgium strongly supports an economy and the extension of the powers of EU institutions to integrate member economies. Since 1922, through the Economic Union, Belgium and Luxembourg have been a single trade market with customs and currency union.()File:Ougree 16.jpg|thumb|left|Steelmaking along the River at Ougre, near LigeBelgium was the first continental European country to undergo the Revolution, in the early 19th century.() Lige and Charleroi rapidly developed mining and steelmaking, which flourished until the mid-20th century in the SambreMeuse valley, the industriel and made Belgium one of the top three most industrialized nations in the world from 1830 to 1910.()() However, by the 1840s the textile industry of Flanders was in severe crisis, and the region experienced famine from 1846 to 1850.()()After World War II, Ghent and Antwerp experienced a rapid expansion of the chemical and petroleum industries. The 1973 and 1979 oil crises sent the economy into a recession; it was particularly prolonged in Wallonia, where the steel industry had become less competitive and experienced serious decline.() In the 1980s and 1990s, the economic centre of the country continued to shift northwards and is now concentrated in the populous Diamond area.()By the end of the 1980s, Belgian policies had resulted in a cumulative government debt of about 120% of GDP. As of 2006, the budget was balanced and public debt was equal to 90.30% of GDP.() In 2005 and 2006, real GDP growth rates of 1.5% and 3.0%, respectively, were slightly above the average for the Euro area. Unemployment rates of 8.4% in 2005 and 8.2% in 2006 were close to the area average. By , this had grown to 8.5% compared to an average rate of 9.6% for the European Union as a whole (EU 27).()() From 1832 until 2002, Belgiums currency was the franc. Belgium switched to the euro in 2002, with the first sets of euro coins being minted in 1999. The standard euro coins designated for circulation show the portrait of King Albert II.Despite a 18% decrease observed from 1970 to 1999, Belgium still had in 1999 the highest rail network density within the European Union with 113.8 km/1 000 km2.  Due to the large population density in Belgium, this number corresponds to the quite low amount of 3.40% kilometers per capita in comparison to the mean EU value of 4.06%.  On the other hand, the same period of time, 19701999, has seen a huge growth (+56%) of the motorway network.  In 1999, the density of km motorways per 1000 km2 and 1000 inhabitants amounted to 55.1 and 16.5 respectively and were significantly superior to the EUs means of 13.7 and 15.9.() Belgium however experiences one of the most congested traffic in Europe. Commuters to the cities of Brussels and Antwerp spent 2010 respectively 65 and 64 hours a year in traffic jams.() Like in most small european countries, more than 80% of the airways traffic is handled by a single airport, the Airport.  The ports of Antwerp and Zeebrugge share more than 80% of Belgian maritime traffic, Antwerp being the second European harbour with a gross weight of goods handled of 115 988 000 t in 2000 after a growth of 10.9% over the preceeding five years.((Another comparative study on transportation in Belgium: )MilitaryThe Belgian Armed Forces have about 46,000 active troops. This number corresponded in 2009 to a yearly defence budget of $6 billion (11th in the EU) or 1.24% of GDP (19th in the EU).()  They are organised into one unified structure which consists of four main components: Land Component, or the Army; Air Component, or the Air Force; Naval Component, or the Navy; Medical Component. The operational commands of the four components are subordinate to the Staff Department for Operations and Training of the Ministry of Defence, which is headed by the Assistant Chief of Staff Operations and Training, and to the Chief of Defence.()The effects of War II made security a priority for Belgian foreign policy. In March 1948 Belgium signed the of Brussels, and then joined NATO in 1948. However the integration of the armed forces into NATO did not begin until after the War.(David Isby and Charles Kamps Jr, Armies of NATOs Central Front, Janes Publishing Company, 1985, p.59)Science and technologyFile:mercator.jpg|thumb|upright|MercatorContributions to the development of science and technology have appeared throughout the countrys history. The 16th century Modern flourishing of Western Europe included cartographer Mercator, anatomist Vesalius, herbalist Dodoens(** (*) Free abstract for pay-per-view article by*) and mathematician Stevin among the most influential scientists.()Chemist Solvay() and engineer Gramme (cole Industrielle de Lige)() gave their names to the process and the dynamo, respectively, in the 1860s. Bakelite was developed in 19071909 by Baekeland.  Ernest Solvay also acted as a major philantropist and gave its name to the Institute of Sociology, the Brussels School of Economics and Management and the Solvay Institutes for Physics and Chemistry which are now part of the Libre de Bruxelles. In 1911, he started a series of conferences, the Solvay Conferences on Physics and Chemistry, which have had a deep impact on the evolution of quantum physics and chemistry.() A major contribution to fundamental science was also due to a Belgian, Lematre (University of Leuven), who is credited with proposing the Bang theory of the origin of the universe in 1927.()Three Nobel Prizes in Physiology or Medicine were awarded to Belgians: Bordet (Libre de Bruxelles) in 1919, Heymans (of Ghent) in 1938 and Claude (Universit Libre de Bruxelles) together with De Duve (Universit Catholique de Louvain) in 1974.  Prigogine (Universit Libre de Bruxelles) was awarded the Prize in Chemistry in 1977.()DemographicsFile:2007 07 Belgium Brussels 06 (cropped).jpg|thumb|left|Brussels, the capital city and largest metropolitan area of BelgiumIn the beginning of 2007, nearly 92% of the population had Belgian citizenship, and other European Union member citizens account for around 6%. The prevalent foreign nationals were Italian (171,918), French (125,061), Dutch (116,970), Moroccan (80,579), Spanish (42,765), Turkish (39,419) and German (37,621).()(Ecodata)Immigrants since 1945 and their descendents are estimated by 2008 to have formed 22% of the total population.( ) Of these New Belgians, 1,313,000 (56%) are of European ancestry and the 950,000 others originated from the rest of the world.(Almost all of the Belgian population is urban97% in 2004.() The population density of Belgium is 342 per square kilometre (886 per square mile).  The most densely inhabited area is Flanders,() and in particular the Diamond, outlined by the AntwerpLeuvenBrusselsGhent agglomerations.()The Ardennes have the lowest density. As of 2006, the Flemish Region had a population of about 6,078,600, with Antwerp (457,749), Ghent (230,951) and Bruges (117,251) its most populous cities; Wallonia had 3,413,978, with Charleroi (201,373), Lige (185,574) and Namur (107,178) its most populous. Brussels houses 1,018,804 in the Capital Regions 19 municipalities, two of which have over 100,000 residents.()LanguagesFile:Brussels signs.jpg|thumb|Bilingual signs in BrusselsBelgium has three official languages, which are in order of native speaker population in Belgium: Dutch, French and German. A number of non-official minority languages are spoken as well.( )As no census exists, there are no official statistical data regarding the distribution or usage of Belgiums three official languages or their dialects.() However, various criteria, including the language(s) of parents, of education, or the second-language status of foreign born, may provide suggested figures. An estimated 59% of the Belgian population speaks Dutch (often colloquially referred to as Flemish), and 40% of the population speaks French.(Native speakers of Dutch living in Wallonia and of French in Flanders are relatively small minorities that furthermore largely balance one another, hence counting all inhabitants of each unilingual area to the areas language can cause only insignificant inaccuracies (99% can speak the language). Dutch: Flanders 6.079 million inhabitants and about 15% of Brussels 1.019 million are 6.23 million or 59.3% of the 10.511 million inhabitants of Belgium (2006); German: 70,400 in the German-speaking Community (which has language facilities for its less than 5% French-speakers) and an estimated 20,00025,000 speakers of German in the Walloon Region outside the geographical boundaries of their official Community, or 0.9%; French: in the latter area as well as mainly in the rest of Wallonia (3.414  0.093  3.321 million) and 85% of the Brussels inhabitants (0.866 million) thus 4.187 million or 39.8%; together indeed 100%.)Total Dutch speakers are 6.23 million, concentrated in the northern Flanders region, while French speakers comprise 3.32 million in Wallonia and an estimated 0.87 million or 85% of the officially bilingual Brussels-Capital Region.(Flemish Academic Eric Corijn (initiator of Charta 91), at a colloquium regarding Brussels, on 2001-12-05, states that in Brussels there is 91% of the population speaking French at home, either alone or with another language, and there is about 20% speaking Dutch at home, either alone (9%) or with French (11%)After ponderation, the repartition can be estimated at between 85 and 90% French-speaking, and the remaining are Dutch-speaking, corresponding to the estimations based on languages chosen in Brussels by citizens for their official documents (ID, driving licenses, weddings, birth, sex, and so on); all these statistics on language are also available at Belgian Department of Justice (for weddings, birth, sex), Department of Transport (for Driving licenses), Department of Interior (for IDs), because there are no means to know precisely the proportions since Belgium has abolished official linguistic censuses, thus official documents on language choices can only be estimations. For a web source on this topic, see e.g. General online sources: Janssens, Rudi)(Strictly, the capital is the municipality (City of) Brussels, though the Brussels-Capital Region might be intended because of its name and also its other municipalities housing institutions typical for a capital.) The German-speaking Community is made up of 73,000 people in the east of the Walloon Region; around 10,000 German and 60,000 Belgian nationals are speakers of German. Roughly 23,000 more German speakers live in municipalities near the official Community.(( * * )Both Dutch and French have minor differences in vocabulary and semantic nuances from the varieties spoken respectively in the Netherlands and France. Many Flemish people still speak dialects of Dutch in their local environment. Walloon, once the main regional language of Wallonia, is now only understood and spoken occasionally, mostly by elderly people. Wallonias dialects, along with those of Picard,(  (Online version: Sixteenth edition))are not used in public life.EducationEducation is compulsory from six to 18 years of age for Belgians.(  Extracts: p. 97, p. 105)Among OECD countries in 2002, Belgium had the third-highest proportion of 1821 year-olds enrolled in education, at 42%.( )Though an estimated 98% of the adult population is literate, concern is rising over illiteracy.(( )The for International Student Assessment, coordinated by the OECD, currently ranks Belgiums education as the 19th best in the world, being significantly higher than the OECD average.( )Education being organised separately by each, the Flemish Community scores noticeably above the French and German-speaking Communities.( )Mirroring the dual structure of the 19th-century Belgian political landscape, characterized by the Liberal and the Catholic parties, the educational system is segregated within a secular and a religious segment. The secular branch of schooling is controlled by the communities, the provinces, or the municipalities, while religious, mainly Catholic branch education, is organised by religious authorities, although subsidized and supervised by the communities.( )ReligionFile:BasKoek.jpg|thumb|left|of the Sacred Heart, BrusselsSince the countrys independence, Roman Catholicism, counterbalanced by strong freethought movements, has had an important role in Belgiums politics.(See for example Belgium entry of the Encyclopedia) However Belgium is largely a secular country as the laicist constitution provides for freedom of religion, and the government generally respects this right in practice. During the reigns of Albert I and Baudouin, the monarchy had a reputation of deeply rooted Catholicism.( Roman Catholicism has traditionally been Belgiums majority religion; being especially strong in Flanders. However, by 2009 Sunday church attendance was 5% for Belgium in total; 3% in Brussels,()  and 5.4% in Flanders. Church attendance in 2009 in Belgium is roughly half of the Sunday church attandance in 1998 (11% for the total of Belgium in 1998).(Kerken lopen zeer geleidelijk helemaal leeg  Dutch newsarticle describing church attendance in Flanders. Standaard.be (2010-11-25). Retrieved on 2011-09-26.)  Despite the 6% drop in Sunday church attendance in Belgium from 11% to 5% over this nine-year period, Catholicism nevertheless remains an important force in society.()Symbolically and materially, the Roman Catholic Church remains in a favourable position.( Belgiums concept of recognised religions() set a path for Islam to follow to acquire the treatment of Jewish and Protestant religions. While other minority religions, such as Hinduism, do not yet have such status, Buddhism took the first steps toward legal recognition in 2007.(()( Alternative urls:http://www.metrotime.be/digipaperArticlenl.html?storyId3947981, http://www.metrotime.be/Belgie_gaat_plat_op_br_zijn_buik_voor_China.html, http://www.metrotime.be/UserFiles/DigiPaper/nl/20070510/2/MVLMP-0-20070510-02.pdf) According to the 2001 Survey and Study of Religion,() about 47% of the population identify themselves as belonging to the Catholic Church, while Islam is the second-largest religion at 3.5%. A 2006 inquiry in Flanders, considered to be a more religious region than Wallonia, showed that 55% considered themselves religious and that 36% believed that God created the world.(Inquiry by Vepec, Vereniging voor Promotie en Communicatie (Organisation for Promotion and Communication), published in Knack magazine  2006 p. 14 The Dutch language term gelovig is in the text translated as religious. More precisely it is a very common word for believing in particular in any kind of God in a monotheistic sense, or in some afterlife, or both.)A 2008 estimation shows() that 6% of the Belgian population, about 628,751, is Muslim (98% Sunni).Muslims constitute 25.5% of the population of Brussels, 4.0% of Wallonia and 3.9% of Flanders.The majority of Belgian Muslims live in the major cities, such as Antwerp, Brussels and Charleroi. The largest group of immigrants in Belgium are Moroccans, with 264,974 people. The Turks are the third-largest group, and the second-largest Muslim ethnic group, numbering 159,336.(Voor het eerst meer Marokkaanse dan Italiaanse migranten, hbvl.be,  2007)According to the Eurobarometer Poll in 2005, 43% of Belgian citizens responded that they believe there is a God, whereas 29% answered that they believe there is some sort of spirit or life force and 27% that they do not believe there is any sort of spirit, God, or life force.()HealthThe Belgians are known to enjoy good health. Their life expectancy numbered 79.5 years in 2004. Since 1960, life expectancy has, in line with the European average, grown by two months per year.  Death is in Belgium mainly due to heart and vascular disorders, neoplasms, disorders of the respiratory system and unnatural causes of death (accidents, suicide).  Non-natural causes of death and cancer are the most common causes of death for females up to age 24 and males up to age 44.()Health care is of  high quality and is financed through both social security contributions and taxation.  Health insurance is compulsory.  However health care is delivered by a mostly private system of independent medical practitioners and hospitals.  Most of the time each provided service is directly paid by the patient and reimbursed later on by health insurance companies.( Belgian health care system is supervised and financed by the federal government, the three Communities and the three Regions, i.e. six distinct Ministries (the Flemish Community and Region have merged).(CultureDespite its political and linguistic divisions, the region corresponding to todays Belgium has seen the flourishing of major artistic movements that have had tremendous influence on European art and culture.  Nowadays, to a certain extent, cultural life is concentrated within each language Community, and a variety of barriers have made a shared cultural sphere less pronounced.(()() Since the 1970s, there are no bilingual universities in the country except the Royal Military Academy and the Antwerp Maritime Academy, no common media() and no single large cultural or scientific organisation in which both main communities are represented. The forces that once held the Belgians togetherRoman Catholicism and economic and political opposition to the Dutchare no longer strong.()Fine artsFile:eyck.hubert.lamb.750pix.jpg|thumb|The Altarpiece: The Adoration of the Mystic Lamb (interior view), painted 1432 by van EyckContributions to painting and architecture have been especially rich. The art, the Early Netherlandish,() the Flemish Renaissance and Baroque painting() and major examples of Romanesque, Gothic, Renaissance and architecture(Several examples of major architectural realisations in Belgium belong to UNESCOs Heritage List:) are milestones in the history of art. While the 15th centurys art in the Low Countries is dominated by the religious paintings of van Eyck and van der Weyden, the 16th century is characterized by a broader panel of styles such as Peter Breughels landscape paintings and Lombards representation of the antique.()  Though the Baroque style of Paul Rubens and van Dyck flourished in the early 17th century in the Southern Netherlands,() it gradually declined thereafter.()(A general presentation of the Flemish artistic movement with a list of its artists, linking to their biographies and artworks)During the 19th and 20th centuries many original romantic, expressionist and surrealist Belgian painters emerged, including Ensor and other artists belonging to the XX group, Permeke, Delvaux and Magritte. The avant-garde CoBrA movement appeared in the 1950s, while the sculptor Panamarenko remains a remarkable figure in contemporary art.(List of Belgian painters, linking to their biographies and artworks)() The multidisciplinary artist Fabre and the painter Tuymans are other internationally renowned figures on the contemporary art scene. Belgian contributions to architecture also continued into the 19th and 20th centuries, including the work of Horta and van de Velde, who were major initiators of the Nouveau style.(Brussels, capital of Art Nouveau (page 1), (for example))()The music of the School developed in the southern part of the Low Countries and was an important contribution to Renaissance culture.() In the 19th and 20th centuries, there was an emergence of major violinists, such as Vieuxtemps, Ysae and Grumiaux, while Sax invented the saxophone in 1846. The composer Franck was born in Lige in 1822. Contemporary music in Belgium is also of repute. Jazz musician Thielemans and singer Brel have achieved global fame. In rock/pop music, Telex, 242, Choice, Hooverphonic, Mama, Soulwax and dEUS are well known. In the heavy metal scene, bands like Machiavel, Channel Zero and Enthroned have a worldwide fan-base.(Two comprehensive discussions of rock and pop music in Belgium since the 1950s:**)Belgium has produced several well-known authors, including the poet Verhaeren and novelists Conscience, Simenon, Lilar and Nothomb. The poet and playwright Maeterlinck won the Prize in literature in 1911. Adventures of Tintin by Herg is the best known of comics, but many other major authors, including Peyo (Smurfs), Franquin (Lagaffe), P. Jacobs and Vandersteen brought the Belgian cartoon strip industry a worldwide fame.()Belgian cinema has brought a number of mainly Flemish novels to life on-screen.(Notable Belgian films based on works by Flemish authors include: De Witte (author Claes) movie by Jan Vanderheyden and Edith Kiel in 1934, remake as De Witte van Sichem directed by De Hert in 1980; De man die zijn haar kort liet knippen (Daisne) Delvaux 1965; Mira (De teleurgang van de Waterhoek by Streuvels) Rademakers 1971; Malpertuis (aka The Legend of Doom House) (Jean Ray name of Flemish author who mainly wrote in French, or as John Flanders in Dutch) Kmel 1971; De loteling (Conscience) Roland Verhavert 1974; Dood van een non (Rosseels) Paul Collet and Pierre Drouot 1975; Pallieter (Timmermans) Roland Verhavert 1976; De komst van Joachim Stiller (Lampo) Kmel 1976; De Leeuw van Vlaanderen (Conscience) Claus (a famous author himself) 1985; Daens (Pieter Daens by Paul Boon) Coninx 1992; see also Filmarchief les DVD!s de la cinmathque (in Dutch). Retrieved on  2007.) Other Belgian directors include Delvaux, Coninx, Luc and Dardenne; well-known actors include Decleir and Gillain; and successful films include Man Bites Dog and Alzheimer Affair.(A review of the Belgian cinema till about 2000 can be found at) In the 1980s, Antwerps Royal Academy of Fine Arts produced important fashion trendsetters, known as the Six.()FolkloreFile:Binche - Les Gilles.jpg|thumb|left|The Gilles of Binche, in costume, wearing wax masksFolklore plays a major role in Belgiums cultural life: the country has a comparatively high number of processions, cavalcades, parades, ommegangs and ducasses,(The Dutch word ommegang is here used in the sense of an entirely or mainly non-religious procession, or the non-religious part thereofsee also its article on the Dutch-language Wikipedia; the Processional Giants of Brussels, Dendermonde and Mechelen mentioned in this paragraph are part of each citys ommegang. The French word ducasse refers also to a procession; the mentioned Processional Giants of Ath and Mons are part of each citys ducasse.) kermesse and other local festivals, nearly always with an originally religious or mythological background. The of Binche with its famous Gilles and the Processional Giants and Dragons of Ath, Brussels, Dendermonde, Mechelen and Mons are recognised by UNESCO as of the Oral and Intangible Heritage of Humanity.()Other examples are the Carnival of Aalst; the still very religious processions of the Holy Blood in Bruges, Jesse Basilica in Hasselt and of Our Lady of Hanswijk in Mechelen;  festival in Lige; and the Walloon festival in Namur. Originated in 1832 and revived in the 1960s, the Feesten have become a modern tradition. A major non-official holiday is the Nicholas Day, a festivity for children and, in Lige, for students.()CuisineFile:Brussels waffle.jpg|right|thumb|upright|waffles, commonly known as waffles outside of BelgiumMany highly ranked Belgian restaurants can be found in the most influential restaurant guides, such as the Guide.() Belgium is famous for beer, chocolate, waffles and fries. Contrary to their name, french fries also originated in Belgium. The national dishes are steak and fries with salad, and mussels with fries.( Republished from)( Republished from)(Note: Contrarily to what the text suggests, the season starts as early as July and lasts through April.)Brands of Belgian chocolate and pralines, like Cte dOr, Guylian, Neuhaus, Leonidas, Corn and Galler are famous, as well as independent producers such as Burie and Del Rey in Antwerp and Marys in Brussels.() Belgium produces over 500 varieties of beer. The beer of the Abbey of Westvleteren has repeatedly been rated the worlds best beer.()()()The biggest brewer in the world by volume is InBev, based in Leuven.()SportsClijsters 2006.jpg|thumb|left|Kim Clijsters was WTA Player of the Year in 2005 and 2010Since the 1970s, sports clubs and federations are organised separately within each language community.() Association football is one of the most popular sports in both parts of Belgium, together with cycling, tennis, swimming and judo.() With five victories in the de France and numerous other cycling records, Belgian Merckx is regarded as one of the greatest cyclists of all time.() His hour speed record (set in 1972) stood for 12 years. Pfaff, a former Belgian goalkeeper, is considered one of the greatest in the history of football.(Goalkeeping Greats Goalkeepersaredifferent.com. Retrieved on  2008) Belgium and The Netherlands previously hosted the European Football Championship in 2000. Belgium hosted the 1972 European Football Championships.Clijsters and Henin both were Player of the Year in the Tennis Association as they were ranked the number one female tennis player.The Spa-Francorchamps motor-racing circuit hosts the One World Championship Grand Prix. The Belgian driver, Ickx, won eight Grands Prix and six Hours of Le Mans and finished twice as runner-up in the Formula One World Championship. Belgium also has a strong reputation in motocross.() Sporting events annually held in Belgium include the Van Damme athletics competition, the Grand Prix Formula One, and a number of cycle races such as the of Flanders and LigeBastogneLige. The Summer Olympics were held in Antwerp.See also*in Belgium*relations of Belgiumlist}}NotesReferences;Online sources** (mentioning other original sources)*  Retrieved on  2007.*******Reflections on nations and nation-state developments regarding Belgium;Bibliography***Also editions 1913, London, ; (1921) D. Unwin and Co., New York  also published (1921) as Belgium from the Roman invasion to the present day, The Story of the nations, 67, T. Fisher Unwin, London,  *Ib. e-book (2004) NetLibrary, Boulder, Colorado, United States, ISBN 0-8204-7283-2 Also print edition (ISBNDB.com 2004-06-30) or (Peterlang.com 2005), ISBN 0-8204-7647-1* Facsimile reprint of a 1902 edition by the author, London Facsimile reprint of a 1909 edition by the author, London** (Several editions in English, incl. (1997) 7th ed.)External links; Government* Official site of Belgian monarchy* Official site of the Belgian federal government* Chief of State and Cabinet Members;General information* * Belgium at UCB Libraries GovPubs* Belgium information from the States Department of State* * Portals to the World from the United States of Congress* FAO Country Profiles: Belgium* Statistical Profile of Belgium at the Association of Religion Data Archives; Tourism* Official Site of the Belgian Tourist Office in the Americas and GlobeScope* ; Other* Belgium, entry on the Catholic Encyclopedia 1913, republished on Wikisource* Belgium, entry on the Diplomacy wiki monitored by the Center on Public Diplomacy* History of Belgium: Primary Documents EuroDocs: Online Sources for European Historyace:Blgiaaf:Belgials:Belgienam:ang:Belgicear:an:Belchicaarc:roa-rup:Belghiafrp:Blgiqueast:Blxicaay:Bilkiyaaz:Belikabn:zh-min-nan:Belgienba:be:be-x-old:bcl:Belhikabi:Belgiumbar:Bigienbo:bs:Belgijabr:Belgiabg:ca:Blgicacv:ceb:Belhikacs:Belgietum:Belgiumco:BelgicaBelgda:Belgienpdc:Belgiende:Belgiendv:Bikyahdsb:Belgiskadz:et:Belgiael:eml:Blgies:Blgicaeo:Belgioext:Blgicaeu:Belgikaee:Belgiumfa:hif:Belgiumfo:Belgiafr:Belgiquefy:Belgjefur:BelgjoBheilgVelggag:BelgiyaBheilg- Belgi - Belgique - Belgienhak:P-li-sko:haw:Pelekiumahy:hi:hsb:Belgiskahr:Belgijaio:Belgiailo:Belgiumbpy:id:Belgiaia:Belgicaie:Belgiaos:is:Belgait:Belgiohe:jv:Blgiakl:Belgiapam:Belgiumkrc:ka:ks:csb:Belgijskkk:Belgrw:Ububiligiky:sw:Ubelgijikv:kg:Beleziht:Bljikku:Belgiyalad:Beljikaltg:Begejala:Belgicalv:Beijalb:Belschlt:Belgijalij:Belgili:Belsjln:Bljikajbo:beldjymhu:Belgiummk:mg:Belzikaml:mt:Beljumi:Pehiamumr:xmf:arz:ms:Belgiummdf:mn:my:nah:Belgicana:Berdjiyumnl:Belginds-nl:Belgine:ja:nap:Belgece:frr:Blgienpih:Beljumno:Belgiann:Belgianrm:Belgiquenov:Belgiaoc:Belgicamhr:uz:Belgiyapfl:Belgjepnb:pap:Blgikaps:koi:pcd:Bergikepms:Belgitpi:Beljiamnds:Belgienpl:Belgiapnt:pt:Blgicakbd:kaa:Belgiyacrh:Belikaksh:Belgienro:Belgiarmy:Beljiyarm:Belgiaqu:Bilhikarue:ru:sah:se:Belgiasa:sg:Blezesco:Belgiumstq:Belgiensq:Belgjikascn:Belgiusimple:Belgiumss:IBhelijiyamusk:Belgickocu:sl:Belgijaszl:Belgijoso:Beljimckb:srn:Belgikondresr:sh:Belgijasu:Blgiafi:Belgiasv:Belgientl:Belhikata:kab:Biljiktt:te:tet:Bljikath:tg:tr:Belikatk:Belgiaudm:bug:Belgiauk:ur:ug:vec:Belgiovi:Bvo:Belgnfiu-vro:Belgiwa:Beldjikevls:Belgiwar:Belhikawo:Belsikwuu:yi:yo:Bljmzh-yue:diq:Belkazea:Belhibat-smg:Belgjzh:
3383
Brazil
footnote7 Brazil  (, ), officially the Federative Republic of Brazil(As on for example the national website.)() (, ), is the largest country in America. It is the worlds fifth largest country, both by geographical area and by population with over 192 million people.(() It is the only Portuguese-speaking country in the Americas and the largest lusophone (Portuguese-speaking) country in the world.()Bounded by the Ocean on the east, Brazil has a coastline of .( It is bordered on the north by Venezuela, Guyana, Suriname and the French overseas region of Guiana; on the northwest by Colombia; on the west by Bolivia and Peru; on the southwest by Argentina and Paraguay and on the south by Uruguay. Numerous archipelagos form part of Brazilian territory, such as de Noronha, Atoll, Saint Peter and Paul Rocks, and and Martim Vaz.( It borders all other South American countries except Ecuador and Chile.Brazil was a colony of Portugal from the landing of lvares Cabral in 1500 until 1815, when it was elevated to the rank of kingdom and the Kingdom of Portugal, Brazil and the Algarves was formed. The colonial bond was in fact broken in 1808, when the capital of the Portuguese colonial Empire was transferred from Lisbon to Rio de Janeiro, after Napoleon invaded Portugal.() The independence from the United Kingdom of Portugal, Brazil and the Algarves was achieved in 1822. Initially independent as the of Brazil, period when it was a state governed under a monarchy and a system, the country has been a presidential republic since 1889, after a military dtat proclaimed the Republic, although the bicameral legislature, now called Congress, dates back to 1824, when the first constitution was ratified.( Its current Constitution, formulated in 1988, defines Brazil as a Federal Republic.( ) The Federation is formed by the union of the Federal District, the 26 States, and the 5,564 Municipalities.(()The Brazilian economy is the worlds seventh largest economy by nominal GDP(World Development Indicators database (PDF file), World Bank, 7 October 2009.) and the eighth largest by power parity.() Brazil is one of the worlds fastest growing major economies. Economic reforms have given the country new international recognition.() Brazil is a founding member of the Nations, the G20, CPLP, Union, the of Ibero-American States, Mercosul and the of South American Nations, and is one of the BRIC countries. Brazil is also home to a diversity of wildlife, environments, and extensive resources in a variety of protected habitats.(EtymologyThe etymology of Brazil remains unclear. Traditionally, the word Brazil comes from brazilwood, a timber tree that many sailors traded from Brazilian regions to Europe in the 16th century.( Eduardo Bueno, Brasil: uma Histria (So Paulo: tica, 2003; ISBN 8508082134), p.36.) In Portuguese brazilwood is called pau-brasil, with the word brasil commonly given the etymology red like an ember, formed from Latin brasa (ember) and the suffix -il (from -iculum or -ilium).(CNRTL  Centre National de Ressources Textuelles et Lexicales )(Michaelis  Moderno Dicionrio da Lngua Portuguesa )(iDicionrio Aulete ) This theory is taught as official in schools of Brazil and Portugal.However, the Brazilian scholar Jos Adelino da Silva Azevedo has postulated that the word is much older, either of Celtic or Phoenician origin. The Phoenicians traded a red dye extracted from a mineral mined in Celtic lands, from Iberia to Ireland.( Repblica Federativa do Brasil. Consulted on October 9, 2010.) In mythology there is a Western island called Hy-Brazil, and this is seen by some, including the writer and philologist J.R.R. Tolkien,(J. R. R., On Fairy Stories, (London: George Allen & Unwin, 1964) p. 13. ,- Tolkien refers to the theory as well established in his 1947 essay.) as one of the most likely etymological sources for the name Brazil. The same theory was also advanced by 16th century scholars.(In the language, an official language of Paraguay, Brazil is called Pindorama. This was the name the natives gave to the region, meaning land of the palm trees.HistoryPortuguese colonizationThe land now called Brazil was claimed by Portugal in April 1500, on the arrival of the Portuguese fleet commanded by lvares Cabral.(Boxer, p. 98.) The Portuguese encountered stone age natives divided into several tribes, most of whom spoke languages of the TupiGuarani family, and fought among themselves.(Boxer, p. 100.)Though the first settlement was founded in 1532, colonization was effectively begun in 1534, when Dom Joo III divided the territory into twelve hereditary captaincies,(Boxer, pp. 100101.)(Skidmore, p. 27.) but this arrangement proved problematic and in 1549 the king assigned a Governor-General to administer the entire colony.((Boxer, p. 101.) The Portuguese assimilated some of the native tribes(Boxer, p. 108) while others were enslaved or exterminated in long wars or by European diseases to which they had no immunity.(Boxer, p. 102.)(Skidmore, pp. 30, 32.) By the mid-16th century, sugar had become Brazils most important export((Skidmore, p. 36.) and the Portuguese imported African slaves(Boxer, p. 110)(Skidmore, p. 34.) to cope with the increasing international demand.((Skidmore, pp. 3233.)File:Meirelles-primeiramissa2.jpg|thumb|left|The first mass in Brazil, 1500.Through wars against the French, the Portuguese slowly expanded their territory to the southeast, taking de Janeiro in 1567, and to the northwest, taking So Lus in 1615.(Bueno, pp. 8081.) They sent military expeditions to the Amazon rainforest and conquered British and Dutch strongholds,(Facsimiles of multiple original documents relating about the events in Brazil in the 17th century that led to a Dutch influence and their final defeat) founding villages and forts from 1669.(Calmon, p. 294.) In 1680 they reached the far south and founded Sacramento on the bank of the Rio de la Plata, in the Eastern Strip region (present-day Uruguay).(Bueno, p. 86.)At the end of the 17th century, sugar exports started to decline(Boxer, p. 164.) but beginning in the 1690s, the discovery of gold by explorers in the region that would later be called Gerais (General Mines) in current Grosso and Gois, saved the colony from imminent collapse.(Boxer, pp. 168, 170.) From all over Brazil, as well as from Portugal, thousands of immigrants came to the mines.(Boxer, p. 169.)The Spanish tried to prevent Portuguese expansion into the territory that belonged to them according to the 1494 Treaty of Tordesillas, and succeeded in conquering the Eastern Strip in 1777. However, this was in vain as the Treaty of San Ildefonso, signed in the same year, confirmed Portuguese sovereignty over all lands proceeding from its territorial expansion, thus creating most of the current Brazilian borders.(Boxer, p. 207.)In 1808, the Portuguese royal family and the majority of the Portuguese nobility, fleeing the troops of the French Emperor I that were invading Portugal and most of Europe, established themselves in the city of Rio de Janeiro, which thus became the seat of the entire Empire.(Boxer, p. 213.) In 1815 Dom Joo VI, then regent on behalf of his incapacitated mother, elevated Brazil from colony to sovereign Kingdom united with Portugal.( In 1809 the Portuguese invaded Guiana (which was returned to France in 1817)(Bueno, p. 145.) and in 1816 the Eastern Strip, subsequently renamed Cisplatina.(Calmon (2002), p. 191.)File:Pelourinho.jpg|thumb|The public flogging of a slave in de Janeiro. From Jean-Baptiste Debret, Voyage Pittoresque et Historique au Bresil (18341839).Independence and EmpireKing Joo VI returned to Europe on 26 April 1821, leaving his elder son Prince Pedro de Alcntara as regent to rule Brazil.(Lustosa, pp. 109110) The Portuguese government attempted to turn Brazil into a colony once again, thus depriving it of its achievements since 1808.(Lustosa, pp. 117119) The Brazilians refused to yield and Prince Pedro stood by them declaring the countrys independence from Portugal on 7 September 1822.(Lustosa, pp. 150153) On 12 October 1822, Pedro was declared the first Emperor of Brazil and crowned Dom Pedro I on 1 December 1822.(Vianna, p. 418)ou Morte.jpg|thumb|left|Declaration of the Brazilian independence by Emperor Pedro I on 7 September 1822.At that time most Brazilians were in favour of a monarchy and republicanism had little support.(Hendrik Kraay apud Lorenzo Ald, Revista de Histria da Biblioteca Nacional, issue 50, year 5 (Rio de Janeiro: SABIN, 2009), p. 20)(Srgio Buarque de Holanda, O Brasil Monrquico: o processo de emancipao, 4th ed. (So Paulo: Difuso Europia do Livro, 1976), p. 403) The subsequent Brazilian War of Independence spread through almost the entire territory, with battles in the northern, northeastern, and southern regions.(Digues 2004, pp. 168, 164, 178) The last Portuguese soldiers surrendered on 8 March 1824(Digues 2004, pp. 179180) and independence was recognized by Portugal on 29 August 1825.(Lustosa, p. 208)The first Brazilian constitution was promulgated on 25 March 1824, after its acceptance by the municipal councils across the country.(Vianna, p. 140)(Jos Murilo de Carvalho, A Monarquia brasileira (Rio de Janeiro: Ao Livro Tcnico, 1993), p. 23)(Calmon (2002), p. 189)(Vainfas, p. 170) Pedro I abdicated on 7 April 1831 and went to Europe to reclaim his daughters crown, leaving behind his five year old son and heir, who was to become Dom Pedro II.(Lyra (v.1), p. 17) As the new emperor could not exert his constitutional prerogatives until he reached maturity, a regency was created.(Carvalho 2007, p. 21)Disputes between political factions led to rebellions and an unstable, almost anarchical, regency.(Miriam Dohlnikoff, Pacto imperial: origens do federalismo no Brasil do sculo XIX (So Paulo: Globo, 2005), p. 206) It is estimated that from 30 to 40% of the population of the Province of Gro-Par died during the Cabanagem revolt.(A hora da desforra, por Jlio Jos Chiavenato, Revista Histria Viva, n 45, pginas 84 a 91.) The rebellious factions, however, were not in revolt against the monarchy,(Carvalho (2007), p. 43)(Souza, p. 326) even though some declared the secession of the provinces as independent republics, but only so long as Pedro II was a minor.(Janotti, pp. 171172) Because of this, Pedro II was prematurely declared of age and Brazil was to enjoy nearly half a century of internal peace and rapid material progress.(Munro, p. 273)File:Americo-ava.jpg|thumb|right|Brazilian forces (in blue uniform) engage the Paraguayan army (some in red uniform and other shirtless) during the of the Triple Alliance.Despite the  loss of Cisplatina in 1828 when it became an independent nation known as Uruguay,(Barman (1999), pp.18, 27) Brazil won three international wars during the 58-year reign of Pedro II (the War, the War and the of the Triple Alliance, which left over 50,000 dead)(Lyra (v.1), pp. 164, 225, 272) and witnessed the consolidation of democracy, mainly due to successive elections and unrestricted of the press.(Carvalho (2007), pp. 9, 222) Most importantly, slavery was extinguished after a slow but steady process that began with the end of the international traffic in slaves in 1850(Lyra (v.1), p. 166) and ended with the complete abolition of slavery in 1888.(Lyra (v.3), p. 62) The slave population had been in decline since Brazils independence: in 1823, 29% of the Brazilian population were slaves but by 1887 this had fallen to 5%.(Vainfas, p. 18)When the monarchy was overthrown on 15 November 1889( there was little desire in Brazil to change the of government(George Ermakoff, Rio de Janeiro  18401900  Uma crnica fotogrfica (Rio de Janeiro: G. Ermakoff Casa Editorial, 2006), p. 189) and Pedro II was at the height of his popularity among his subjects.(Schwarcz, p. 444)(Vainfas, p. 201) However, he bore prime, perhaps sole, responsibility for his own overthrow.(Barman (1999), p. 399) After the death of his two sons, Pedro believed that the imperial regime was destined to end with him.(Barman (1999), p. 130) He cared little for the regimes fate(Lyra (v.3), p. 126)(Barman (1999), p. 361) and so neither did anything, nor allowed anyone else to do anything, to prevent the military coup, backed by former slave owners who resented the abolition of slavery.(Ricardo Salles, Nostalgia Imperial (Rio de Janeiro: Topbooks, 1996), p. 194  However, the monarchist reaction after the fall of the empire and the subsequent exile of the Imperial Family was not small and even less was its repression.)(Lyra (v.3), p. 99)(Schwarcz, pp. 450, 457)Early republicFile:Revoluo de 1930.jpg|thumb|The Brazilian coup dtat of 1930 raised Vargas (center with military uniform but no hat) to power. He ruled the country for fifteen years.At the beginning of the republican government it was little more than a military dictatorship,(Munro, p. 280) and the new constitution restricted political rights, such as the right to vote,(Richard W. Flournoy & Manley O. Hudson; A Collection of nationality laws of various countries, as contained in Constitutions, Statutes and Treaties University Press 1929 ISBN 0-8377-0544-4 Page 48)(Mortimer Sellers & Tadeusz Tomaszewski; The Rule of Law in Comparative Perspective Springer Science+Business Media BV 2010 Chapter 8.3.2, pages 113117) yet provided for direct elections to be held in 1894.(Herbert F. Wright; The constitutions of the states at war 19141918 U.S. Govt. Print. Office 1919; in 1891s Brazilian constitution See article 43  4th and art.47) However, already in 1891, from the unfoldings of the encilhamento  bubble(Gail D. Triner; Banking and economic development: Brazil, 18891930 Palgrave 2000 ISBN 0-312-23399-X Pages 4474)(Levine; Robert M. Vale of Tears: Revisiting the Canudos Massacre in Northeastern Brazil, 18931897 University of California Press 1995  ISBN 0520203437 Pages 3637; 55(last paragraph) and 330) and of  the 1st naval revolt, the country entered in a prolonged cycle of financial, social and political instability, that would extend until the 1920s keeping the country plagued by several rebellions, both civilian(See Levine 1995, Chapter 4)(Sevcenko; Nicolau A Revolta da Vacina  Cosac Naify 2010 ISBN 9788575038680)(Barman, Roderick J. Millenarian Vision, Capitalist Reality: Brazils Contestado Rebellion, 19121916 Canadian Journal of History December 1, 1995 University of Saskatchewan Vol30 Nr3 Pg542) as military,(E. Bradford Burns; A History of Brazil Columbia University Press 1993 ISBN 9780231079556 from 2nd paragraph of p242 to p245)(Roland, Maria Ins; A Revolta da Chibata  Saraiva 2000 ISBN 8502030957)(Woodward; James P. A Place in Politics: So Paulo, Brazil, from Seigneurial Republicanism to Regionalist Revolt Duke University Press Books 2009 ISBN 0822343290 Chapter 4) which little by little undermined the regime in a such extent, that by 1930 it was possible to the defeated presidential candidate Vargas, supported by the majority of military,(Paul F. Brandwein; The social sciences: concepts and values, Volume 6 Harcourt, Brace & World 1970 Page 389) lead a coup dtat and assume the presidency.(Skidmore, p. 154)Vargas and the military, who were supposed to assume the government temporarily to implement democratic reforms related to 1891s Constitution, closed the Congress and ruled with emergency powers, replacing the states governors with their supporters.(Skidmore, pp. 155156)(Bueno, pp. 328 and 331) Under the Claiming of the broken promises of changing, in 1932 the oligarchy of So Paulo tried to regain the power(Bradford Burns 1993, Ibidem p352) and in 1935 the Communists rebelled,(Fausto (2005), p. 249) having both been defeated. However, the communist threat served as an excuse for Vargas to preclude elections launching another coup dtat in 1937, creating a full dictatorship(Fausto (2005), p. 267)(Skidmore, p. 162)(Bueno, p. 336)(Skidmore, p. 164) In May 1938, there was another failed attempt to takeover the power by local fascists.(Patricia Baum; Dictators of Latin America Putnam 1972 Page 74)(Frank M. Colby, Allen L. Churchill, Herbert T. Wade & Frank H. Vizetelly; The New international year book Dodd, Mead & Co. 1989 Page 102 The Fascist Revolt)In policy, the success in resolving border disputes with neighboring countries(David R. Mares; Violent peace: militarized interstate bargaining in Latin America University Press 2001 Chapter 5 Page 125) in the early years of this period, was followed by a failed attempt to permanently exert a prominent role in the of Nations(Charles Howard Ellis; The origin, structure & working of the League of Nations The LawBook Exchange Ltd 2003 Pages: 105 3rd paragraph and 145 1st one) after military involvement in War I.(Scheina, Robert L. Latin Americas Wars Vol.II: The Age of the Professional Soldier, 19002001. Potomac Books, 2003 ISBN 1574884522 Part 4; Chapter 5  World War I and Brazil, 191718)(M.Sharp, I.Westwell & J.Westwood; History of World War I, Volume 1  Marshall Cavendish Corporation 2002 page 97)(Barman 1999, Ibidem Page405 2nd paragraph)Notwithstanding, Brazil remained neutral at the beginning of War II until the Pan-American Conference of January 1942 when Brazil stood alongside the U.S.A. severing diplomatic relations with the powers.(Mnica Hirst & Andrew Hurrell; The United States and Brazil: a long road of unmet expectations Taylor & Francis Books 2005 ISBN 0-415-95066-X Pages 4 & 5) In retaliation, Germany and Fascist Italy extended their warfare against Brazil, which led the country to enter the war on the allied side in August of that year.(See Scheina, 2003 Part 9; Chapter 17  World War II, Brazil and Mexico, 194245)(Thomas M. Leonard & John F. Bratzel; Latin America during World War II Rowman & Littlefield Publishers Inc. 2007 Page 150)With the allied victory in 1945 and the end of the Nazi-fascist regimes in Europe, Vargass position became unsustainable and he was swiftly overthrown in another military coup.(Fausto (2005), p. 281) Democracy was reinstated and General Gaspar Dutra was elected president taking office in 1946.(Skidmore, pp. 182183) Having returned to power democratically elected at the end of 1950, Vargas committed suicide in August 1954 amid a political crisis.(Bueno, pp. 346347)(Skidmore, pp. 188194)Contemporary eraFile:Inauguration of Luiz Incio Lula da Silva in 2003.jpeg|thumb|The transition from Henrique Cardoso to Lus Incio Lula da Silva indicated that Brazil had finally succeeded in achieving its long-sought political stability.Several brief interim governments succeeded after Vargass suicide.(Skidmore, p. 201) Juscelino Kubitscheck became president in 1956 and assumed a conciliatory posture towards the political opposition that allowed him to govern without major crises.(Skidmore, pp. 202203) The economy and industrial sector grew remarkably,(Skidmore, p. 204) but his greatest achievement was the construction of the new capital city of Braslia, inaugurated in 1960.(Skidmore, pp. 204205) His successor was Quadros, who resigned in 1961 less than a year after taking office.(Skidmore, pp. 209210) His vice-president, Goulart, assumed the presidency, but aroused strong political opposition(Skidmore, p. 210) and was deposed in April 1964 by a coup that resulted in a military regime.(Fausto (2005), p. 397)The new regime was intended to be transitory(Gaspari, A Ditadura Envergonhada, pp. 141142.) but it gradually closed in on itself and became a full dictatorship with the promulgation of the Fifth Institutional Act in 1968.(Gaspari, A Ditadura Envergonhada, p. 35.) The repression of the dictatorships opponents, including urban guerrillas,(Elio Gaspari, A ditadura escancarada (So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 2002), p. 193.) was harsh, but not as brutal as in other Latin American countries.(Skidmore, p. 239) Due to the extraordinary economic growth, known as an economic miracle, the regime reached its highest level of popularity in the years of repression.(Fausto (2005), p. 422)General Geisel became president in 1974 and began his project of re-democratization through a process that he said would be slow, gradual and safe.(Bueno, p. 379.)(Fausto (2005), p. 455.) Geisel ended the military indiscipline that had plagued the country since 1889,(Gaspari, A Ditadura Envergonhada, pp. 3435.) as well as the torture of political prisoners, censorship of the press,(Gaspari, A Ditadura Envergonhada, pp. 3536.) and finally, the dictatorship itself, after he extinguished the Fifth Institutional Act.( However, the military regime continued, under his chosen successor General Joo Figueiredo, to complete the transition to full democracy.(Bueno, p. 382.)The civilians fully returned to power in 1985 when Sarney assumed the presidency(Fausto (2005), p. 460.) but, by the end of his term, he had become extremely unpopular due to the uncontrollable economic crisis and unusually high inflation.(Fausto (2005), pp. 464465.) Sarneys unsuccessful government allowed the election in 1989 of the almost unknown Fernando Collor, who was subsequently impeached by the National Congress in 1992.(Fausto (2005), pp. 465, 475.) Collor was succeeded by his Vice-President Franco, who appointed Henrique Cardoso as Minister of Finance.Cardoso produced a highly successful Real (Royal or Real Plan)(The name of the current Brazilian currency came both from the Real Unity of Value (a transition currency) and from an older currency that existed until 1942. In Portuguese it is called Real, meaning royal, as it originated in Portugal, then a monarchy (Skidmore, p. 311).) that granted stability to the Brazilian economy(Fausto (2005), p. 482.) and he was elected as president in 1994 and again in 1998.(Fausto (2005), p. 474.) The peaceful transition of power to Lus Incio Lula da Silva, who was elected in 2002 and re-elected in 2006, proved that Brazil had finally succeeded in achieving its long-sought political stability.(Fausto (2005), p. 502.) Lula was succeeded in 2011 by the current president, Rousseff.()GeographyBrazil occupies a large area along the eastern coast of South America and includes much of the continents interior,( ) sharing land borders with Uruguay to the south; Argentina and Paraguay to the southwest; Bolivia and Peru to the west; Colombia to the northwest; and Venezuela, Suriname, Guyana and the French overseas department of Guiana to the north. It shares a border with every country in South America except for Ecuador and Chile. It also encompasses a number of oceanic archipelagos, such as de Noronha, Atoll, Saint Peter and Paul Rocks, and and Martim Vaz.( Its size, relief, climate, and natural resources make Brazil geographically diverse.( Including its Atlantic islands, Brazil lies between latitudes 6N and 34S, and longitudes 28 and 74W.Brazil is the fifth largest country in the world, after Russia, Canada, China and the States, and third largest in the Americas; with a total area of ,(Official Area (In Portuguese) IBGE: Instituto Brasileiro de Geografia e Estatstica. Retrieved 2010-01-08.) including  of water.( It spans three zones; from UTC-4 in the western states, to UTC-3 in the eastern states (and the official time of Brazil) and UTC-2 in the Atlantic islands.()Brazilian topography is also diverse and includes hills, mountains, plains, highlands, and scrublands. Much of the terrain lies between  and  in elevation.( ) The main upland area occupies most of the southern half of the country.( The northwestern parts of the plateau consist of broad, rolling terrain broken by low, rounded hills.(The southeastern section is more rugged, with a complex mass of ridges and ranges reaching elevations of up to .( These ranges include the Mantiqueira and Espinhao mountains and the do Mar.( In the north, the Guiana Highlands form a major divide, separating rivers that flow south into the Basin from rivers that empty into the Orinoco River system, in Venezuela, to the north. The highest point in Brazil is the da Neblina at , and the lowest is the Atlantic Ocean.(Brazil has a dense and complex system of rivers, one of the worlds most extensive, with eight major drainage basins, all of which drain into the Atlantic.( ) Major rivers include the Amazon (the worlds second-longest river and the largest in terms of volume of water), the Paran and its major tributary the Iguau (which includes the Falls), the Negro, So Francisco, Xingu, Madeira and Tapajs rivers.(ClimateThe climate of Brazil comprises a wide range of weather conditions across a large area and varied topography, but most of the country is tropical.( According to the Kppen system, Brazil hosts five major climatic subtypes: equatorial, tropical, semiarid, highland tropical, temperate, and subtropical. The different climatic conditions produce environments ranging from equatorial rainforests in the north and semiarid deserts in the northeast, to coniferous forests in the south and tropical savannas in central Brazil.() Many regions have starkly different microclimates.( )()An equatorial climate characterizes much of northern Brazil. There is no real season, but there are some variations in the period of the year when most rain falls.( Temperatures average ,( with more significant temperature variation between night and day than between seasons.(Over central Brazil rainfall is more seasonal, characteristic of a savanna climate.( This region is as extensive as the Amazon basin but has a very different climate as it lies farther south at a higher altitude.( In the interior northeast, seasonal rainfall is even more extreme. The semiarid climatic region generally receives less than  of rain,() most of which generally falls in a period of three to five months of the year() and occasionally less than this, creating long periods of drought.( Brazils 187778 Grande Seca (Great Drought), the most severe ever recorded in Brazil,(Drought, Smallpox, and Emergence of Leishmania braziliensis in Northeastern Brazil. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).) caused approximately half a million deaths.( Grda, C.: Famine: A Short History. Princeton University Press.) The one from 1915 was devastating too.(Inland fishery enhancements. FAO.)South of Bahia, near So Paulo, the distribution of rainfall changes, with rain falling throughout the year .( The south enjoys temperate conditions, with cool winters and average annual temperatures not exceeding ;( winter frosts are quite common, with occasional snowfall in the higher areas.((BiodiversityFile:Anavilhanas1.jpg|thumb|The Rainforest, the largest tropical forest in the world.Brazils large territory comprises different ecosystems, such as the Rainforest, recognized as having the greatest biological diversity in the world,() with the Forest and the Cerrado, sustaining the greatest biodiversity.( ) In the south, the Araucaria pine forest grows under temperate conditions.(The rich wildlife of Brazil reflects the variety of natural habitats. Much of it, however, remains largely undocumented, and new species are regularly found. Scientists estimate that the total number of plant and animal species in Brazil could approach four million.(Larger mammals include pumas, jaguars, ocelots, rare bush dogs, and foxes; peccaries, tapirs, anteaters, sloths, opossums, and armadillos are abundant. Deer are plentiful in the south, and many species of World monkeys are found in the northern rain forests.(() Concern for the environment has grown in response to global interest in environmental issues.( )EnvironmentThe natural heritage of Brazil is severely threatened by cattle ranching and agriculture, logging, mining, resettlement, oil and gas extraction, over-fishing, wildlife trade, dams and infrastructure, water contamination, change, fire, and species.( In many areas of the country, the natural environment is threatened by development.() Construction of highways has opened up previously remote areas for agriculture and settlement; dams have flooded valleys and inundated wildlife habitats; and mines have scarred and polluted the landscape.(() At least 70 dams are said to be planned for the Amazon region, including controversial Belo Monte hydroelectric dam.(Brazil grants environmental licence for Belo Monte dam. BBC News. February 2, 2010.)PoliticsFile:Congresso Nacional.jpg|right|thumb|The National Congress in Braslia, the capital of Brazil.The Brazilian Federation is the indissoluble union of three distinct political entities: the States, the Municipalities and the Federal District.( The Union, the states and the Federal District, and the municipalities, are the spheres of government. The Federation is set on five fundamental principles:( sovereignty, citizenship, dignity of human beings, the social values of labour and freedom of enterprise, and political pluralism. The classic tripartite branches of government (executive, legislative, and judicial under the checks and balances system), is formally established by the Constitution.( The executive and legislative are organized independently in all three spheres of government, while the judiciary is organized only at the federal and state/Federal District spheres.All members of the executive and legislative branches are directly elected.()()() Judges and other judicial officials are appointed after passing entry exams.( Brazil has a system for most of its history. Voting is compulsory for the literate between 18 and 70 years old and optional for illiterates and those between 16 and 18 or beyond 70.( Together with several smaller parties, four political parties stand out: Workers Party (PT), Brazilian Social Democracy Party (PSDB), Democratic Movement Party (PMDB), and Democrats (DEM). Almost all governmental and administrative functions are exercised by authorities and agencies affiliated to the Executive.The form of government is that of a democratic republic, with a system.( The president is both of state and of government of the Union and is elected for a four-year term,( with the possibility of re-election for a second successive term. The current president is Rousseff who was inaugurated on January 1, 2011.(Leftist Lula wins Brazil election BBC News. Accessed 17 May 2007) The President appoints the Ministers of State, who assist in government.( Legislative houses in each political entity are the main source of law in Brazil. The National Congress is the Federations bicameral legislature, consisting of the Chamber of Deputies and the Federal Senate. Judiciary authorities exercise jurisdictional duties almost exclusively.Fifteen political parties are represented in Congress. It is common for politicians to switch parties, and thus the proportion of congressional seats held by particular parties changes regularly. The largest political parties are the Workers Party (PT), Democrats (DEM), Brazilian Democratic Movement Party (PMDB-center), Social Democratic Party (PSDB), Progressive Party (PP), Brazilian Labor Party (PTB), Liberal Party (PL), Brazilian Socialist Party (PSB), Popular Socialist Party (PPS), Democratic Labor Party (PDT), and the Communist Party of Brazil (PCdoB).()LawBrazilian law is based on Roman-Germanic traditions(The Brazilian Legal System, Organization of American States. Accessed 17 May 2007.) and civil law concepts prevail over common law practice. Most of Brazilian law is codified, although non-codified statutes also represent a substantial part, playing a complementary role. Court decisions set out interpretive guidelines; however, they are seldom binding on other specific cases. Doctrinal works and the works of academic jurists have strong influence in law creation and in law cases.The legal system is based on the Federal Constitution, which was promulgated on 5 October 1988, and is the fundamental law of Brazil. All other legislation and court decisions must conform to its rules.(Jos Afonso da Silva, Curso de Direito Constitucional Positivo (Malheiros, 2004; ISBN 85-7420-559-1), p.  46.) , there have been 53 amendments. States have their own constitutions, which must not contradict the Federal Constitution.(Silva, Curso de Direito Constitucional Positivo, p.  592.) Municipalities and the Federal District have organic laws (), which act in a similar way to constitutions.((Government structure Brazilian Government. Accessed 17 May 2007.) Legislative entities are the main source of statutes, although in certain matters judiciary and executive bodies may enact legal norms.( Jurisdiction is administered by the judiciary entities, although in rare situations the Federal Constitution allows the Federal Senate to pass on legal judgments.( There are also specialized military, labor, and electoral courts.( The highest court is the Federal Court.This system has been criticised over the last few decades for the slow pace of decision making. Lawsuits on appeal may take several years to resolve, and in some cases more than a decade elapses before definitive rulings.(Miguel Glugoski and Odete Medauar, Nossos direitos nas suas mos, USP Journal, 2430 November 2003. Retrieved 17 May 2007.) Nevertheless, the Supreme Federal Tribunal was the first court in the world to transmit its sessions on television, and also via YouTube.(Diego Abreu, Primeira Corte do mundo a ter canal de vdeo no YouTube  o STF, G1.  Accessed October 12, 2009.)(STF: Primeira corte do mundo no Youtube. ESMA-PB.  Accessed October 12, 2009.) More recently, in December 2009, the Supreme Court adopted Twitter to display items on the day planner of the ministers, to inform the daily actions of the Court and the most important decisions made by them.(Pgina do STF no Twitter est no ar (12/01/009). STF Official Website.  Consulted on December 5, 2009.)Brazil continues to have high crime rates in a number of statistics, despite recent improvements. More than 500,000 people have been killed by firearms in Brazil between 1979 and 2003, according to a new report by the Nations.() In 2010, there were 473,600 people incarcerated in Brazilian prisons and jails.()Foreign relationsPalace, headquarters of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.Brazil is a political and economic leader in Latin America.(Maria Regina Soares de Lima and Mnica Hirst, Brazil as a regional power: Action, choice and responsibilities, International Affairs 82 (2006) 2140. Retrieved June 22, 2007.)(Luiz Alberto Moniz Bandeira, Brazil as a regional power, Sage Journals Online. Retrieved June 22, 2007.) However, social and economic problems have prevented it from becoming an effective global power.(Ral Zibechi, Difficult Path Funders Network on Trade and Globalization. Retrieved June 22, 2007.) Between 1945 and 1990, both democratic and governments sought to expand Brazils influence in the world by pursuing a state-led industrial policy and an independent policy. More recently, the country has aimed to strengthen ties with other American countries, and engage in multilateral diplomacy through the Nations and the of American States.(Universia Knowledge at Wharton website, Can Brazil Play a Leadership Role in the Current Round of Global Trade Talks? Wharton School, Pennsylvania. Retrieved June 22, 2007.)Brazils current foreign policy is based on the countrys position as a power in America, a leader among developing countries, and an emerging world power.(Clare Ribando, US-Brazil relations, Research Service. Retrieved on August 16, 2007.) In general, current Brazilian foreign policy reflects multilateralism, peaceful dispute settlement, and nonintervention in the affairs of other countries.(Georges D. Landau, The Decisionmaking Process in Foreign Policy: The Case of Brazil, Center for Strategic and International Studies: Washington DC: March 2003.) The Brazilian Constitution also determines that the country shall seek the economic, political, social and cultural integration of the nations of Latin America.((Zibechi, Brazil and the Difficult Path to Multilateralism. IRC Americas. Retrieved on August 16, 2007.)(Maria Regina Soares De Lima and Monica Hirst, Brazil as an intermediate state and regional power: action, choice and responsibilities, International Affairs 82 (1), 2140. Retrieved on August 16, 2007.)(Luiz Alberto Moniz Bandeira, Brazil as a Regional Power and Its Relations with the United States, University of Braslia. Retrieved on August 16, 2007.)An increasingly well-developed tool of Brazils foreign policy is providing aid as a donor to other countries.(Cabral and Weinstock 2010. Brazil: an emerging aid player. London: Development Institute) Brazil does not just use its growing economic strength to provide financial aid, but it also provides high levels of expertise and most importantly of all, a quiet non-confrontational diplomacy to improve governance levels.( Total aid is estimated to be around $1 billion per year that includes:(* technical cooperation of around $480 million ($30 million in 2010 provided directly by the Brazilian Cooperation Agency (ABC))* an estimated $450 million for in-kind expertise provided by Brazilian institutions specialising in technical cooperationIn addition, Brazil manages a peacekeeping mission in Haiti ($350 million) and makes in-kind contributions to the Food Programme ($300 million).( This is in addition to humanitarian assistance and contributions to multilateral development agencies. The scale of this aid places it on par with China and India and ahead of many western donors.( The Brazilian South-South aid has been described as a global model in waiting.(Cabral, Lidia 2010. Brazils development cooperation with the South: a global model in waiting. London: Development Institute)MilitaryThe armed forces of Brazil consist of the Army, the Navy, and the Air Force. With a total of 371,199 active personnel,() they comprise the largest armed force in Latin America.() The Army is responsible for land-based military operations and has 235,978 active personnel.()The Military Police (States Military Police) is described as an ancillary force of the Army by the constitution, but is under the control of each states governor.( The Navy is responsible for naval operations and for guarding Brazilian territorial waters. It is the oldest of the Brazilian armed forces and the only navy in Latin America to operate an aircraft carrier, the NAe So Paulo (formerly FS Foch of the Navy).() The Air Force is the aerial warfare branch of the Brazilian armed forces, and the largest air force in Latin America, with about 700 manned aircraft in service.()Administrative divisionsBrazil is a federation composed of 26 States, one federal district (which contains the capital city, Braslia) and municipalities.( States have autonomous administrations, collect their own taxes and receive a share of taxes collected by the Federal government. They have a governor and a unicameral legislative body elected directly by their voters. They also have independent Courts of Law for common justice. Despite this, states have much less autonomy to create their own laws than in the States. For example, criminal and civil laws can only be voted by the federal bicameral Congress and are uniform throughout the country.(The states and the federal district may be grouped into regions: Northern, Northeast, Central-West, Southeast and Southern. The Brazilian regions are merely geographical, not political or administrative divisions, and they do not have any specific form of government. Although defined by law, Brazilian regions are useful mainly for statistical purposes, and also to define the application of federal funds in development projects.Municipalities, as the states, have autonomous administrations, collect their own taxes and receive a share of taxes collected by the Union and state government.( Each has a mayor and an elected legislative body, but no separate Court of Law. Indeed, a Court of Law organized by the state can encompass many municipalities in a single justice administrative division called comarca (county).EconomyEmbraer 135.jpg|thumb|right|An Embraer ERJ-135 commercial jet. Brazil is the worlds third largest aircraft producer.Brazil is the largest national economy in America, the worlds seventh largest economy at market exchange rates and the eighth largest in power parity (PPP), according to the Monetary Fund and the Bank. Brazil has a economy with abundant natural resources. The Brazilian economy has been predicted to become one of the five largest in the world in the decades to come, the GDP per capita following and growing.() Its current GDP (PPP) per capita is $10,200, putting Brazil in the 64th position according to Bank data. It has large and developed agricultural, mining, manufacturing and service sectors, as well as a large labor pool.()Brazilian exports are booming, creating a new generation of tycoons.() Major export products include aircraft, equipment, automobiles, ethanol, textiles, footwear, ore, steel, coffee, juice, soybeans and beef.() The country has been expanding its presence in international financial and commodities markets, and is one of a group of four emerging economies called the BRIC countries.()Brazil pegged its currency, the real, to the U.S. dollar in 1994. However, after the East Asian financial crisis, the Russian default in 1998() and the series of adverse financial events that followed it, the Bank of Brazil temporarily changed its policy to a managed-float scheme while undergoing a crisis, until definitively changing the exchange regime to free-float in January 1999.()Brazil received an International Monetary Fund rescue package in mid-2002 of $30.4 billion,() then a record sum. Brazils central bank paid back the IMF loan in 2005, although it was not due to be repaid until 2006.() One of the issues the Central Bank of Brazil recently dealt with was an excess of speculative short-term capital inflows to the country, which may have contributed to a fall in the value of the U.S. dollar against the real during that period.() Nonetheless, direct investment (FDI), related to long-term, less speculative investment in production, is estimated to be $193.8 billion for 2007.() Inflation monitoring and control currently plays a major part in the Central banks role of setting out short-term rates as a monetary policy measure.()Between 1993 and 2010, 7012 mergers & acquisitions with a total known value of $707 billion with the involvement of Brazlian firms have been announced.() The year 2010 was a new record in terms of value with 115 bil. USD of transactions. The largest transaction with involvement of Brazilian companies has been: Cia Vale do Rio Doce acquired Inco in a tender offer valued at $18.9 billion USD.Components and energyFile:Itaipu noche.JPG|left|thumb|Dam, the worlds largest hydroelectric plant by energy generation and second-largest by installed capacity.Brazils economy is diverse,() encompassing agriculture, industry, and many services.(()()() The recent economic strength has been due in part to a global boom in commodities prices with exports from beef to soybeans soaring.(( Agriculture and allied sectors like forestry, logging and fishing accounted for 5.1% of the domestic product in 2007,() a performance that puts agribusiness in a position of distinction in terms of Brazils trade balance, in spite of barriers and subsidizing policies adopted by the developed countries.()( )The industry  from automobiles, steel and petrochemicals to computers, aircraft, and consumer durables accounted for 30.8% of the gross domestic product.( Industry, which is often technologically advanced, is highly concentrated in metropolitan So Paulo, Rio de Janeiro, Campinas, Alegre, and Horizonte.( )Brazil is the worlds tenth largest energy consumer with much of its energy coming from renewable sources, particularly hydroelectricity and ethanol; nonrenewable energy is mainly produced from oil and gas.( ) A global power in agriculture and natural resources, Brazil experienced tremendous economic growth over the past three decades.() It is expected to become a major oil producer and exporter, having recently made huge oil discoveries.()()() The governmental agencies responsible for the energy policy are the Ministry of Mines and Energy, the National Council for Energy Policy, the National Agency of Petroleum, Natural Gas and Biofuels, and the National Agency of Electricity.()()Science and technologyFile:Lnls.jpg|thumb|Brazilian National Laboratory of Synchrotron Light in Campinas.Technological research in Brazil is largely carried out in public universities and research institutes. But more than 73% of funding for basic research still comes from government sources.() Some of Brazils most notable technological hubs are the Oswaldo Cruz Institute, the Butantan Institute, the Air Forces Aerospace Technical Center, the Brazilian Agricultural Research Corporation and the INPE. The Space Agency has the most advanced space program in Latin America, with significant capabilities in launch vehicles, launch sites and satellite manufacturing.()Uranium is enriched at the Nuclear Fuel Factory to fuel the countrys energy demands and plans are underway to build the countrys first nuclear submarine.() Brazil is one of the three countries in Latin America() with an operational Synchrotron Laboratory, a research facility on physics, chemistry, material science and life sciences. And Brazil is the first and only Latin American country to have a semiconductor company with its own fab, the CEITEC.()TransportFile:BR116 Viaduto em Fortaleza.jpg|thumb|upright|BR-116 highway in the outskirts of Fortaleza.Brazil has a large and diverse transport network. Roads are the primary carriers of freight and passenger traffic. The road system totaled 1.98 million km (1.23 million mi) in 2002. The total of paved roads increased from 35,496 km (22,056 mi) in 1967 to 184,140 km (114,425 mi) in 2002.()File:Aeroporto do recife.jpg|thumb|left|AirportBrazils railway system has been declining since 1945, when emphasis shifted to highway construction. The total length of railway track was 30,875 km (19,186 mi) in 2002, as compared with 31,848 km (19,789 mi) in 1970. Most of the railway system belongs to the Federal Railroad Corp., with a majority government interest. The government also privatized seven lines in 1997.(Brazil  Transportation, Encyclopedia of the Nations (nationsencyclopedia.com).) The Paulo Metro was the first underground transit system in Brazil. The other metro systems are in de Janeiro, Alegre, Recife, Horizonte, Braslia, Teresina, Fortaleza, and Salvador.There are about 2,500 airports in Brazil, including landing fields: the second largest number in the world, after the United States.(Ociosidade atinge 70% dos principais aeroportos. globo.com, 12 August 2007. ) Paulo-Guarulhos International Airport, near So Paulo, is the largest and busiest airport, handling the vast majority of popular and commercial traffic of the country and connecting the city with virtually all major cities across the world.(Aeroporto Internacional de So Paulo/Guarulhos-Governador Andr Franco Montoro, infraaero.gov.br. )Coastal shipping links widely separated parts of the country. Bolivia and Paraguay have been given free ports at Santos. Of the 36 deep-water ports, Santos, Itaja, Rio Grande, Paranagu, Rio de Janeiro, Sepetiba, Vitria, Suape, Manaus and So Francisco do Sul are some of the most important.(Mercado Brasileiro Terminais de Contineres, Santos Brasil. )DemographicsThe population of Brazil, as recorded by the 2008 PNAD, was approximately 190 million(2008 PNAD, IBGE. Populao residente por situao, sexo e grupos de idade) (22.31 inhabitants per square kilometer), with a ratio of men to women of 0.95:1(2008 PNAD, IBGE. Populao residente por situao, sexo e grupos de idade) and 83.75% of the population defined as urban.(2008 PNAD, IBGE. Populao residente por situao, sexo e grupos de idade.) The population is heavily concentrated in the Southeastern (79.8 million inhabitants) and Northeastern (53.5 million inhabitants) regions, while the two most extensive regions, the Center-West and the North, which together make up 64.12% of the Brazilian territory, have a total of only 29.1 million inhabitants.Brazils population increased significantly between 1940 and 1970, due to a decline in the rate, even though the rate underwent a slight decline. In the 1940s the annual population growth rate was 2.4%, rising to 3.0% in the 1950s and remaining at 2.9% in the 1960s, as life expectancy rose from 44 to 54 years(Jos Alberto Magno de Carvalho, Crescimento populacional e estrutura demogrfica no Brasil Belo Horizonte: UFMG/Cedeplar, 2004 (PDF file), p.  5.) and to 72.6 years in 2007.()It has been steadily falling since the 1960s, from 3.04% per year between 19501960 to 1.05% in 2008 and is expected to fall to a negative value of 0.29% by 2050 () thus completing the transition.(Magno de Carvalho, Crescimento populacional e estrutura demogrfica no Brasil, pp. 78.)According to the National Research by Household Sample (PNAD) of 2008, 48.43% of the population (about 92 million) described themselves as White; 43.80% (about 83 million) as Brown (Multiracial), 6.84% (about 13 million) as Black; 0.58% (about 1.1 million) as Asian; and 0.28% (about 536 thousand) as Amerindian, while 0.07% (about 130 thousand) did not declare their race.(2008 PNAD, IBGE. Populao residente por cor ou raa, situao e sexo.)In 2007, the National Indian Foundation reported the existence of 67 different uncontacted tribes, up from 40 in 2005. Brazil is believed to have the largest number of peoples in the world.(In Amazonia, Defending the Hidden Tribes, The Washington Post, 8 July 2007.)About 85% to 95% of Brazilians descend from the countrys indigenous peoples, Portuguese settlers, and African slaves.(Enciclopdia Barsa vol. 4, p. 230.) Since the arrival of the Portuguese in 1500, considerable intermarriage between these three groups has taken place. The brown population (as multiracial Brazilians are officially called; pardo in Portuguese, also colloquially moreno, or swarthy)(Coelho (1996), p. 268.)(Vesentini (1988), p. 117.) is a broad category that includes Caboclos (descendants of Whites and Indians), Mulattoes (descendants of Whites and Blacks) and Cafuzos (descendants of Blacks and Indians).((((Adas, Melhem. Panorama geogrfico do Brasil, 4th ed (So Paulo: Moderna, 2004), p. 268)(Azevedo (1971), pp. 23.)(Moreira (1981), p. 108.) Caboclos form the majority of the population in the Northern, Northeastern and Central-Western regions.(Enciclopdia Barsa, vol. 4, pp. 25455, 258, 265.) A large Mulatto population can be found in the eastern coast of the northeastern region from Bahia to Paraba((Azevedo (1971), pp. 7475.) and also in northern Maranho,(Enciclopdia Barsa, vol. 10 (Rio de Janeiro: Encyclopaedia Britannica do Brasil, 1987), p. 355.)(Azevedo (1971), p. 74.) southern Minas Gerais(Azevedo (1971), p. 161.) and in eastern Rio de Janeiro.(( From the 19th century, Brazil opened its borders to immigration. About five million people from over 60 countries migrated to Brazil between 1808 and 1972, most of them from Portugal, Italy, Spain, Germany, Japan and the Middle-East.(Maria Stella Ferreira-Levy, O papel da migrao internacional na evoluo da populao brasileira (1872 a 1972), Revista de Sade Pblica Volume 8, suplemento. June 1974. ) (1974). Table 2, p.  74.  available on scielo.br as a PDF file.)In 2008, the illiteracy rate was 11.48%(PNAD 2008, IBGE. Pessoas de 5 anos ou mais de idade por situao, sexo, alfabetizao e grupos de idade e grupos de idade.) and among the youth (ages 1519) 1.74%. It was highest (20.30%) in the Northeast, which had a large proportion of rural poor.(PNAD 2008, IBGE. Pessoas de 5 anos ou mais de idade por situao, sexo, alfabetizao e grupos de idade) Illiteracy was high (24.18%) among the rural population and lower (9.05%) among the urban population.(PNAD 2008, IBGE. Pessoas de 5 anos ou mais de idade por situao, sexo e alfabetizao.)ReligionbarsRoman Catholicism is the countrys predominant faith. Brazil has the worlds largest Catholic population.() According to the 2000 Demographic Census (the PNAD survey does not inquire about religion), 73.57% of the population followed Roman Catholicism; 15.41% Protestantism; 1.33% Kardecist spiritism; 1.22% other Christian denominations; 0.31% Afro-Brazilian religions; 0.13% Buddhism; 0.05% Judaism; 0.02% Islam; 0.01% Amerindian religions; 0.59% other religions, undeclared or undetermined; while 7.35% have no religion.(IBGE, Populao residente, por sexo e situao do domiclio, segundo a religio, Censo Demogrfico 2000. Acessado em 13 de dezembro de 2007)However, in the last ten years Protestantism, particularly Pentecostal Protestantism, has risen, while the proportion of Catholics has dropped sharply. Soon after Protestantism, Irreligion also have had a rise in Brazil, almost approximating itself to the 10% (which will means circa 19 million people) in the census. Boa Vista and Rio de Janeiro counts with the greatest proportional numbers of irreligiosity in Brazil as the state capital and federative unit, respectively.UrbanizationAccording to IBGE (Brazilian Institute of Geography and Statistics) urban areas already concentrate 84.35% of the population, while the Southeast region remains the most populated one, with over 80 million inhabitants ( ). The largest metropolitan areas in Brazil are So Paulo, Rio de Janeiro, and Belo Horizonte  all in the Southeastern Region  with 19.5, 11.5, and 5.1 million inhabitants respectively.(2008 PNAD, IBGE. Populao residente por situao, sexo e grupos de idade.) Almost all of the state capitals are the largest cities in their states, except for Vitria, the capital of Santo, and Florianpolis, the capital of Santa Catarina. There are also non-capital metropolitan areas in the states of So Paulo (Campinas, Santos and the Valley), Gerais (Steel Valley), Rio Grande do Sul (Sinos Valley), and Santa Catarina (Itaja Valley).( )LanguageFile:Museu da Lngua Portuguesa.jpg|left|thumb|of the Portuguese Language in Paulo, the first language museum in the world.The official language of Brazil is Portuguese,( which almost all of the population speaks and is virtually the only language used in newspapers, radio, television, and for business and administrative purposes. The exception to this is in the municipality of Gabriel da Cachoeira where Nheengatu, a currently endangered South American language with mostly Indigenous Brazilian languages lexicon and Portuguese-based grammar that once was a major franca in Brazil, has been granted co-official status with Portuguese.() Brazil is the only Portuguese-speaking nation in the Americas, making the language an important part of Brazilian national identity and giving it a national culture distinct from those of its Spanish-speaking neighbors.()Portuguese has had its own development, influenced by the Amerindian and African languages.( As a result, the language is somewhat different, mostly in phonology, from the language of Portugal and other Portuguese-speaking countries. These differences are comparable to those between American and English.()In 2008, the of Portuguese Language Countries (CPLP), which included representatives from all countries with Portuguese as the official language, reached an agreement on the reform of Portuguese into one international language, as opposed to two diverged dialects of the same language. All CPLP countries were given from 2009 until 2014 to adjust to the necessary changes.()Minority languages are spoken throughout the nation. One hundred and eighty Amerindian languages are spoken in remote areas and a number of other languages are spoken by immigrants and their descendants.( There are significant communities of German (mostly the Hunsrckisch, a High German language dialect) and Italian (mostly the dialect, of Venetian origin) speakers in the south of the country, both of which are influenced by the Portuguese language.()() Brazil is the first country in South America to offer Esperanto to High School students.()CultureThe core culture of Brazil is derived from Portuguese culture, because of its strong colonial ties with the Portuguese empire. Among other influences, the Portuguese introduced the language, Roman Catholicism and colonial architectural styles.() The culture was, however, also strongly influenced by African, indigenous and non-Portuguese European cultures and traditions.( ) Some aspects of Brazilian culture were influenced by the contributions of Italian, German and other European immigrants who arrived in large numbers in the South and Southeast of Brazil.( ) The indigenous Amerindians influenced Brazils language and cuisine; and the Africans influenced language, cuisine, music, dance and religion.()File:Machado-450.jpg|thumb|upright|right|de Assis, poet and novelist whose work extends to almost all genres, is widely regarded as the greatest Brazilian writer.(Candido; Antonio. (1970) Vrios escritos. So Paulo: Duas Cidades. p.18)art has developed since the 16th century into different styles that range from Baroque (the dominant style in Brazil until the early 19th century)(Leandro Karnal, Teatro da f: Formas de representao religiosa no Brasil e no Mxico do sculo XVI, So Paulo, Editora Hucitec, 1998; available on fflch.usp.br)(The Brazilian Baroque, Encyclopaedia Ita Cultural) to Romanticism, Modernism, Expressionism, Cubism, Surrealism and Abstractionism.Brazilian cinema dates back to the birth of the medium in the late 19th century and has gained a new level of international acclaim in recent years.( )MusicBrazilian music encompasses various regional styles influenced by African, European and Amerindian forms. It developed distinctive styles, among them samba, MPB, choro, Sertanejo, brega, forr, frevo, maracatu, nova, and ax.Literatureliterature dates back to the 16th century, to the writings of the first Portuguese explorers in Brazil, such as Vaz de Caminha, filled with descriptions of fauna, flora and natives that amazed Europeans that arrived in Brazil.() Brazil produced significant works in Romanticism  novelists like Manuel de Macedo and de Alencar wrote novels about love and pain. Alencar, in his long career, also treated Indigenous people as heroes in the Indigenist novels Guarany, Iracema, Ubirajara.(Brazilian Literature: An Introduction. Embassy of Brasil  Ottawa. Visited on November 2, 2009.)CuisineFile:Feijoada 01.jpg|thumb|left|Feijoada, a dish made with black beans, pork, rice, collard greens, cassava flour and orangeBrazilian cuisine varies greatly by region, reflecting the countrys mix of native and immigrant populations. This has created a national cuisine marked by the preservation of regional differences.() Examples are Feijoada, considered the countrys national dish;(Roger, Feijoada: The Brazilian national dish braziltravelguide.com.) and regional foods such as vatap, moqueca, polenta and acaraj.(Cascudo, Luis da Cmara. Histria da Alimentao no Brasil. So Paulo/Belo Horizonte: Editora USP/Itatiaia, l983.)Brazil has a variety of candies such as brigadeiros (chocolate fudge balls), cocada (a coconut sweet), beijinhos (coconut truffles and clove) and romeu e julieta (cheese with a guava jam known as goiabada). Peanut is used to make paoca, rapadura and p-de-moleque. Local common fruits like aa, cupuau, mango, papaya, cocoa, cashew, guava, orange, passionfruit, pineapple, and plum are turned in juices and used to make chocolates, popsicles and cream.(Freyre, Gilberto. Acar. Uma Sociologia do Doce, com Receitas de Bolos e Doces do Nordeste do Brasil. So Paulo, Companhia das Letras, 1997.)Popular snacks are pastel (a pastry), coxinha (chicken croquete), de queijo (cheese bread and cassava flour / tapioca), pamonha (corn and milk paste), esfirra (Lebanese pastry), kibbeh (from Arabic cuisine), empanada (pastry) and empada little salt pies filled with shrimps or hearth of palm.But the everyday meal consist mosty of and beans with beef and salad.(Barbosa, Lvia. Feijo com arroz e arroz com feijo: o Brasil no prato dos brasileiros. Horiz. antropol. online. 2007, vol.13, n.28 2011-03-09, pp. 87116 . Available from: scielo.br ISSN 0104-7183. doi: 10.1590/S0104-71832007000200005.) Its common to mix it with cassava flour (farofa). Fried potatoes, fried cassava, fried banana, fried meat and fried cheese are very often eaten in lunch and served in most typical restaurants.(Ferraccioli, Patrcia; Silveira, Eliane Augusta da.(2010) Cultural feeding influence on palative memories in the usual brazilian cuisine. Rev. enferm. UERJ;18(2):198203, abr.-jun. 2010. http://bases.bireme.br/cgi-bin/wxislind.exe/iah/online/?IsisScriptiah/iah.xis&srcgoogle&baseBDENF&langp&nextActionlnk&exprSearch18716&indexSearchID)The national beverage is coffee and cachaa is Brazils native liquor. Cachaa is distilled from sugar cane and is the main ingredient in the national cocktail, Caipirinha.Sports(soccer) is the most popular sport in Brazil.()The most popular sport in Brazil is football (soccer). The Brazilian national football team is ranked among the best in the world according to the World Rankings, and has won the World Cup tournament a record five times.() Basketball, volleyball, racing, and arts also attract large audiences. mens national volleyball team, for example, currently holds the titles of the World League, World Grand Champions Cup, World Championship and the World Cup. Others sports practiced in Brazil are tennis, handball, swimming, and gymnastics have found a growing number of enthusiasts over the last decades. Some sport variations have their origins in Brazil: beach football,() futsal (indoor football)() and footvolley emerged in Brazil as variations of football. In martial arts, Brazilians developed Capoeira,() tudo,() and Jiu-Jitsu.() In auto racing, three Brazilian drivers have won the One world championship eight times.()()()Brazil has hosted several high-profile international sporting events, including 134, the FIFA World Cup() and has been chosen to host the FIFA World Cup.() The Paulo circuit, Jos Carlos Pace, hosts the annual Grand Prix of Brazil.() So Paulo organized the IV Pan American Games in 1963,() and Rio de Janeiro hosted the XV Pan American Games in 2007.( On 2 October 2009, Rio de Janeiro was selected to host the 2016 Olympic Games, the first to be held in South America(Olympics 2016: Tearful Pele and weeping Lula greet historic win for Rio, Guardian, 2 October 2009.) and second in Latin America after Mexico.In May 2010 Brazil launched Brasil Internacional, an international station, initially broadcasting to 49 countries. Incio Lula da Silva, former President of Brazil, described its aim as presenting Brazil to the world.()See also*rankings of Brazil*of Brazilians*America Life Quality RankingsReferencesBibliographic* Azevedo, Aroldo. O Brasil e suas regies. So Paulo: Companhia Editora Nacional, 1971. * Barman, Roderick J. Citizen Emperor: Pedro II and the Making of Brazil, 18251891. Stanford: Stanford University Press, 1999. ISBN 0-8047-3510-7 * Boxer, Charles R.. O imprio martimo portugus 14151825. So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 2002. ISBN 8535902929 * Bueno, Eduardo. Brasil: uma Histria. So Paulo: tica, 2003.  ISBN 8508082134* Calmon, Pedro. Histria da Civilizao Brasileira. Braslia: Senado Federal, 2002. * Carvalho, Jos Murilo de. D. Pedro II. So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 2007. * Coelho, Marcos Amorim. Geografia do Brasil. 4th ed. So Paulo: Moderna, 1996. * Digues, Fernando. A revoluo braslica. Rio de Janeiro: Objetiva, 2004. *Enciclopdia Barsa. Volume 4: Batrquio  Camaro, Filipe. Rio de Janeiro: Encyclopdia Britannica do Brasil, 1987. * Fausto, Boris and Devoto, Fernando J. Brasil e Argentina: Um ensaio de histria comparada (18502002), 2nd ed. So Paulo: Editoria 34, 2005. ISBN 8573263083* Gaspari, Elio. A ditadura envergonhada. So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 2002. ISBN 8535902775 * Janotti, Aldo. O Marqus de Paran: incios de uma carreira poltica num momento crtico da histria da nacionalidade. Belo Horizonte: Itatiaia, 1990. * Lyra, Heitor. Histria de Dom Pedro II (18251891): Asceno (18251870). v.1. Belo Horizonte: Itatiaia, 1977. * Lyra, Heitor. Histria de Dom Pedro II (18251891): Declnio (18801891). v.3. Belo Horizonte: Itatiaia, 1977. * Lustosa, Isabel. D. Pedro I: um heri sem nenhum carter. So Paulo: Companhia das letras, 2006. ISBN 8535908072 * Moreira, Igor A. G. O Espao Geogrfico, geografia geral e do Brasil. 18. Ed. So Paulo: tica, 1981. * Munro, Dana Gardner. The Latin American Republics; A History. New York: D. Appleton, 1942. * Schwarcz, Lilia Moritz. As barbas do Imperador: D. Pedro II, um monarca nos trpicos. 2nd ed. So Paulo: Companhia das Letras, 1998. ISBN 8571648379 * Skidmore, Thomas E. Uma Histria do Brasil. 4th ed. So Paulo: Paz e Terra, 2003.  ISBN 8521903138* Souza, Adriana Barreto de. Duque de Caxias: o homem por trs do monumento. Rio de Janeiro: Civilizao Brasileira, 2008.  ISBN 9788520008645* Vainfas, Ronaldo. Dicionrio do Brasil Imperial. Rio de Janeiro: Objetiva, 2002. ISBN 8573024410 * Vesentini, Jos William. Brasil, sociedade e espao  Geografia do Brasil. 7th Ed. So Paulo: tica, 1988. * Vianna, Hlio. Histria do Brasil: perodo colonial, monarquia e repblica, 15th ed. So Paulo: Melhoramentos, 1994. Further reading* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * External links* Official Tourist Guide of Brazil* Brazilian Federal Government* Chief of State and Cabinet Members* Brazilian Institute of Geography and Statistics* * Brazil at UCB Libraries GovPubs* * Country Profile from the U.S. of Congress (1997)* * Video report on Brazil in 1961 Southeast  Ocean}} list }}ace:Brasilkbd:af:Brasilials:Brasilienam:ang:Brasilar:an:Brasilarc:roa-rup:Braziliafrp:Brsilast:Brasilgn:Pindoramaay:Wrasilaz:Braziliyabm:Brazilbn:zh-min-nan:Pa-seba:be:be-x-old:bcl:Brasilbi:Brazilbar:Brasilienbo:bs:Brazilbr:Brazilbg:ca:Brasilcv:ceb:Brasilcs:Brazliecbk-zam:Brasilco:Brasilecy:Brasilda:Brasilienpdc:Brasiliende:Brasiliendv:nv:Bwazldsb:Brazilskadz:et:Brasiiliael:eml:Brasiles:Brasileo:Braziloext:Brasileu:Brasilee:Brazilfa:hif:Brazilfo:Brasilfr:Brsilfy:Brazyljefur:BraslBhrasalVrasseelgag:Braziliyagd:Braisilgl:Brasilgan:gu:got:hak:P-s ko:haw:Palakilahy:hi:hsb:Brazilskahr:Brazilio:Braziliaig:Brazililo:Brazilbpy:id:Brasilia:Brasilie:Brasilos:xh:Brasilis:Brasilait:Brasilehe:jv:Brasilkl:Brazilkn:pam:Brazilka:ks:csb:Brazylskkk:kw:Brasilrw:Burezileky:sw:Brazilkv:ht:Brezilku:Brazllad:Brasilkrc:la:Brasilialv:Brazlijalb:Brasilienlt:Brazilijalij:Brasli:Brazielln:Braziljbo:razguelmo:Brasilhu:Brazliamk:mg:Brazilaml:mt:Brailltg:Brazilejamr:arz:mzn:ms:Brazilmwl:Brasilmn:my:nah:Brasilmrj:na:Bradirnl:Brazilinds-nl:Braziline:new:ja:nap:Brasilece:frr:Brasiilienpih:Breselno:Brasilnn:Brasilnrm:Brsinov:Brasiliaoc:Brasilmhr:uz:Braziliyapag:Brazilpnb:pap:Brazilps:km:pcd:Brsilpms:Brasilnds:Brasilienpl:Brazyliapt:Brasilkaa:Braziliyacrh:Brazilty:Brazilro:Braziliarmy:Brazilrm:Brasiliaqu:Brasilrue:ru:sah:se:Brasiliasa:sc:Brasilesco:Brazilstq:Brasiliensq:Braziliscn:Brasilisimple:Brazilsk:Brazliacu:sl:Brazilijaszl:Brazylijoso:Barasiilckb:srn:Brasilkondresr:sh:Brazilfi:Brasiliasv:Brasilientl:Brasilta:kab:Brazilroa-tara:Brasilett:te:tet:Brazlth:tg:tr:Brezilyatk:Braziliauk:ur:ug:za:Bahsihvec:Braxilvi:Brasilvo:Brasilnfiu-vro:Brasiiliawa:Braezizh-classical:vls:Braziliwar:Brasilwo:Breesilxmf:wuu:yi:yo:Brasilzh-yue:diq:Brezilyazea:Brezilibat-smg:Braziljzh:
3385
Black_Forest
Image:BlackForest-Position.svg|thumb|A map of Germany, showing the Black Forest in green.The Black Forest (, ) is a wooded range in Baden-Wrttemberg, southwestern Germany. It is bordered by the Rhine valley to the west and south. The highest peak is the Feldberg with an elevation of 1,493 metres (4,898 ft). The region is almost rectangular with a length of  and breadth of . Hence it has an area of approximately .  The name Schwarzwald, i.e. Black Forest, goes back to the Romans who referred to the thickly forested mountains there as Silva Nigra, i.e. Black Forest, because the dense growth of conifers in the forest blocked out most of the light inside the forest.GeologyThe Black Forest consists of a cover of sandstone on top of a core of gneiss and granites. Formerly it shared tectonic evolution with the nearby Mountains. Later during the Middle Eocene a rifting period affected the area and caused formation of the graben. During the last period of the glaciation, the Black Forest was covered by glaciers; several tarns (or lakes) such as the Mummelsee are remains of this period.RiversRivers in the Black Forest include the Danube (which originates in the Black Forest as the confluence of the Brigach and Breg rivers), the Enz, the Kinzig, the Murg, the Nagold, the Neckar, the Rench, and the Wiese. The Black Forest is part of the divide between the Ocean basin (drained by the Rhine) and the Sea drainage basin (drained by the Danube).List of highest mountains* Feldberg ()* Herzogenhorn ()* Belchen ()* Spiesshorn ()* Schauinsland ()* Kandel ()* Hochblauen ()* Hornisgrinde ()PoliticalAdministratively, the Black Forest belongs completely to the state of Baden-Wrttemberg and comprises the city of Pforzheim as well as the following districts (Kreise). In the north: Enz, Rastatt and Calw; in the middle: Freudenstadt, Ortenaukreis and Rottweil; in the south: Emmendingen, Schwarzwald-Baar, Breisgau-Hochschwarzwald, Lrrach and Waldshut.Ecology and economyThe forest mostly consists of pines and firs, some of which are grown in commercial monoculture. Similar to other forested regions, the Black Forest has had areas that were decimated by mass logging. Due to logging and land use changes the forest proper is only a fraction of its original size. The storm Lothar downed trees on hundreds of acres of mountaintops in 1999. This left some of the high peaks and scenic hills bare, with only primary growth shrubs and young fir trees.The main industry is tourism. In addition to the towns and monuments noted below, the Black Forest is crossed by numerous distance footpaths, including some of the first to be established. The long-distance path E1 crosses the Black Forest following the routes of some of the local long-distance paths. There are numerous shorter paths suitable for day walks, as well as biking and skiing trails. The total network of tracks amounts to around , and is maintained and overseen by a voluntary body, the Schwarzwaldverein (Black Forest Society), which has around 90,000 members (figures from Bremke, 1999, p. 9).Points of interestImage:Windbuchencom.jpg|thumb|Winter on Schauinsland: famous Windbuchen Beeches bent by the windThere are many old towns in the Black Forest. Popular tourist destinations include Freiburg, Calw (the birth town of Hesse), Gengenbach, Staufen, Schiltach, Haslach and Altensteig. Other popular destinations include such mountains as the Feldberg, the Belchen, the Kandel, and the Schauinsland; the Titisee and Schluchsee lakes; the Saints Waterfalls; the Waterfalls, not the highest, but the most famous waterfalls in Germany; and the gorge of the River Wutach.The Freilichtmuseum Vogtsbauernhof is an open-air museum that shows the life of sixteenth or seventeenth century farmers in the region, featuring a number of reconstructed Black Forest farms. The German Clock Museum in Furtwangen shows the history of the clock industry and of watchmakers.For drivers, the main route through the region is the rapid A5 (E35) motorway, but a variety of sign-posted scenic routes such as the Schwarzwald-Hochstrasse (, Baden-Baden to Freudenstadt), Schwarzwald Tlerstrasse (, the Murg and Kinzig valleys) or Badische Weinstrasse (Baden Wine Street, , a wine route from Baden-Baden to am Rhein) offers calmer driving along high roads.(http://travel.independent.co.uk/europe/article97082.ece) The last is a picturesque trip starting in the south of the Black Forest going north and includes numerous old wineries and tiny villages. Another, more specialized route is the Deutsche Uhrenstrae (German Clock Road),(http://www.deutsche-uhrenstrasse.de/sofindensieunsen.htm) a circular route which traces the horological history of the region.Due to the rich mining history dating from medieval times (the Black Forest was one of the most important mining regions of Europe circa 1100) there are many mines re-opened to the public. Such mines may be visited in the Kinzig valley, the Suggental, the Muenster valley, and around Todtmoos.The Black Forest was visited on several occasions by Count von Bismarck during his rule 1873-1890. Allegedly, he especially was interested in the Waterfalls.(http://books.google.com/books?idGOwOyUl7-TMC&pgPA147&lpgPA147&dqbismarck+triberg&sourcebl&otso0tRfEUt2Z&sigEddXNLXfR1TCIzsN2HxkV2MnM_4&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum4&ctresult) There is now a monument in Triberg dedicated to Bismarck, who apparently enjoyed the tranquility of the region, which was lacking at his residence in Berlin.FaunaIn addition to the expected kinds of wildlife to be found in a European forest area, the following types of animals may be observed in the Black Forest.(Enjoy nature with all the senses / Nature / Home / Inhalte - Schwarzwald Tourismus GmbH) Some of these animals include*Cattle: The Black Forest cattle belong to the rare breed of Hinterwlderberg cattle*The giant earthworm badensis is found only in the Black Forest region(Lamparski, 1985)*Black Forest Foxes are a breed of horse, previously indispensable for heavy field work*Eagles and owls can be seen at close rangeCultureDialects spoken in the Black Forest area are Alemannic and Swabian.FasnetThe German holiday of Fastnacht, or Fasnet, as it is known in the Black Forest region, occurs in the time leading up to Lent. On Rosenmontag, or the Monday before Ash Wednesday, crowds of people line the streets, wearing masks. One prominent style of mask is called the Black Forest Style, originating from the Black Forest Region.CraftsWood-carving is a traditional cottage industry in the region and carved ornaments now are produced in substantial numbers as souvenirs for tourists. clocks are a popular example; they have been made in the region since the early eighteenth century and much of their development occurred there.CulinaryForest ham originated from this region, and so, by name and reputation at least, did the Forest Cake. It also is known as the Black Forest Cherry Cake or Black Forest Gateau and is made with chocolate cake, cream, sour cherries and Kirsch.(http://www.europeancuisines.com/German-Schwarzwalder-Kirschtorte-Recipe-Black-Forest-Cake-Cherry-Kirsch) The Black Forest variety of Flammkuchen is a Badisch specialty made with ham, cheese and cream. Pfannkuchen, a crpe or crpe-like (Eierkuchen or Palatschinken) pastry, is also common. The Black Forest is also known for its long tradition in gourmet cuisine. No less than 17 Michelin starred restaurants are located in the region, among them two restaurants with 3 stars (Restaurants Bareiss and Schwarzwaldstube in Baiersbronn)( Michelin Restaurants. Via Michelin. Retrieved 18 June 2011) as well as the only restaurant in Germany that has been awarded a Michelin star every year since 1966. At Schwarzwald Hotel Adler in Husern, three generations of chefs from the same family have defended the award from the first year the Michelin guide selected restaurants in Germany until today.(The Michelin Guide and the Zumkeller Chefs. Schwarzwald Hotel Adler. Retrieved 18 June 2011)GalleryImage:Feldberg.JPG|The FeldbergImage:Blick ber den Mittleren Schwarzwald 2.JPG|A view in the Middle Black ForestImage:Auf dem Teisenkopf.jpg|Black ForestImage:titisee winter.jpg|Titisee, popular year-roundImage:clock_forest.jpg|The Black Forest is known for its native clockmakersImage:freistadt.jpg|The Minster in Freiburg, the regions biggest cityImage:kinzig.jpg|River Kinzig passing through the Black ForestImage:Mummelsee.jpg|MummelseeImage:Jugendherberge Schloss Ortenberg.jpg|Ortenberg Castle near Offenburg (now a youth hostel)Image:Avg-853-02.jpg|Black Forest Train near KarlsruheImage:Burg Hohenzollern mit Schwarzwald2.JPG|Castle; backdrop: Black ForestFile:BadenWurttemberg Holzinshaus tango7174.jpg|HolzinshausFile:BadenWurttemberg Schiltach1 tango7174.jpg|SchiltachSee also* Forest* Uhrenmuseum* of worlds largest cuckoo clocksNotesReferences*Bremke, N. (1999). Schwarzwald quer. Karlsruhe: Braun. ISBN 3-7650-8228-7*Lamparski, F. (1985). Der Einflu der Regenwurmart Lumbricus badensis auf Waldbden im Sdschwarzwald. Schriftenreihe des Institut fr Bodenkunde und Waldernhrungslehre der Albert-Ludwigs-Universitt Freiburg i. Br., 15. ISSN 0344-2691. English summary*German Wikipedia Pfannkuchen disambiguation*Barnes, K. J. (2007). A Rough Passage: Memories of an EmpireExternal links*Tourist Info*Information on Black Forest Clocksaf:Swartwoudals:Schwarzwaldang:SeartealdPrietabe:be-x-old:br:Schwarzwaldbg:Negracs:SchwarzwaldDduda:Schwarzwaldde:Schwarzwaldet:SchwarzwaldNegraArbaroBeltzafr:Fort-NoireWldFhoraois DhubhNegrako: ( )hr:Schwarzwaldis:SvartiskgurNeraka:mweusisilvalv:varcvaldelb:Schwarzwaldlt:varcvaldasWoudNegrahu:Fekete-erdmk:mr:nah:TllcuauhtlahWoudja:no:Schwarzwaldnn:Schwarzwaldpl:SchwarzwaldNegraNeagrru:sq:SchwarzwaldForestsk:Schwarzwaldsr:sh:Schwarzwaldfi:Schwarzwaldsv:Schwarzwaldtt:Ormantk:Schwarzwalduk:nga Itomzh:
3392
British_Columbia
Website  www.gov.bc.caBritish Columbia  (B.C. or BC) (, C.-B.) is the westernmost of Canadas provinces and is known for its natural beauty, as reflected in its Latin motto, Splendor sine occasu (Splendour without Diminishment). Its name was chosen by Queen Victoria in 1858. In 1871, it became the sixth province of Canada.The capital of British Columbia is Victoria, the fifteenth largest metropolitan region in Canada. The largest city is Vancouver, the third-largest area in Canada, the largest in Canada, and the third-largest in the Northwest.  In 2009, British Columbia had an estimated population of 4,419,974 (about two and a half million of whom were in Vancouver).  The province is currently governed by the Liberal Party, led by Premier Clark, who became leader as a result of the party election on February 26, 2011.British Columbias economy is largely resource-based. It is the endpoint of transcontinental highways and railways and the site of major Pacific ports, which enable international trade. Because of its mild weather, and despite the fact that less than 5% of its land is arable, the province is agriculturally rich, particularly in the Fraser and Okanagan Valleys. Its climate encourages recreation and tourism, though its economic mainstay has long been extraction, principally logging and mining.EtymologyThe provinces name was chosen by Queen Victoria when the of British Columbia, i.e. the Mainland, became a British colony in 1858.(Ged Martin, The Naming of British Columbia, Albion: A Quarterly Journal Concerned with British Studies, Vol. 10, No. 3 (Autumn, 1978), pp. 257263 in JSTOR) It refers to the District, the British name for the territory drained by the River, which has its origins and upper reaches in southeastern British Columbia, which was the namesake of the pre-Treaty Columbia Department of the Bay Company. Queen Victoria chose British Columbia to distinguish what was the British sector of the Columbia District from that of the States (American Columbia or Southern Columbia), which became the Territory in 1848 as a result of the treaty.GeographyBritish Columbia is bordered by the Ocean on the west, by the U.S. state of Alaska on the northwest, on the north by the Yukon and the Territories, on the east by the province of Alberta, and on the south by the U.S. states of Washington, Idaho, and Montana. The current southern border of British Columbia was established by the 1846 Treaty, although its history is tied with lands as far south as California. British Columbias land area is . British Columbias rugged coastline stretches for more than , and includes deep, mountainous fjords and about six thousand islands, most of which are uninhabited.British Columbias capital is Victoria, located at the southeastern tip of Island. The provinces most populous city is Vancouver, which is not on Vancouver Island but rather is located in the southwest corner of the mainland (an area often called the Mainland). Other major cities include Surrey, Burnaby, Coquitlam, Richmond, Delta, and Westminster in the Lower Mainland; Abbotsford, Meadows, Maple Ridge and Langley in the Valley; Nanaimo on Island; and Kelowna and Kamloops in the Interior. Prince George is the largest city in the northern part of the province, while a village northwest of it, Vanderhoof, is near the geographic centre of the province.()The Mountains and the Passages many inlets provide some of British Columbias renowned and spectacular scenery, which forms the backdrop and context for a growing outdoor adventure and ecotourism industry. Seventy-five percent of the province is mountainous (more than  above sea level); 60% is forested; and only about 5% is arable. The Okanagan area is one of several wine-growing regions in Canada and also produces ciders; other wine regions in British Columbia include the Valley on Vancouver Island, and the Valley. The cities of Kamloops and Penticton, and rural towns of Oliver, and Osoyoos have some of the warmest and longest summer climates in Canada, although their temperature ranges are exceeded by the warmer Canyon towns of Lillooet and Lytton, where shade temperatures on summer afternoons often surpass  but with very low humidity.Much of the western part of Vancouver Island and the rest of the coast is covered by rainforest. The provinces mainland away from the coastal regions is not as moderated by the Pacific Ocean and ranges from desert and semi-arid plateau to the range and canyon districts of the Central and Southern Interior to boreal forest and sub-arctic prairie in the Northern Interior. A few Interior valleys have short cold winters with infrequent heavy snow, while those in the Cariboo, the southern part of the Central Interior, are colder because of their altitude and latitude, but without the intensity or duration experienced at similar latitudes elsewhere in Canada. The northern two-thirds of the province is largely unpopulated and undeveloped, and is mostly mountainous except east of the Rockies, where the Peace River District, in the northeast of the province contains BCs portion of the Prairies.ClimateImage:Strait of Georgia.jpg|thumb|250px|right|of Georgia, near Vancouver.As a result of Kuroshio Current (also known as the Japan Current), which crosses the North Pacific Ocean, coastal British Columbia has a mild, rainy oceanic climate. Due to the blocking presence of successive mountain ranges, the Interior of the province has a semi-arid climate with certain locations receiving less than 250mm (10) in annual precipitation. The annual mean temperature in the most populated areas of the province are above , the mildest anywhere in Canada. Winters can be severe in the Interior and the North. For example, the average overnight low in Prince George (roughly located in the middle of the province) in January is . The coldest temperature in British Columbia was recorded in Smith River, where it dropped to , one of the coldest readings recorded anywhere in North America. Southern Interior valleys have shorter winters with brief bouts of cold. Heavy snowfall occurs in the Coast, Columbia and Rocky Mountains providing healthy bases for skiers. On the Coast, rainfall, sometimes relentless heavy rain, dominates in winter because of consistent barrages of cyclonic low-pressure systems from the North Pacific, but on occasion (and not every winter) heavy snowfalls and below freezing temperatures arrive when modified arctic air reaches coastal areas for typically short periods. On the opposite extreme, summers in the Southern Interior valleys are hot, for example in Osoyoos the July Maximum averages , hot weather sometimes moves towards the Coast or to the far North. Temperatures have gone over  in the past, with the record high being held in Lytton, when the temperature rose to  on July 16, 1941.()The extended summer dryness often creates conditions that spark forest fires, from dry-lightning or man-made causes. Coastal areas are generally milder and dry during summer, under the influence of stable anti-cyclonic high pressure much of the time. Many areas of the province are often covered by a blanket of heavy cloud and low fog during winter, despite sunny summers. Annual sunshine hours vary from 2200 near Cranbrook and Victoria to less than 1300 sun hours per year in Prince Rupert, located on the North Coast, just south of the Panhandle.Parks and protected areasImage:Mount Robson2.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Robson, Rockies, B.C.There are 14 designations of parks and protected areas in the province that reflects the different administration and creation of these areas in a modern context. There are 141 ecological Reserves, 35 provincial marine parks, 7 Provincial Heritage Sites, 6 Historic Sites of Canada, 4 National Parks and 3 National Park Reserves. 12.5% () of British Columbia is currently considered protected under one of the 14 different designations that includes over 800 distinct areas.British Columbia contains seven of Canadas national parks:*Glacier National Park*Islands National Park Reserve*Haanas National Park Reserve and Haida Heritage Site*National Park*Revelstoke National Park*Rim National Park Reserve*National ParkBritish Columbia also contains a large network of parks, run by BC Parks of the Ministry of Environment. British Columbias provincial parks system is the second largest parks system in Canada (the largest is Canadas National Parks system).Another tier of parks in British Columbia are parks, which are maintained and run by districts.In addition to these areas, over  of land are protected by the Land Reserve.FaunaImage:TakakkawFalls2 edit.jpg|thumb|250px|right|National Park.Much of the province is wild or semi-wild, so that populations of many mammalian species that have become rare in much of the United States still flourish in British Columbia. Watching animals of various sorts, including a very wide range of birds, has also long been popular. Bears (grizzly, black, and the bear or spirit bearonly found in British Columbia) live here, as do deer, elk, moose, caribou, big-horn sheep, goats, marmots, beavers, muskrat, coyotes, wolves, mustelids (such as wolverines, badgers and fishers), Cougar, eagles, ospreys, herons, Canada geese, swans, loons, hawks, owls, ravens, Ducks, and many other sorts of ducks. Smaller birds (robins, jays, grosbeaks, chickadees, and so on.) also abound.Healthy populations of many sorts of fish are found in the waters (including salmonids such as several species of salmon, trout, char, and so on.). Besides salmon and trout, sport-fishers in B.C. also catch halibut, steelhead, bass, and sturgeon. On the coastlines, Seals and river otters are common. Cetacean species native to the coast include the Orca, Whale, Porpoise, Porpoise, White-sided Dolphin and Whale.Image:Cheakamuslake.JPG|thumb|right|250px|Lake at dawn, in Provincial Park, B.C.British Columbian introduced species include: common dandelion, ring-necked pheasant, oyster, trout, slug, Starling, cowbird, knapweed, bullfrog, purple loosestrife, Scotch broom, European earwig, caterpillar, sowbug, gray squirrel, Asian beetle, English ivy, Deer, thistle, gorse, Norway rat, crested mynah, and Asian or European moth.Some endangered species in British Columbia are: Island marmot, Owl, White Pelican, and badgers.As of 2001(BC Ministry of Sustainable Resource Management, Conservation Data Centre)EcozonesCanada subdivides British Columbia into a system of 6 ecozones:*Pacific Marine*Pacific Maritime*Boreal Cordillera*Montane Cordillera*Taiga Plains*Boreal Plains Ecozones.HistoryFur trade and colonial eraThe discovery of stone tools on the River near Fort St. John date human habitation in British Columbia to at least 11,500 years ago. The peoples of the Pacific Northwest Coast spread throughout the region, achieving a high density; at the time of European contact, nearly half the aboriginal people in present-day Canada lived in the region. During the 1770s, smallpox killed at least 30% of the Pacific Northwest Nations.() This epidemic was the first and the most devastating of a number that were to follow, other than the Great Smallpox Epidemic of 1862 which killed off 50% of the native population in that year.()Image:Kwakiutl house pole InvMH975-123-1 .jpg|thumb|upright|150px|Kwakwakawakw house pole, second half of the 19th centuryThe arrival of Europeans began around the mid-18th century, as traders entered the area to harvest otters. While it is thought that Francis Drake may have explored the British Columbian coast in 1579,  it was Francisco de la Bodega y Quadra who completed the first documented voyage, which took place in 1775. In doing so, Quadra reasserted the Spanish claim for the Pacific coast, first made by Nez de Balboa in 1513.The explorations of Cook in 1778 and Vancouver in 1792-93 established British jurisdiction over the coastal area north and west of the Columbia River. In 1793, Alexander Mackenzie was the first European to journey across North America overland to the Pacific Ocean, inscribing a stone marking his accomplishment on the shoreline of Channel near Bella Coola. His expedition theoretically established British sovereignty inland, and a succession of other fur company explorers charted the maze of rivers and mountain ranges between the Canadian Prairies and the Pacific. Mackenzie and these other explorersnotably John Finlay, Simon Fraser, Black, and David Thompsonwere primarily concerned with extending the trade, rather than political considerations. In 1794, by the third of a series of agreements known as the Conventions, Spain conceded its claims of exclusivity in the Pacific. This opened the way for formal claims and colonization by other powers, including Britain, but because of the Wars there was little British action on its claims in the region until later.The establishment of posts under the auspices of the West Company and the Hudsons Bay Company (HBC), effectively established a permanent British presence in the region. The Columbia District, broadly defined as being south of 5440 north latitude, (the southern limit of Russian America) and north of Mexican Controlled California west of the Mountains was, by the Anglo-American Convention of 1818, under the joint occupancy and use of citizens of the United States and subjects of Britain (which is to say, the fur companies). This co-occupancy was ended with the Oregon Treaty of 1846.The major supply route was the Factory Express between Bay and Vancouver. Some of the early outposts grew into settlements, communities, and cities. Among the places in British Columbia that began as fur trading posts are Fort St. John (established 1794); Hudsons Hope (1805); Fort Nelson (1805); Fort St. James (1806); Prince George (1807); Kamloops (1812); Fort Langley (1827); Fort Victoria (1843); Yale (1848); and Nanaimo (1853). Fur company posts that became cities in what is now the United States include Washington (Vancouver), formerly the capital of Hudsons Bay operations in the Columbia District, Washington and Walla, Washington (old Nez Percs).With the amalgamation of the two fur trading companies in 1821, the region now comprising British Columbia existed in three fur trading departments. The bulk of the central and northern interior was organized into the New Caledonia district, administered from Fort St. James. The interior south of the River watershed and north of the Columbia was organized into the Columbia District, administered from Fort Vancouver on the lower Columbia River. The northeast corner of the province east of the Rockies, known as the Peace River Block, was attached to the much larger Athabasca District, headquartered in Fort Chipewyan, in present day Alberta.Until 1849, these districts were a wholly unorganized area of North America under the facto jurisdiction of HBC administrators. Unlike Land to the north and east, however, the territory was not a concession to the company. Rather, it was simply granted a monopoly to trade with the First Nations inhabitants. All that was changed with the westward extension of American exploration and the concomitant overlapping claims of territorial sovereignty, especially in the southern Columbia basin (within present day Washington and Oregon). In 1846, the Oregon Treaty divided the territory along the 49th parallel to the Georgia Strait, with the area south of this boundary (excluding Vancouver Island and the Islands) transferred to sole American sovereignty. The of Vancouver Island was created in 1849, with Victoria designated as the capital. New Caledonia, as the whole of the mainland rather than just its north-central Interior came to be called, continued to be an unorganized territory of British North America, administered by individual HBC trading post managers.With the Canyon Gold Rush in 1858, an influx of Americans into New Caledonia prompted the colonial office to formally designate the mainland as the of British Columbia, with New Westminster as its capital. A series of gold rushes in various parts of the province followed, the largest being the Gold Rush in 1862, forcing the colonial administration into deeper debt as it struggled to meet the extensive infrastructure needs of far-flung boom communities like Barkerville and Lillooet, which sprang up overnight. The Vancouver Island colony was facing financial crises of its own, and pressure to merge the two eventually succeeded in 1866.Rapid growth and developmentImage:LastSpike Craigellachie BC Canada.jpg|thumb|250px|left|Lord Strathcona drives the Last Spike of the Pacific Railway, at Craigellachie, 7 November 1885. Completion of the railroad was a condition of entry into Confederation.The Confederation League, including such figures as De Cosmos, Robson, and Beaven, led the chorus pressing for the colony to join Canada, which had been created out of three British North American colonies in 1867 (the of Canada, Scotia and Brunswick). Several factors motivated this agitation, including the fear of annexation to the United States, the overwhelming debt created by rapid population growth, the need for government-funded services to support this population, and the economic depression caused by the end of the gold rush. With the agreement by the Canadian government to extend the Pacific Railway to British Columbia and to assume the colonys debt, British Columbia became the sixth province to join Confederation on 20 July 1871. The borders of the province were not completely settled until 1903, however, when the provinces territory shrank somewhat after the boundary dispute settled the vague boundary of the Panhandle.Population in British Columbia continued to expand as the provinces mining, forestry, agriculture, and fishing sectors were developed. Mining activity was particularly notable throughout the Mainland, particularly in the Country, in the Slocan, in the West Kootenay around Trail, the East Kootenay (the southeast corner of the province), the Fraser Canyon, the Cariboo, the Omineca and the Cassiar, so much so a common epithet for the Mainland, even after provincehood, was the Gold Colony. Agriculture attracted settlers to the fertile Fraser Valley, and cattle ranchers and later fruit growers came to the drier grasslands of the Thompson River area, the Cariboo, the Chilcotin, and the Okanagan. Forestry drew workers to the lush temperate rainforests of the coast, which was also the locus of a growing fishery.The completion of the railway in 1885 was a huge boost to the provinces economy, facilitating the transportation of the regions considerable resources to the east. The milltown of Granville, known as Gastown, near the mouth of the Inlet was selected as the terminus of the railway, prompting the incorporation of the City as Vancouver in 1886. The completion of the of Vancouver spurred rapid growth, and in less than fifty years the city surpassed Winnipeg, Manitoba, as the largest in Canada. The early decades of the province were ones in which issues of land usespecifically, its settlement and developmentwere paramount. This included expropriation from First Nations people of their land, control over its resources, as well as the ability to trade in some resources (such as the fishery). Establishing a labour force to develop the province was problematic from the start, and British Columbia was the locus of immigration from Europe, China, and Japan. The influx of a non-Caucasian population stimulated resentment from the dominant ethnic groups, resulting in agitation (much of it successful) to restrict the ability of people to immigrate to British Columbia through the imposition of a head tax. This resentment culminated in mob attacks against Chinese and Japanese immigrants in Vancouver in 1887 and 1907. By 1923, almost all Chinese immigration had been blocked except for merchants, professionals, students and investors.Meanwhile, the province continued to grow. In 1914, the last spike of a second transcontinental rail line, the Grand Trunk Pacific, linking north-central British Columbia from the Pass through Prince George to Prince Rupert was driven at Fort Fraser. This opened up the North Coast and the Valley region to new economic opportunities. What had previously been an almost exclusively fur trade and subsistence economy soon became a locus for forestry, farming, and mining.1920s through 1940sWhen the men returned from War I, they discovered the recently enfranchised women of the province had helped vote in the prohibition of liquor in an effort to end the social problems associated with the hard-core drinking that Vancouver and the rest of the province was famous for until the war. Because of pressure from veterans, prohibition was quickly relaxed so that the soldier and the working man could enjoy a drink, but widespread unemployment among veterans was hardened by many of the available jobs being taken by European immigrants and disgruntled veterans organized a range of soldier parties to represent their interests, variously named Soldier-Farmer, Soldier-Labour, and Farmer-Labour Parties. These formed the basis of the fractured labour-political spectrum that would generate a host of fringe leftist and rightist parties, including those who would eventually form the Co-operative Commonwealth and the early Social Credit splinter groups.Image:Japanese internment camp in British Columbia.jpg|thumb|Internment camp for the Canadians during War IIThe advent of in the United States created new opportunities, and many found employment or at least profit in cross-border liquor smuggling. Much of Vancouvers prosperity and opulence in the 1920s results from this pirate economy, although growth in forestry, fishing and mining continued. The end of U.S. prohibition, combined with the onset of the Depression, plunged the province into economic destitution. Compounding the already dire local economic situation, tens of thousands of men from colder parts of Canada swarmed into Vancouver, creating huge hobo jungles around Creek and the Burrard Inlet rail yards, including the old Canadian Pacific Railway mainline right-of-way through the heart of the citys downtown (at Hastings and Carrall). Increasingly desperate times led to intense political organizing efforts, an occupation of the main Post Office at Granville and Hastings which was violently put down by the police and an effective imposition of law on the docks for almost three years. A Vancouver contingent for the Trek was organized and seized a train, which was loaded with thousands of men bound for the capital but was met by a gun straddling the tracks at Mission; the men were arrested and sent to work camps for the duration of the Depression.(Carved From Wood; Mission BC 1861-1992, Andreas Schroeder, publ. The Mission Foundation (1992) ISBN 1550561316m, ISBN 978-1550561319, ASIN: B000B8XZNA)There were some signs of economic life beginning to return to normal towards the end of the 1930s, but it was the onset of World War II which transformed the national economy and ended the hard times of the Depression. Because of the war effort, women entered the workforce as never before.British Columbia has long taken advantage of its location on the Pacific Ocean to have close relations with Asia. However, this has often caused friction between cultures which have caused occasional displays of animosity toward Asian immigrants. This was most manifest during the Second World War when many people of Japanese descent were relocated or interned in the Interior of the province.Coalition and the post-War boomImage:British Columbia Regiment 1940.jpg|thumb|upright|The BC Regiment (DCOR), marching in Westminster, 1940.During War II the mainstream BC Liberal and BC Conservative Parties of British Columbia united in a formal government under new Liberal leader John Hart, who replaced Duff Pattullo when the latter failed to win a majority in the 1941 election. While the Liberals won the most number of seats, they actually received fewer votes than the socialist Co-operative Commonwealth Federation (CCF). Pattullo was unwilling to form a coalition with the rival Conservatives led by Maitland and was replaced by Hart who formed a coalition cabinet made up of five Liberal and three Conservative ministers.( The CCF was invited to join the coalition but refused.( The pretext for continuing the coalition after the end of World War II was to prevent the CCF, which had won a surprise victory in Saskatchewan in 1944, from ever coming to power in British Columbia. The CCFs popular vote was high enough in the 1945 election that they were likely to have won three-way contests and could have formed government. However, the coalition prevented that by uniting the anti-socialist vote.( In the post-war environment the government initiated a series of infrastructure projects, notably the completion of Highway 97 north of Prince George to the Peace River Block, a section called the John Hart Highway and also public hospital insurance.In 1947 the reins of the Coalition were taken over by Ingemar Johnson. The Conservatives had wanted their new leader Anscomb to be premier, but the Liberals in the Coalition refused. Johnson led the coalition to the highest percentage of the popular vote in British Columbia history (61%) in the 1949 election. This victory was attributable to the popularity of his governments spending programmes, despite rising criticism of corruption and abuse of power. During his tenure, major infrastructure continued to expand, and the agreement with Alcan to build the Kemano-Kitimat hydro and aluminum complex was put in place. Johnson achieved popularity for flood relief efforts during the 1948 flooding of the Fraser Valley, which was a major blow to that region and to the provinces economy.Increasing tension between the Liberal and Conservative coalition partners led the Liberal Party executive to vote to instruct Johnson to terminate the arrangement. Johnson ended the coalition and dropped his Conservative cabinet ministers, including Deputy Premier and Finance Minister Herbert Anscomb, precipitating the general election of 1952.(Hans J. Michelmann, David E. Smith, Cristine De Clercy Continuity And Change in Canadian Politics: Essays in Honour of David E. Smith, University of Toronto Press (2006), page 184) A referendum on electoral reform  prior to this election had instigated an elimination ballot (similar to a preferential ballot), where voters could select second and third choices. The intent of the ballot, as campaigned for by Liberals and Conservatives, was that their supporters would list the rival party in lieu of the CCF, but this plan backfired when a large group of voters from all major parties, including the CCF, voted for the fringe British Columbia Social Credit Party (Socreds), who wound up with the largest number of seats in the House (19), only one seat ahead of the CCF, despite the CCF having 34.3% of the vote to Social Credits 30.18%. The Social Credit Party, led by rebel former Conservative MLA A. C. Bennett, formed a government backed by the Liberals and Conservatives (with 6 and 4 seats respectively). Bennett began a series of fiscal reforms, preaching a new variety of populism as well as waxing eloquent on progress and development, laying the ground for a second election in 1953 in which the new Bennett regime secured a majority of seats, with 38% of the vote.  Secure with that majority, Bennett returned the province to the first-past-the-post system thereafter, which is still in use today.Growth of government in the economyImage:I 61926.gif|left|thumb|upright|Premier A. C. Bennett and his wife accompany Princess Margaret in Victoria, August 1958. Bennetts Socreds governed the province for an unprecedented twenty yearsWith the election of the Social Credit Party, British Columbia embarked a phase of rapid development. Bennett and his party governed the province for the next twenty years, during which time the government initiated an ambitious programme of infrastructure development, fuelled by a sustained economic boom in the forestry, mining, and energy sectors.During these two decades, the government nationalized British Columbia Electric and the British Columbia Power Company, as well as smaller electric companies, renaming the entity Hydro. By the end of the 1960s, several major dams had been begun or completed inamong othersthe Peace, Columbia, and River watersheds. Major transmission deals were concluded, most notably the River Treaty between Canada and the United States. The provinces economy was also boosted by unprecedented growth in the forest sector, as well as oil and gas development in the provinces northeast.The 1950s and 1960s were also marked by development in the provinces transportation infrastructure. In 1960, the government established Ferries as a crown corporation, in order to provide a marine extension of the provincial highway system. That system was improved and expanded through the construction of new highways and bridges, and paving of existing highways and provincial roads.Vancouver and Victoria become cultural centres as poets, authors, artists, musicians, as well as dancers, actors, and haute cuisine chefs flocked to the beautiful scenery and warmer temperatures. Similarly, these cities have either attracted or given rise to their own noteworthy academics, commentators, and creative thinkers. Tourism also began to play an important role in the economy. The rise of Japan and other Pacific economies was a great boost to British Columbias economy.Politically and socially, the 1960s brought a period of significant social ferment. The divide between the political left and right, which had prevailed in the province since the Depression and the rise of the movement, sharpened as so-called free enterprise parties coalesced into the defacto coalition represented by Social Creditin opposition to the social democratic Democratic Party, the successor to the Co-operative Commonwealth Federation. As the provinces economy blossomed, so did labour-management tensions. Tensions emerged, also, from the counterculture movement of the late 1960s, of which Vancouver and Nanaimo were centres. The conflict between hippies and Vancouver mayor Tom Campbell was particularly legendary, culminating in the so-called Riots of 1971. By the end of the decade, with social tensions and dissatisfaction with the quo rising, the Bennett governments achievements could not stave off its growing unpopularity.1970s and 1980sOn August 27, 1969, the Social Credit Party was re-elected in a general election for what would be Bennetts final term in power. At the start of the 1970s, the economy was quite strong because of rising coal prices and an increase in annual allowable cuts in the forestry sector. However, BC Hydro reported its first loss, which was the beginning of the end for Bennett and the Social Credit Party.()The Socreds were forced from power in the August 1972 election, paving the way for a provincial New Democratic Party (NDP) government under Barrett. Under Barrett, the large provincial surplus soon became a deficit, although changes to the accounting system makes it likely that some of the deficit was carried over from the previous Social Credit regime and its sets of books, as WAC Bennett had once referred to his system of fiscal management. The brief three year (Thousand Days) period of NDP governance brought several lasting changes to the province, most notably the creation of the Agricultural Land Reserve, intended to protect farmland from redevelopment, and the Corporation of British Columbia, a crown corporation charged with a monopoly on providing single-payer basic automobile insurance.thumb|250px|right|This stylized version of the flag of BC was introduced by the Bennett government in the early 1980s. It remained as the logo of the government of BC for 20 years.Perceptions that the government had instituted reforms either too swiftly or that were too far-reaching, coupled with growing labour disruptions led to the ouster of the NDP in the 1975 general election. Social Credit, under W.A.C. Bennetts son, Bennett, was returned to office. Under the younger Bennetts government, 85% of the provinces land base was transferred from Reserve to management by the of Forests, reporting of deputy ministers was centralized to the Premiers Office, and NDP-instigated social programs were rolled back, with then-Human Resources Minister infamously demonstrating a golden shovel to highlight his welfare policy, although the new-era Socreds also reinforced and backed certain others instigated by the NDPnotably the creation of the Resort Municipality of Whistler, whose special status including Sunday drinking, then an anomaly in BC. Also during the MiniWac regime (a reference to his fathers acronym-cum-nickname, WAC) certain money-losing Crown-owned assets were privatized in a mass giveaway of shares in the Columbia Resources Investment Corporation, BCRIC, with the Brick shares soon becoming near-worthless. Towards the end of his tenure in power, Bennett oversaw the completion of several megaprojects meant to stimulate the economy and win votes - unlike most right-wing parties, British Columbias Social Credit actively practiced government stimulation of the economy. Most notable of these was the winning of a worlds fair for Vancouver, which came in the form of 86, to which was tied the construction of the Coquihalla Highway and Vancouvers SkyTrain system. The Coquihalla Highway project became the subject of a scandal after revelations that the premiers brother bought large tracts of land needed for the project before it was announced to the public, and also because of graft investigations of the huge cost overruns on the project. Both investigations were derailed in the media by a still further scandal, the Scandal, in which the Premier and millionaire backer Doman were investigated for insider-trading and fraud. Nonetheless, the Socreds were re-elected in 1979 under Bennett, who led the party until 1986.File:Coquilhalla Highway.jpg|thumb|240px|left|The Highway. The road was one of the legacies of the 86 fair. The creation of the toll highway sparked controversy.As the province entered a sustained recession, Bennetts popularity and media image were in decline. On April 1, 1983, Premier Bennett overstayed his constitutional limits of power by exceeding the legal tenure of a government, and the Lieutenant-Governor, Pybus Bell-Irving, was forced to call Bennett to Government House to resolve the impasse, and an election was called for April 30, while in the meantime government cheques were covered by special emergency warrants as the Executive Council no longer had signing authority because of the constitutional crisis. Campaigning on a platform of moderation, and backed by the support and computer-organization tactics of the Blue Machine from Ontario and other consultants who were electoral lobbyists for the American Republican Party, Bennett won an unexpected majority. After several weeks of silence in the aftermath, a sitting of the House was finally called and in the speech from the Throne the Socreds instituted a programme of fiscal cutbacks dubbed restraint, which had been a buzzword for moderation during the campaign. The programme included cuts to motherhood issues of the left, including the human rights branch, the offices of the Ombudsman and Rentalsman, womens programs, environmental and cultural programs, while still supplying mass capital infusions to corporate British Columbia. This sparked a backlash, with tens of thousands of people in the streets the next day after the budget speech, and through the course of a summer repeated large demonstrations of up to 100,000 people. This became known as the 1983 Crisis, from the name of the Coalition, a huge grassroots opposition movement mobilized, consisting of organized labour and community groups, with the Columbia Federation of Labour forming a separate organization of unions, Solidarity, under the direction of Munro, then-President of the Woodworkers of America (IWA), the most powerful of the provinces resource unions. Tens of thousands participated in protests and many felt that a strike would be the inevitable result unless the government backed down from its policies they had claimed were only about restraint and not about recrimination against the NDP and the left. Just as a strike at Pacific Press ended, which had crippled the political management of the public agenda by the publishers of the provinces major papers, the movement collapsed after an apparent deal was struck by union leader and IWA president, Jack Munro and Premier Bennett.() A tense winter of blockades at various job sites around the province ensued, as among the new laws were those enabling non-union labour to work on large projects and other sensitive labour issues, with companies from Alberta and other provinces brought in to compete with union-scale British Columbia companies. Despite the tension, Bennetts last few years in power were relatively peaceful as economic and political momentum grew on the megaprojects associated with Expo, and Bennett was to end his career by hosting Prince Charles and Lady Diana on their visit to open Expo 86. His retirement being announced, a Social Credit convention was scheduled for the Whistler Resort, which came down to a three-way shooting match between Bud Smith, the Premiers right-hand man but an unelected official, Social Credit party dame McCarthy, and the charismatic but eccentric Vander Zalm.Bill Vander Zalm became the new Socred leader when Smith threw his support to him rather than see McCarthy win, and led the party to victory in the election later that year. Vander Zalm was later involved in a of interest scandal following the sale of Gardens, a Christian and Dutch culture theme park built by the Premier, to Yu, a Chinese gambling kingpin. There were also concerns over Yus application to the government for a bank licence, and lurid stories from flamboyant realtor Leung of a party in the Howard Hughes Suite on the top two floors of the Inn, where Tan Yu had been staying, with reports of a of money in a brown paper bag passed from Yu to Vander Zalm during the goings-on. These scandals forced Vander Zalms resignation, and Johnston became premier of the province. Johnston presided over the end of Social Credit power, calling an election which led to the reducing of the partys caucus to only two seats, and the revival of the long-defunct British Columbia Liberal Party as Opposition to the victorious NDP under former Vancouver mayor Harcourt.In 1988, Lam was appointed by the Queen of Canada as British Columbias twenty-fifth Lieutenant-Governor, and was the Provinces first Lieutenant-Governor of Chinese origin.1990s to presentJohnston lost the 1991 general election to the NDP, under the leadership of Mike Harcourt, a former mayor of Vancouver. The NDPs unprecedented creation of new parkland and protected areas was popular, and helped boost the provinces growing tourism sector. However, the economy continued to struggle against the backdrop of a weak resource economy. Housing starts and an expanded service sector saw growth overall through the decade, despite political turmoil. Harcourt ended up resigning over Bingogatea political scandal involving the funnelling of charity bingo receipts into party coffers in certain ridings. Harcourt was not implicated, but he resigned nonetheless in respect of constitutional conventions calling for leaders under suspicion to step aside. Clark, a former president of the BC Federation of Labour, was chosen the new leader of the NDP, which won a second term in 1996. More scandals dogged the party, most notably the Ferry Scandal involving the province trying to develop the shipbuilding industry in British Columbia. An allegation (never substantiated) that the Premier had received a favour in return for granting a gaming licence led to Clarks resignation as Premier. He was succeeded on an interim basis by Dan Miller who was in turn followed by Dosanjh following a leadership convention. In the 2001 general election Gordon Campbells BC Liberals defeated the NDP party, gaining 77 out of 79 seats total seats in the provincial legislature. Campbell instituted various reforms and removed some of the NDPs policies including scrapping the fast ferries project, lowering income taxes, and the controversial sale of Rail to CN Rail. Campbell was also the subject of criticism after he was arrested for under the influence during a vacation in Hawaii. However, Campbell still managed to lead his party to victory in the 2005 general election, against a substantially strengthened NDP opposition. Campbell won a third term in the Columbia general election, 2009, marking the first time in 23 years that a premier has been elected to a third term.The province successfully won a bid to host the Winter Olympics in Vancouver and Whistler, with Olympic organizers winning a referendum held in the city of Vancouver.British Columbia has also been significantly affected by demographic changes within Canada and around the world. Vancouver (and to a lesser extent some other parts of British Columbia) was a major destination for many of the immigrants from Kong who left the former UK colony (either temporarily or permanently) in the years immediately prior to its handover to the Republic of China. British Columbia has also been a significant destination for internal Canadian migrants. This has been the case throughout recent decades, because of its image of natural beauty, mild climate and relaxed lifestyle, but is particularly true during periods of economic growth. As a result, British Columbia has moved from approximately 10% of Canadas population in 1971 to approximately 13% in 2006. Trends of urbanization mean that the Vancouver area now includes 51% of the Provinces population, followed in second place by Greater Victoria with 8%. These two metropolitan regions have traditionally dominated the demographics of BC.Demographicsthumb|upright|Welcome sign at the provinces boundary()(Canadas population. Canada. Retrieved September 28, 2006.)(Statistics Canada.)(Statistics Canada.)The largest denominations by number of adherents according to the 2001 census were none (atheist, agnostic, and so on.) with 1,388,300 (35.9%); protestant with 1,213,295 (31.4%); the Catholic Church with 675,320 (17%); the Church of Canada with 361,840 (9%); and the Church of Canada with 298,375 (8%).()Ethnic groups and languagesThe following statistics represent both single (for example, German) and multiple (for example, Chinese-Canadian) responses to the 2006 Census, and thus do not add up to 100%. All items are self-identified.()Though just 1.8% refer to their origins as being British, a majority 57.3% of the population of British Columbia claim their ethnic origin as being from one of the British nations (England, Scotland or Wales). Another 15.2% refer to their ethnicity as Irish, though not distinguishing between Ireland and the of Ireland.Of the provinces, British Columbia had the highest proportion of visible minorities, representing 24.8% of its population.(Statistics Canada. Canadas Ethnocultural Mosaic, 2006 Census: Provinces and territories.) Asians are by far the largest visible minority demographic, with many of the Lower Mainlands large cities having sizable Chinese, Asian, Japanese, Filipino, and Korean communities.Also present in large numbers relative to other regions of Canada (except Toronto), and ever since the province was first settled (unlike Toronto), are many European ethnicities of the first and second generation, notably Germans, Scandinavians, Yugoslavs and Italians. Third-generation Europeans are generally of mixed lineage, and traditionally intermarried with other ethnic groups more than in any other Canadian province. First-generation Britons remain a strong component of local society despite limitations on immigration from Britain since the ending of special status for British subjects in the 1960s.Of the 4,113,847 population counted by the 2006 census, 4,074,385 people completed the section about language. Of these 4,022,045 gave singular responses to the question regarding mother tongue. The languages most commonly reported were the following:Numerous other languages were also counted, but only languages with more than 2,000 native speakers are shown. (Figures shown are for the number of single language responses and the percentage of total single-language responses)()Citiesthumb|right|350px|Vancouver SkylineHalf of all British Columbians live in the Metro Vancouver area, which includes Vancouver, Surrey, Westminster, Vancouver, North Vancouver (city), North Vancouver (district municipality), Burnaby, Coquitlam, Coquitlam, Maple Ridge, Langley (city), Langley (district municipality), Delta, Meadows, White Rock, Richmond, Moody, Anmore, Belcarra, Lions Bay and Island, with adjacent unincorporated areas represented in the regional district as the electoral area known as Greater Vancouver Electoral Area A. Seventeen Indian reserves are located in the metropolitan area but are outside the jurisdiction of the regional district and not represented in its government. Also in the metropolitan area but not represented in the regional district are the Endowment Lands.The second largest concentration of British Columbia population is located at the southern tip of Vancouver Island, which is made up of the 13 municipalities of Greater Victoria, Victoria, Saanich, Esquimalt, Oak Bay, View Royal, Highlands, Colwood, Langford, Central Saanich/Saanichton, North Saanich, Sidney, Metchosin, Sooke, which are part of the Regional District. The metropolitan area also includes several reserves (the governments of which are not part of the regional district). Almost half of the Vancouver Island population is located in Greater Victoria.Other municipalities include: Campbell River, Chilliwack, Colwood, Courtenay, Cranbrook, Creek, Fernie, Fort St. John, Kimberley, Langford, Maple Ridge, Mission, Parksville, North Cowichan, Penticton, Alberni, Prince George, Prince Rupert, Quesnel, Terrace, Vernon, Victoria (provincial capital),  Williams LakeEconomyFile:Vancouver downtown.jpg|thumb|thumb|right|A view of the Vancouvers downtown core. Vancouver is the business capital of British Columbia.British Columbia has a resource dominated economy, centred on the forestry industry but also with increasing importance in mining. Employment in the resource sector has fallen steadily, and new jobs are mostly in the construction and retail/service sectors. With its film industry known as North, the Vancouver region is the third-largest feature film production location in North America, after Angeles and York City.()The economic history of British Columbia is replete with tales of dramatic upswings and downswings, and this and bust pattern has influenced the politics, culture and business climate of the province. Economic activity related to mining in particular has widely fluctuated with changes in commodity prices over time, with documented costs to community health.()British Columbias GDP is the fourth largest in Canada at C$197.93 billion in 2008. GDP per capita stands at C$45,150.() British Columbias total debt will rise 16% to C$47.8 billion in the 2010-11 fiscal year, or 24.3% of GDP.(British Columbia sets budget, eyes Olympic costs. Reuters. March 2, 2010.)TransportationTransportation played a major role in British Columbia history. The Rocky Mountains and the ranges west of them constituted a significant obstacle to overland travel until the completion of the transcontinental railway in 1885. The Peace River Canyon through the Rocky Mountains was the route that the earliest explorers and fur traders used. Fur trade routes were only marginally used for access to British Columbia through the mountains. Travel from the rest of Canada before 1885 meant the difficulty of overland travel via the United States, around Horn or overseas from Asia. Nearly all travel and freight to and from the region occurred via the Pacific Ocean, primarily through the ports of Victoria and New Westminster.Until the 1930s, rail was the only means of overland travel to and from the rest of Canada; travellers using motor vehicles needed to journey through the United States. With the construction of the Inter-Provincial Highway in 1932 (now known as the Crowsnest Pass Highway), and later the Highway, road transportation evolved into the preferred mode of overland travel to and from the rest of the country.Roads and highwaysImage:AlexFraserBridge.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Fraser Bridge on Highway 91 in Richmond/Delta.Because of its size and rugged, varying topography, British Columbia requires thousands of kilometres of provincial highways to connect its communities. British Columbias roads systems were notoriously poorly maintained and dangerous until a concentrated programme of improvement was initiated in the 1950s and 1960s. There are now freeways in the Lower Mainland and Central Interior of the province, and much of the rest of the province is accessible by well-maintained two lane arterial highways with additional passing lanes in mountainous areas. The building and maintenance of provincial highways is the responsibility of the provincial government.There are only five major routes to the rest of Canada. From south to north they are: BC Highway 3 through the Pass, the Pass and the Horse Pass, the latter being used by the Trans-Canada Highway entering Alberta through National Park, the Highway through National Park, and Highway 2 through Creek. There are also several highway crossings to the adjoining American states of Washington, Idaho, and Montana. The longest highway is Highway 97, running  from the British Columbia-Washington border at Osoyoos north to Lake, Yukon and which includes the British Columbia portion of the Highway.Public transitPrior to 1979, surface public transit was administered by BC Hydro, the provincially owned electricity utility. Subsequently, the province established Transit to oversee and operate all municipal transportation systems. In 1998, the Greater Vancouver Transportation Authority (TransLink) (now South Coast British Columbia Transportation Authority), a separate authority for routes within the Greater Vancouver Regional District was established.Public transit in British Columbia consists mainly of diesel buses, although Vancouver is also serviced by a fleet of trolleybuses. Several experimental buses are being tested such as hybrid buses that has both gasoline and electric engines. TransLink operates SkyTrain, a rapid transit system serving Vancouver, Burnaby, New Westminster, North Surrey and Richmond. Presently, extensions of the line east to Coquitlam and Moody (the Evergreen Line) are being developed.RailImage:Eastbound over SCB.jpg|thumb|upright|left|CPR train traversing the Creek Bridge.Rail development expanded greatly in the decades after the completion of the Pacific Railway in 1885 and was the chief mode of long-distance surface transportation until the expansion and improvement of the provincial highways system began in the 1950s. Two major routes through the Yellowhead Pass competed with the Canadian Pacific Railwaythe Trunk Pacific, terminating at Rupert, and the National Railway, terminating at Vancouver. The Great Eastern line supplemented this service, providing a north-south route between Interior resource communities and the coast. The Pacific Great Eastern (later known as British Columbia Railway and now owned by Canadian National Railway) connects Fort St James, Fort Nelson, and Tumbler Ridge with North Vancouver. The E&N Railway, rebranded as Railway of Vancouver Island, serves the commercial and passenger train markets of Vancouver Island by owning the physical rail lines.WaterFerries was established as a provincial crown corporation in 1960 to provide passenger and vehicle ferry service between Vancouver Island and the Lower Mainland as a cheaper and more reliable alternative to the service operated by the Canadian Pacific Railway. It now operates 25 routes among the islands of British Columbia, as well as between the islands and the mainland. Ferry service to Washington is offered by the State Ferries (between Sidney and Anacortes) and Black Ball Transport (between Victoria and Angeles, Washington). Ferry service over inland lakes and rivers is provided by the provincial government.Commercial ocean transport is of vital importance. Major ports are located at Vancouver, Bank (near Tsawwassen), Prince Rupert, and Victoria. Of these, the Port of Vancouver is the most important, being the largest in Canada and the most diversified in North America. Vancouver, Victoria, and Prince Rupert are also major ports of call for ships. In 2007, a large maritime container port was opened in Prince Rupert with an inland sorting port located in Prince George.AirThere are over 200 airports located throughout British Columbia, the major ones being the International Airport, the International Airport, the International Airport, and the International Airport, the first three of which each served over 1,000,000 passengers in 2005. Vancouver International Airport is the 2nd busiest airport in the country with an estimated 17.9 million travellers passing through in 2008.Government and politicsLegislature Buildings and Undersea Gardens.jpg|thumb|The British Columbia Parliament Buildings in VictoriaThe Lieutenant-Governor of British Columbia, Point, is the Queen of Canadas representative in the Province of British Columbia. During the absence of the Lieutenant-Governor, the Governor General in Council may appoint an administrator to execute the duties of the office. In practice, this is usually the Chief Justice of British Columbia.(Executive Power in the Provinces under the Constitutional Act, 1867.)British Columbia has an 85-member elected Legislative Assembly, elected by the voting system, though in recent years there has been significant debate about switching to a single transferable vote system.The province is governed by the Liberal Party under Premier Clark. The previous election saw then Premier Gordon Campbell win a third straight majority government in May 2009, taking 49 seats to the opposition New Democratic Partys 35. Campbell had previously led the largest landslide election in British Columbia history in 2001, with 77 of 79 seats, but the legislature has been more evenly divided between Liberals and NDP following the 2005 (46 of 79) and 2009 (49 of 85) provincial elections. The New Democratic Party (NDP) and its predecessor the CCF have been the main opposition force to business-oriented parties since the 1930s and have ruled majority governments 1972-1975 and 1991-2001. The Party of British Columbia plays a larger role in the politics of British Columbia than Green Parties do in most other jurisdictions in Canada. However, after a breakthrough election in 2001 (12.39%), the partys vote share has declined (2005  9.17%, 2009  8.09%).The British Columbia Liberal Party is not related to the federal Liberal Party and does not share the same ideology. Instead, the BC Liberal party is a rather diverse coalition, made up of the remnants of the Social Credit Party, many federal Liberals, federal Conservatives, and those who would otherwise support right-of-centre or free enterprise parties. Historically, there have commonly been third parties present in the legislature (including the Liberals themselves from 1952 to 1975), but there are presently none.Prior to the rise of the Liberal Party, British Columbias main political party was the British Columbia Social Credit Party which ruled British Columbia for 20 continuous years. While sharing some ideology with the current Liberal government, they were more right-wing although undertook nationalization of various important monopolies, notably BC Hydro and BC Ferries. In an April 2008 poll by polling firm Ipsos-Reid, the BC Liberals were shown as having the support of 49% of voters, compared to 32% for the NDP.(S. 23 of the Constitution Act (British Columbia) requires elections to be held on the second Tuesday in May every fourth year after May 2005. Constitution Act. Retrieved on 2009-04-06.)thumb|left|The meeting chamber of the provincial legislative assemblyBritish Columbia is known for having politically active labour unions who have traditionally supported the NDP or its predecessor, the CCF.British Columbias political history is typified by scandal and a cast of colourful characters, beginning with various colonial-era land scandals and abuses of power by early officials (such as those that led to War in 185859). Notable scandals in Social Credit years included the Robert Bonner Affair, the Gardens scandal which forced Premier Bill Vander Zalm to resign and ended the Social Credit era, the Bingogate scandal which brought down NDP Premier Mike Harcourt, the alleged scandal named Casinogate which drove NDP Premier Glen Clark to resign. A variety of scandals have plagued the current Liberal government, but with little apparent effect on the electorate, including the Premiers arrest for drunk driving in Maui and the resignation of various cabinet ministers because of conflict-of-interest allegations. A Christmas Eve raid on the Parliament Buildings in Victoria, including the Premiers Office, has resulted in charges only for ministerial aides, although key cabinet members from the time have since resigned. The case, currently in preliminary hearings in the courts and relating to the sale of BC Rail to an American company, may not reach trial because of the mass of evidence and various procedural problems.Recreationice sailor.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Ice sailing in WhistlerGiven its varied mountainous terrain and its coasts, lakes, rivers, and forests, British Columbia has long been enjoyed for pursuits like hiking and camping, rock climbing and mountaineering, hunting and fishing.Water sports, both motorized and non-motorized, are enjoyed in many places. kayaking opportunities abound on the British Columbia coast with its fjords. Whitewater rafting and kayaking are popular on many inland rivers. Sailing and sailboarding are widely enjoyed.In winter, cross-country and skiing are much enjoyed, and in recent decades high-quality downhill skiing has been developed in the Coast Mountain range and the Rockies, as well as in the southern areas of the Shuswap Highlands and the Mountains. Snowboarding has mushroomed in popularity since the early 1990s. The Winter Olympics downhill events were held in Blackcomb area of the province, while the indoor events were conducted in the Vancouver area.In Vancouver and Victoria (as well as some other cities), opportunities for joggers and bicyclists have been developed. Cross-country bike touring has been popular since the ten-speed bike became available many years ago. Since the advent of the more robust bike, trails in more rugged and wild places have been developed for them. Some of the provinces retired rail beds have been converted and maintained for hiking, biking, and cross-country skiing. Longboarding is also a popular activity because of the hilly geography of the region.Horseback riding is enjoyed by many British Columbians. Opportunities for riding, often into especially scenic areas, have been established for tourists in numerous areas of the province.British Columbia also has strong participation levels in many other sports, including golf, tennis, soccer, hockey, football, union, lacrosse, baseball, softball, basketball, curling and skating. British Columbia has produced many outstanding athletes, especially in aquatic and sports.Image:Cannabis sativa.jpg|thumb|upright|170px|left|A crop of Cannabis Sativa, or Bud.Consistent with both increased tourism and increased participation in diverse recreations by British Columbians has been the proliferation of lodges, chalets, and breakfasts, motels, hotels, fishing camps, and park-camping facilities in recent decades.In certain areas, there are businesses, non-profit societies, or municipal governments dedicated to promoting ecotourism in their region. A number of British Columbia farmers offer visitors to combine tourism with farm work, for example, through the WWOOF Canada program.()Recreational cannabisA 2004 study (published 2006) by the of Victoria Centre for Addictions Research of BC and Fraser University Applied Research on Mental Health and Addictions indicated cannabis use is more widespread among British Columbians than other Canadians.() However, a Nations report published in July 2007 actually placed Quebec as the highest consumption province, citing 15.8% of Quebecers having used marijuana in a single year, versus 14.1% of Canadians nationally,() and resulted in Canada being placed first in the industrialized world in marijuana use. With the actual growing of marijuana, British Columbia is responsible for 40% of all cannabis produced in Canada.()See also*of designated places in British Columbia*of people from British Columbia*List of regions of Canada: British ColumbiaReferences* Further reading * * * * * * * * * * External links* Tourism British Columbia official website* * Provincial Archives including online photo database* Vancouver Public Library; Historical Photographs of BC & the Yukon* B.C. Multicultural Photographs from the Vancouver Public Library  searchable photo database* BC Govt online map archivelist af:Brits-ColumbiBritnicaKolumbiyasColumbia KolumbijaColumbiaBritnicaKolumbieColumbiaColumbiaColumbiaColumbiaBritnicaKolumbioKolunbiafr:Colombie-Britanniquefy:Britsk-KolumbiaCholim BhriotanachCholombey GhoaldaghBhreatannachBritnica - British ColumbiaKolumbijaColumbiaColumbiaBritannicKlumbaBritannicaColumbiaColumbiaColumbiaBredennekKolumbiaBritannicaKolumbijaKolumbijaBritannegaColumbiaColumbiaColumbianl:Brits-Columbiaja:ColumbiaColumbiaColumbiaBritanicaBritnicaBrytyjskaBritnicaBritanicColumbieColumbiaKolumbiaKolumbijaKolmbijoKolumbijaKolumbiaColumbiaColumbiath:KolumbiyasKolumbiyeColumbiaColumbiaColumbiaColumbiazh-yue:Kolumbjzh:
3415
Bulgaria
footnote6 Bulgaria  (Balgariya, IPA: ), officially the Republic of Bulgaria ( , Republika Balgariya, IPA: ) is a country in Europe. Bulgaria borders five other countries: Romania to the north (mostly along the Danube), Serbia and the of Macedonia to the west, and Greece and Turkey to the south. The Sea defines the extent of the country to the east. With a territory of , Bulgaria ranks as the 15th-largest country in Europe. Several mountainous areas define the landscape, most notably Planina (the Balkan mountains) and Rhodope mountain ranges, as well as the Rila range, which includes the highest peak in the Balkan region. In contrast, the Danubian plain in the north and the Thracian Plain in the south represent Bulgarias lowest and most fertile regions. The  Black Sea coastline covers the entire eastern bound of the country.The emergence of a unified Bulgarian ethnicity and state dates back to the 7th century AD. All Bulgarian political entities that subsequently emerged preserved the traditions (in ethnic name, language and alphabet) of the Bulgarian Empire (6811018), which at times covered most of the Balkans and became a cultural hub for the Slavs in the Ages. With the decline of the Bulgarian Empire (11851396), Bulgarian territories came under Ottoman rule for nearly five centuries. The Russo-Turkish War of 18771878 led to the establishment of a Third Bulgarian state as a principality in 1878, which gained its full sovereignty in 1908.(Crampton, R.J., Bulgaria, 2007, pp.174, Oxford University Press) In 1945, after World War II, it became a communist state(A concise history of Bulgaria, R. J. Crampton, Cambridge University Press, 2005, ISBN 0521616379, p. 271.) and was a part of the Bloc until the political changes in Eastern Europe in 1989/1990, when the Communist Party allowed multi-party elections. Bulgarian politics undertook a transition to democracy and free-market capitalism was introduced.The Bulgarian government functions as a parliamentary democracy within a unitary republic. Sofia, a city, is the countrys capital and the 12th largest settlement in the European Union.(See cities of the European Union by population within city limits) Bulgaria is a member of the Union, NATO, the Nations, the of Europe, the Trade Organization and is a founding state of the OSCE and the Sea Economic Cooperation Organization. Bulgaria has a high Development Index of 0.743, ranking 58th in the world in 2010.(Human development index trends, Human development indices by the United Nations. Retrieved on 8 October 2011) The country also holds the 38th position in Newsweeks rankings of the worlds best countries to live in, measuring health, education political environment and economic dynamism.()HistoryPrehistory and antiquityFile:Panagyurishte gold.jpg|250|thumb|left|A gold rhyton from the treasure, the 4th3rd century BCPrehistoric cultures in the Bulgarian lands include the Neolithic culture and culture (6th to 3rd millennia BC), the eneolithic culture (5th millennium BC; see also Necropolis), and the Age culture. The chronology serves as a gauge for the prehistory of the wider Balkans region.The Thracians, one of the three primary ancestral groups of modern Bulgarians, lived separated in various tribes until King Teres united most of them around 500 BC in the kingdom. They were eventually subjugated by the Great and later by the Empire. After migrating from their original homeland, the easternmost Slavs settled on the territory of modern Bulgaria during the 6th century and assimilated the Hellenized or Thracians. Eventually the lite of the Bulgars, a Central Asian people originating from the Imeon area in present-day Afghanistan,(Bulgaria. Bureau of European and Eurasian Affairs, U.S. Department of State) incorporated all of them into the First Bulgarian Empire.(Encyclopdia Britannica/Bulgaria/History) By the 9th century, Bulgars and Slavs were mutually assimilated.(Bulgaria. Encyclopdia Britannica.)First Bulgarian EmpireAsparukh, heir of Great Bulgarias khan Kubrat, migrated with several Bulgar tribes to the lower courses of the rivers Danube, Dniester and Dniepr (known as Ongal) after his fathers state was subjugated by the Khazars. He conquered Moesia and Minor (Dobrudzha) from the Empire, expanding his new kingdom further into the Balkan Peninsula.(Runciman, p. 26) A peace treaty with Byzantium in 681 and the establishment of a Bulgarian capital at Pliska south of the Danube mark the beginning of the Bulgarian Empire.Succeeding khans strengthened the Bulgarian state  Tervel (700721) established Bulgaria as a major military power by defeating a 26,000-strong Arab army during the Second Arab Siege of Constantinople;(C. de Boor (ed), Theophanis chronographia, vol. 1. Leipzig: Teubner, 1883 (repr. Hildesheim: Olms, 1963), 397, 2530 (AM 6209)                 .             .          , ,     ,     .) Krum (802814)(Runciman, p. 52) doubled the countrys territory, killed emperor I in the of Pliska,(61) and introduced the first written of law; Boris I (852889) abolished Tengriism in favor of Eastern Orthodox Christianity in 864,(Georgius Monachus Continuants. Chronicon, Corpus Scriptorum Historiae Byzantinorum, Bonn, 182897) and introduced the alphabet. Simeon the Greats rule (893927) saw the largest territorial expansion of Bulgaria in its history,() along with a golden age of Bulgarian culture and a military supremacy over the Byzantine Empire, demonstrated in the Battle of Achelous (917).(Bojidar Dimitrov: Bulgaria Illustrated History. BORIANA Publishing House 2002, ISBN 9545000449)File:Krum1.jpg|thumb|left|Krum feasts with his nobles after the battle of Pliska. His servant (far right) brings the wine-filled cup of emperor Nicephorus I.After Simeons death, Bulgaria declined during the mid-10th century, weakened by wars with Croatians, Magyars, Pechenegs and Serbs, and the spread of the Bogomil heresy.(Reign of Simeon I, Encyclopaedia Britannica. Under Simeons successors Bulgaria was beset by internal dissension provoked by the spread of Bogomilism (a dualist religious sect) and by assaults from Magyars, Pechenegs, the Rus, and Byzantines.)() This resulted in consecutive Rus and Byzantine invasions, which ended with the seizure of the capital Preslav by the Byzantine army.(Leo Diaconus: Historia (full text in Russian)            .) Under Samuil, Bulgaria somewhat recovered from these attacks and even managed to conquer Serbia, Bosnia( Sisic, p. 331) and Duklja,(Chronicle of the Priest of Duklja, full translation in Russian. Quote:             ,          ,    .) but this ended in 1014, when Byzantine Emperor II (the Bulgar-Slayer) defeated its armies at Klyuch.(Ioannis Scylitzae: Synopsis Historiarum, Hans Thurn edition, Corpus Fontium Byzantiae Historiae, 1973; ISBN (978)3110022858. p. 457) Samuil died shortly after the battle, on 15 October 1014,( and by 1018 the Byzantine Empire conquered the remaimed parts of the First Bulgarian Empire, putting it to an end.Second Bulgarian EmpireII managed to prevent rebellions by retaining the local rule of the Bulgarian nobility (incorporated into Byzantine aristocracy as archons or strategoi),(Zlatarski, vol. II, pp. 141) guaranteeing the indivisibility of Bulgaria in its former geographic borders and recognising the autocephaly of the Archbishopric of Ohrid.(Averil Cameron, The Byzantines, Blackwell Publishing (2006), p. 170) After his death Byzantine domestic policies changed, which led to a series of unsuccessful rebellions, the largest being led by II Delyan. It was not until 1185 when dynasty nobles Asen I and Peter IV organized a major uprising and succeeded in reestablishing the Bulgarian state, marking the beginning of the Second Bulgarian Empire.of Ivan Assen II.png|thumb|right|The Bulgarian Empire under tzar Ivan Asen IIThe Asen dynasty set up its capital in Tarnovo. Kaloyan, the third of the Asen monarchs, extended his dominions to Belgrade, Nish and Skopie; he acknowledged the spiritual supremacy of Pope, and received a royal crown from a legate.( Cultural and economic growth persisted under Asen II (12181241), who extended Bulgarias control over Albania, Epirus, Macedonia and Thrace.(Jiriek, p.295) The achievements of the artistic school as well as the first coins to be minted by a Bulgarian ruler were only a few signs of the empires welfare at that time.(The Asen dynasty ended in 1257, and due to invasions, internal conflicts, and constant Byzantine and Hungarian attacks, the countrys military and economic might declined. By the end of the 14th century, factional divisions between Bulgarian feudal landlords (bolyari) and the spread of Bogomilism had caused the Second Bulgarian Empire to split into three small tsardoms (At Vidin, Tarnovo and Karvuna) and several semi-independent principalities that fought among themselves, and also with Byzantines, Hungarians, Serbs, Venetians and Genoese. In the same period the Turks, who had already started their invasion of the Balkans, conquered most Bulgarian towns and fortresses south of the Balkan Mountains and began their northwards conquest.(Jiriek, p. 382)Ottoman rule and national awakeningIn 1393, the Ottomans captured Tarnovo, the capital of the Second Bulgarian Empire, after a three-month siege. In 1396, the Vidin Tsardom fell after the defeat of a Christian crusade at the of Nicopolis. Finally, the Vidin Tzardom fell to in 1423 and with this, the Ottomans finally subjugated and occupied all Bulgarian controlled lands south of the Danube.(Kinross, The Ottoman Centuries, Morrow QuillPaperback Edition, 1979)(R.J. Crampton, A Concise History of Bulgaria, 1997, Cambridge University Press, ISBN 0-521-567-19-X)() During their rule, the Bulgarian population south of the Danube suffered greatly from oppression, intolerance and misgovernment.()North of the Danube, where a significant number of Bulgarian nobility and common folk remained, the population was under the jurisdiction of various Christian autonomous, predominately Wallachian led principalities, where the Bulgarian alphabet continued to be used () and many cities kept their Bulgarian names, like the Wallachian capital of Targovishte. The nobility in the Christian principalities north of the Danube, continued to be known by their Bulgarian titles of Boyars and regularly helped Bulgarian population to continue to migrate north, as part of their military campaigns south of the Danube.() Thus, Bulgarian population north of the Danube never came  under Ottoman occupation, which greatly helped the National revival south of the Danube in later centuries. The nobility south of the Danube however, was eliminated and parts of the peasantry enserfed to Ottoman masters()while Bulgarians lacked judicial equality with the Ottoman Muslims and had to pay much higher taxes than them.(Crampton, R.J. Bulgaria 18781918, p.2. East European Monographs, 1983. ISBN 0880330295.) Bulgarian culture became isolated from Europe, its achievements destroyed, and the educated clergy fled to other countries.()Throughout the nearly five centuries of Ottoman rule, the Bulgarian people responded to the oppression by strengthening the haydut (rebels) tradition,( and attempted to reestablish their state by organizing several revolts, most notably the First and Tarnovo Uprisings (1598 / 1686) and Rebellion (1689). The awakening of Bulgaria became one of the key factors in the struggle for liberation, resulting in the 1876 uprisingthe largest and best-organized Bulgarian rebellion. Though crushed by the Ottoman authoritiesin reprisal, the Turks massacred some 15,000 Bulgarians(the uprising prompted the Great Powers to take action. They convened the Conference in 1876, but their decisions were rejected by the Ottoman authorities, which allowed the Empire to seek a solution by force without risking military confrontation with other Great Powers (as had happened in the War of 1854 to 1856). The Russo-Turkish War of 187778 resulted in the defeat of Ottoman forces by the Russian Army (supported by Bulgarian volunteer forces and the Army) and the of San Stefano (3 March 1878), which set up an autonomous Bulgarian principality. The Great Powers immediately rejected the treaty, fearing that such a large country in the Balkans might threaten their interests. The subsequent Treaty of Berlin (1878) provided for a much smaller autonomous state comprising Moesia and the region of Sofia.() The Bulgarian principality proclaimed itself a fully independent state on 5 October (22 September O.S.), 1908, after it won a war against Serbia and incorporated the semi-autonomous Ottoman territory of Rumelia.Modern eraFerdinand at proclamation of Bulgarian-independence.jpg|thumb|left|Tzar Ferdinand I and his cabinet prepare to announce the declaration of independence, 1908In the years following the achievement of complete independence Bulgaria became increasingly militarized, and was referred to as the Balkan Prussia.()(, .     .    . ., 1983, . 72, 361)In 1885 Northern Bulgaria and Southern Bulgaria united and subsequently defeated Serbia in the war of 1885. Between 1912 and 1918, Bulgaria became involved in a string of three consecutive conflicts  the Wars and War I. After a disastrous defeat in the Balkan War, Bulgaria again found itself fighting on the losing side as a result of its alliance with the Powers in World War I. Despite achieving several decisive victories at Doiran, Monastir and again at Doiran in 1918, the country capitulated in 1918 and suffered significant territorial losses,( a total of 412,000 casualties, and a wave of more than 253,000() refugees who put an additional strain on the already ruined national economy. The political unrest resulting from these losses led to the establishment of a royal authoritarian dictatorship by Tsar Boris III (19181943). Bulgaria entered World War II in 1941 as a member of the Axis but declined to participate in Barbarossa and saved its Jewish population from deportation to concentration camps.(Bulgaria in World War II: The Passive Alliance, Library of Congress) In the summer of 1943 Boris III died suddenly, an event which pushed the country into political turmoil as the war turned against Nazi Germany and the Communist guerilla movement gained more power.(Bulgaria: Wartime Crisis, Library of Congress) In September 1944 the Communist-dominated Fatherland Front took power, following strikes and unrest, ending the alliance with Nazi Germany and joining the Allied side until the end of the war in 1945.File:Zhelev-Bush-1990.jpg|thumb|right|Zhelev (left), the first democratically elected president of Bulgaria(Zhelyu Zhelev  The dissident president at the Sofia Echo, by Ivan Vatahov, Apr 17 2003 (retrieved January 27, 2010) with H. W. Bush in 1990 The Communist uprising of 9 September 1944 led to the abolition of monarchic rule, but it was not until 1946 that a republic was established. It came under the Soviet sphere of influence, with Dimitrov (19461949) as the foremost Bulgarian political leader. Bulgaria installed a Soviet-style economy with some market-oriented policies emerging on an experimental level(William Marsteller. The Economy. Bulgaria country study (Glenn E. Curtis, editor). of Congress Research Division (June 1992)) under Zhivkov (19541989). By the mid 1950s standards of living rose significantly.(Domestic policy and its results, Library of Congress) Zhivkova, daughter of Zhivkov, promoted Bulgarias national heritage, culture and arts worldwide.(The Political Atmosphere in the 1970s, Library of Congress) On the other hand, an assimilation campaign of the late 1980s directed against ethnic Turks resulted in the emigration of some 300,000 of them to Turkey.()(Cracks show in Bulgarias Muslim ethnic model. Reuters. 31 May 2009.) On 10 November 1989, the Bulgarian Communist Party gave up its political monopoly, Zhivkov resigned, and Bulgaria embarked on a transition from a single-party republic to a democracy.In June 1990 the first free elections took place, won by the moderate wing of the Communist Party (the Socialist PartyBSP). In July 1991, a new constitution that provided for a relatively weak elected President and for a Prime Minister accountable to the legislature, was adopted. The new system eventually failed to improve living standards or create economic growth  the average quality of life and economic performance actually remained lower than in the times of Communism well into the early 2000s.(  , 1 October 2007, Le Monde Diplomatique (Bulgarian edition)) A reform package introduced in 1997 restored positive economic growth, but led to rising social inequality. Bulgaria became a member of NATO in 2004 and of the Union in 2007. The US Library of Congress Federal Research Division reported it in 2006 as having generally good of speech and rights records,() while House listed Bulgaria as free in 2011, giving it scores of 2 for political rights and 2 for civil liberties.( Bulgaria country report for 2008, freedomhouse.org)GeographyBulgaria lies between latitudes 41 and 45 N, and longitudes 22 and 29 E.Geographically and in terms of climate, Bulgaria features notable diversity, with the landscape ranging from the Alpine snow-capped peaks in Rila, Pirin and the Mountains to the mild and sunny Black Sea coast; from the typically continental Danubian Plain (ancient Moesia) in the north to the strong Mediterranean climatic influence in the valleys of Macedonia and in the lowlands in the southernmost parts of Thrace.File:Rozhen pyramids.jpg|thumb|right|Sandstone formations near Melnik, southern BulgariaFile:Sozopolivanpetarkirik.jpg|thumb|right|The Sea as seen from Medni Rid peak near Burgas. Relief and natural resourcesAbout 30% of the land is made up of plains, while plateaus and hills account for 41%.(Topography, Library of Congress.) The mountainous southwest of the country has two alpine ranges  Rila (where mount Musala, at ,() is located) and Pirin, and further east stand the lower but more extensive Mountains. The Balkan mountain chain runs west-east through the middle of the country, north of the Rose Valley. Hilly countryside and plains lie to the southeast, along the Black Sea coast, and along Bulgarias main river, the Danube, to the north. Bulgaria has large deposits of bauxite, copper, lead, zinc, bismuth and manganese. Smaller deposits exist of iron, gold, silver, uranium, chromite, nickel, and others. Bulgaria has abundant non-metalliferous minerals such as rock-salt, gypsum, kaolin and marble.Hydrography and climateThe country has a dense network of about 540 rivers, most of themwith the notable exception of the Danubeshort and with low water-levels.()Most rivers flow through mountainous areas. The longest river located solely in Bulgarian territory, the Iskar, has a length of . Other major rivers include the Struma and the Maritsa in the south.File:Kaiseradler Aquila heliaca 2 amk.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Some 20 nesting couples of the Imperial Eagle exist in Bulgaria, and their number is gradually growing.(Bulgarian NGO to Track 5 Imperial Eagles by Satellite, novinite.com, 9 July 2010)Bulgaria overall has a climate, with cold winters and hot summers. The barrier effect of the Mountains has some influence on climate throughout the country  northern Bulgaria experiences lower temperatures and receives more rain than the southern lowlands.Precipitation averages about  per year.(Climate, Library of Congress.) In the lowlands rainfall varies between , and in the mountain areas between  of rain falls per year. Drier areas include Dobrudja and the northern coastal strip, while the higher parts of the Rila, Pirin, Mountains, Planina, Osogovska Mountain and Vitosha receive the highest levels of precipitation.Environment and wildlifeBulgaria has signed and ratified the protocol(See of Kyoto Protocol signatories) and has achieved a 30% reduction of dioxide emissions from 1990 to 2009, completing the protocols objectives.(Bulgaria Achieves Kyoto Protocol Targets  IWR Report, 11 August 2009) However, pollution from outdated factories and metallurgy works, as well as severe deforestation (mostly caused by illegal logging), continue to be major problems.(  : , , ...  , Petar Kanev, *8* Magazine, 2006.) Urban areas are particularly affected mostly due to energy production from coal-based powerplants and automobile traffic,(Cars from antiquity to their appearance in Bulgaria, toprentacar.bg, 03 August 2011)(High Air Pollution to Close Downtown Sofia, novinite.com, 14 January 2008)(Bulgarias Sofia, Plovdiv Suffer Worst Air Pollution in Europe, novinite.com, 23 June 2010) while pesticide usage in the agriculture and antiquated industrial sewage systems have resulted in extensive soil and water pollution with chemicals and detergents.(Bulgarias quest to meet the environmental acquis, European Stability Initiative, 10 December 2008) In addition, Bulgaria remains the only EU member which does not recycle municipal waste,(Municipal waste recycling 1995  2008 (1000 tonnes), Eurostat) although an electronic waste recycling plant was put in operation in June 2010.(       , dnevnik.bg, 28 June 2010) The situation has improved in recent years, and several government-funded programs have been initiated in order to reduce pollution levels.(Three parks, 11 nature parks(        , Gora Magazine, June 2010) and 17 reserves(     ?, Gora magazine, May 2007) exist on Bulgarias territory. Nearly 35% of its land area consists of forests,() where some of the oldest trees in the world  such as Pine and the Granit oak(See of oldest trees)  have grown. The bear and the jackal(Conservation Action Plan for the golden jackal, WWF, April 2004. An estimate for Bulgarian jackal population in the early 90s was put at up to 5000 individuals (Demeter & Spassov 1993). The jackal population in Bulgaria increased till 1994 and since then it seems to have been stabilized (Spassov pers. comm.).) are prominent mammals, while the lynx, the imperial eagle and the mink have small, but growing populations.PoliticsFile:Georgi S. Parvanov.jpg|thumb|upright|Parvanov, president and head of state of BulgariaThe National Assembly or Sabranie ( ) consists of 240 deputies, each elected for four-year terms by popular vote. The National Assembly has the power to enact laws, approve the budget, schedule presidential elections, select and dismiss the Prime Minister and other ministers, declare war, deploy troops abroad, and ratify international treaties and agreements. The president serves as the of state and commander-in-chief of the armed forces. While unable to initiate legislation other than constitutional amendments, the President can return a bill for further debate, although the parliament can override the Presidents veto by vote of a majority of all MPs. Borisov, leader of the centre-right party for European Development of Bulgaria, became prime minister on 27 July 2009,(Boyko Borisov, Prime Minister of Bulgaria, SETimes.com) and Georgi Parvanov was re-elected as a president in 2005.LawThe Bulgarian legal system recognizes the Acts of Parliament as a main source of law, and is a typical representative of the law family.(The Bulgarian Legal System and Legal Research, Hauser Global Law School Program, August 2006.) The judiciary is overseen by the Ministry of Justice, while the Supreme Administrative Court and Supreme Court of Cassation, the highest courts of appeal, rule on the application of laws in lower courts. The Supreme Judicial Council manages the system and appoints judges. Bulgarias judiciary remains one of Europes most corrupt and inefficient.(      , News.bg, 03.06.2009)(Questions arise again about Bulgarias legal system  Europe  International Herald Tribune, NYTimes, 5 November 2006) Law enforcement organisations are mainly subordinate to the Ministry of Interior.() The National Police Service is responsible for combating general crime and supporting the operations of other law enforcement agencies, the National Investigative Service and the Central Office for Combating Organized Crime. The Police Service has criminal and financial sections and national and local offices. The Ministry of Interior also heads the Border Police Service and the National Gendarmerie, a specialized branch for anti-terrorist activity, crisis management and riot control. In 2008, the State Agency for National Security, a specialized body for counterintelligence, was established with the aim to eliminate threats to national security.() Bulgarias police force numbers 27,000 officers.(:  27     , vsekiden.com, 19 January 2010) Foreign relations and military Bulgaria became a member of the Nations in 1955, and a founding member of OSCE in 1975. As a Consultative Party to the Treaty, the country takes part in the administration of the territories situated south of 60 south latitude.(The Antarctic Treaty system: An introduction. Scientific Committee on Antarctic Research (SCAR).)(Signatories to the Antarctic Treaty. Scientific Committee on Antarctic Research (SCAR).) It joined NATO on 29 March 2004, signed the Union Treaty of Accession on 25 April 2005,()() and became a full member of the European Union on 1 January 2007.() Bulgarias relationship with its neighbors has generally been good. The country has proven to be a constructive force in the Balkan region and has played an important role in promoting regional security.(File:Bulgarian mig-29 r-27.jpg|thumb|right|A Bulgarian Air Force MiG-29 fighter jet at Ignatievo Air BaseIn April 2006 Bulgaria and the States of America signed a defence cooperation agreement providing for the usage of the Bezmer and Graf Ignatievo air bases, the Novo Selo training range, and a logistics centre in Aytos as joint military facilities. Foreign Policy magazine lists Bezmer Air Base as one of the six most important overseas facilities used by the USAF.(The List: The Six Most Important U.S. Military Bases, FP, May 2006)The of Bulgaria, an all-volunteer body, consists of three servicesland forces, navy and air force. As a NATO member, the country maintains a total of 913 troops deployed abroad.(See of Bulgaria#Deployments) Historically, Bulgaria deployed significant numbers of military and civilian advisors in socialist-oriented countries, such as Nicaragua(Arms Sales, Library of Congress) and Libya (more than 9,000 personnel).(Foreign Affairs in the 1960s and 1970s, Library of Congress)Following a series of reductions beginning in 1990, the active troops today number about 32,000,(  -     24 000, mediapool.bg, 26 May 2010) down from 152,000 in 1988,() and are supplemented by a reserve force of 303,000 soldiers and officers and paramilitary forces, numbering 34,000.() The inventory includes highly capable Soviet equipment, such as MiG-29 fighters, Grumble SAMs and Scarab short-range ballistic missiles. Military spending in 2009 cost $1.19 billion.(Official Military Expenditures List)Administrative divisionsBetween 1987 and 1999 Bulgarias administrative structure consisted of nine provinces (oblasti, singular oblast). Since 1999, it includes 27 provinces and a metropolitan capital province (Sofia-Grad). All areas take their names from their respective capital cities. The provinces subdivide into 264 municipalities.EconomyFile:Downtown Sofia Boby Dimitrov 1.jpg|thumb|Sofia, the financial heart of the countryBulgaria has an industrialized, open free-market economy, with a large, moderately advanced private sector and a number of strategic enterprises.The Bank classifies it as an upper-middle-income economy.()Bulgaria has experienced rapid economic growth , even though its income level remains one of the lowest within the EU with an average monthly wage of 689 leva (354 euro).(Average Bulgarian Salary Up to BGN 689 March 2011, Novinite, 11 May 2011) According to Eurostat data, Bulgarian PPS GDP per capita stood at 44% of the EU average in 2010,() while at the same time the cost of living in the country was 51% of the EU average.() The lev is the countrys national currency. The lev is pegged to the euro at a rate of 1.95583 levs for 1 euro.(Fixed currency exchange rates, Bulgarian National Bank.)Corruption in the public administration and a weak judiciary have hampered Bulgarias economic development.() However, it is ranked 51st in the Ease of Doing Business rank list, higher than most other Eastern European states,(Ease of Doing Business Ranking) and is ranked 28th in the Freedom of the World index, outperforming the Netherlands and South Korea. In addition, Bulgaria has the lowest personal and corporate income tax rates in the EU,(Ireland Stays in Bulgaria-Led Club of Low Corporate Taxes, Ups Income Levy, Novinite, November 22, 2010) as well as the second lowest debt of all European Union member states at 16.2% of GDP in 2010.(European public debt at a glance, CNN, July 21, 2011) In 2010, GDP (PPP) was estimated at $96.778 billion, with a per capita value of $12,851.() The services sector accounts for 63.7% of the GDP, followed by the industry with 30.3% and agriculture with 6.0%. Major industries include iron, copper, and coal extraction, electronics, chemicals, machinery, steel and petroleum fuel production, automobiles and vehicle components, firearms and materials. The total labor force amounts to 2.5 million people.(Labour force rank list, CIA The World Factbook.) File:Kaliakra wind turbines.jpg|upright|thumb|left|turbines near Kaliakra. Bulgaria aims at producing 16 % of its electricity from renewable energy sources by 2020.(AES wind farm kicks off in Bulgaria, physorg.com, 6 October 2009)  Amidst the crisis of 20072010, unemployment rates increased to 9.1% in 2009, while GDP growth contracted from 6.3% (2008) to 4.9% (2009). The crisis had a negative impact mostly on industry, with a 10% decline in the national industrial production index, a 31% drop in mining, and a 60% drop in ferrous and metal production.(Economist: financial crisis brewed by U.S. market fundamentalism , Xinhua, 12 March 2009) Positive growth was restored to 0.3% in 2010. Although it has relatively few reserves of fossil fuels, Bulgarias well-developed energy sector and strategic geographical location make it a key European energy hub.(Energy Hub, 13.10.2008, Oxford Business Group.) A single nuclear power station with two active  reactors satisfies 34% of the countrys energy needs,( .   .) and another nuclear power station with a projected capacity of  is under construction.  have seen a rapid increase in electricity production from renewable energy sources such as wind and solar power,() making Bulgaria one of the fastest-growing wind energy producers in the world.(Bulgaria set for massive growth in wind power, European Wind Energy Association, 2010) The industry is concentrated around textiles, metallurgy, fuel and processing, production of various chemicals, machine building and mining. In Europe, the country ranks as the 3rd-largest copper producer,(See of countries by copper mine production) 6th-largest zinc producer,(See of countries by zinc production) and 9th-largest coal producer,(See of countries by coal production.) and is the 9th-largest bismuth producer in the world.(See of countries by bismuth production) In contrast with the industrial sector, agriculture has marked a decline since the beginning of the 2000s, with production in 2008 amounting to only 66% of that between 1999 and 2001.() Overall, the agricultural sector has dwindled since 1990, with cereal and vegetable yields dropping nearly 40% by 1999.(Bulgaria  Natural conditions, farming traditions and agricultural structures, Food and Agriculture Organization.) A five-year modernization and development program was launched by the government in 2007, aimed at strengthening the sector by investing a total of 3.2 billion euro.(  388 . .     , dnes.bg, 05.02.2010) Specialized equipment amounts to some 25,000 tractors and 5,500 harvesters, with a fleet of light aircraft.(Bulgaria  Agriculture, nationsencyclopedia.com) Bulgaria remains a major European producer of agricultural commodities such as tobacco (3rd)() and raspberries (12th).()TourismFile:Maliovitca 05.jpg|thumb|Rila mountain is among Bulgarias primary destinations.File:BDZ Baureihe 9452.JPG|thumb|right|A Siemens railcar of the State Railways. Bulgarias largely antiquated rail transport system is gradually being modernized.(     , mediapool.bg, 11August 2008)(      580 .  , 24 April 2008.)In 2008 Bulgaria was visited by a total of 8,900,000 people, with Greeks, Romanians and Germans accounting for more than 40% of all visitors.() Significant numbers of British, Russian, Dutch, Serbian, Polish and Danish tourists also visit Bulgaria. In 2010, Planet ranked it among its top 10 travel destinations for 2011.(Lonely Planets top 10 countries for 2011, Lonely Planet, 31 October 2010)Main destinations include the capital Sofia, coastal resorts Albena, Sozopol, Nesebar, Sands and Beach and winter resorts such as Pamporovo, Chepelare, Borovetz and Bansko. The rural tourist destinations of Arbanasi and Bozhentsi offer well-preserved ethnographic traditions. Other popular attractions include the 10th-century Monastery and the 19th-century Euxinograd chteau.InfrastructureBulgaria occupies a unique and strategically important geographic location. Since ancient times, the country has served as a major crossroads between Europe, Asia and Africa. Five of the ten Trans-European corridors run through its territory.Bulgarias national road network has a total length of , of which  are paved. Motorways, such as Trakiya, Hemus and Struma, have a total length of . Bulgaria also has  of railway track, more than 60% of which is electrified, and plans to construct a railway by 2017, at a cost of 3 bln.()(  -     2017 ., investor.bg, 13.11.2008) Sofia and Plovdiv are major air travel hubs, while Varna and Burgas are the principal maritime trade ports.Science and technologyFile:Rozhen dome 3.jpg|thumb|left|Tower of the  telescope at the Observatory.Bulgaria has traditions in astronomy, physics, nuclear technology, medical and pharmaceutical research, and maintains an Antarctic exploration program by means of an artificial satellite and a permanent research base. The Academy of Sciences (BAS) is the leading scientific institution in the country and employs most of Bulgarias researchers in its numerous branches. In 2008 Bulgaria spent 0.4% of its GDP on scientific research,(    2008 ., .) which represents one of the lowest scientific budgets in Europe.()Chronic underinvestment in the scientific sector since 1990 forced many scientific professionals to leave the country.(, .             , . , .1, 2007)Bulgarian scientists have made several notable discoveries and inventions, such as the prototype of the digital watch (Petroff); galantamine (Paskov);(Heinrich, M. and H.L. Teoh (2004) Galanthamine from snowdrop  the development of a modern drug against Alzheimers disease from local Caucasian knowledge. Journal of Ethnopharmacology 92: 147162.  PMID 15137996)(Scott LJ, Goa KL. Adis Review: Galantamine: a review of its use in Alzheimers disease. Drugs 2000;60(5):1095-122 PMID 11129124) the molecular-kinetic theory of formation and growth (formulated by Stranski) and the space greenhouse (SRI-BAS).(Bulgaria Marks Anniversary of Space Greenhouse, Novinite, April 2005)(Six-month space greenhouse experiments--a step to creation of future biological life support systems., 1998) With major-general Ivanov flying on 33 in 1979, Bulgaria became the 6th country in the world to have an astronaut in space.(See of space travel by nationality)Due to its large-scale computing technology exports to COMECON states, in the 1980s Bulgaria became known as the Valley of the Bloc.(IT Services: Rila Establishes Bulgarian Beachhead in UK, findarticles.com, 24 June 1999) The country ranked 8th in the world in 2002 by total number of ICT specialists, outperforming countries with far larger populations,() and it operates the only supercomputer in the Balkan region,() an IBM Gene/P, which entered service in September 2008.(IBM Supercomputer Boosts Bulgarias Advance Towards Knowledge-Based Economy, IBM Press Room, 9 September 2008)DemographicsThe data of the 2011 census gives a figure of 7,364,570 inhabitants,() down from a peak population of 9 million inhabitants in 1989.Bulgaria is in a state of demographic crisis,(UN: Bulgaria Faces Demographic Crisis over Ageing Population, Novinite.com, 18 January 2010) and has had negative population growth since the early 1990s,() with the countrys economic difficulties leading to low fertility rates and high levels of emigration. Despite some progress, the population is still decreasing by 30,000 people per year(NSI Population table to 2050) and the growth rate is the lowest of any sovereign nation in the world.(Country Comparison :: Population growth rate, CIA The World Factbook)According to the 2001 census,() the population of 7,932,984 people consists mainly of 6,655,210 ethnic Bulgarians (83.9%), followed by the Turkish (9.4%) and Roma minority (4.7%). Of the remaining 2%, 0.9% comprises some 40 smaller minorities, while 1.1% of the population have not declared their ethnicity. Some 6,700,000 people (~85%) speak Bulgarian as their mother tongue,( which belongs to the group of Slavic languages and is the only official language. According to the 2001 census most of the population (82.6%) self-identify as Christian.( The Bulgarian Orthodox Church gained autocephalous status in 927 AD(Kiminas, D. (2009). The Ecumenical Patriarchate. Wildside Press LLC. p. 15)(Carvalho, Joaquim. (2007). Religion and power in Europe: conflict and convergence. Pisa University Press. p. 257.) and is the earliest Orthodox Church.()() Other religious denominations include Islam (12.2%), Catholicism (0.6%) and Protestantism (0.5%); with other religions (0.2%), and with not stated totalling approximately 4%.(Bulgaria regards itself officially as a state. The Constitution guarantees the free exercise of religion, but appoints Orthodoxy as a traditional religion.()EducationThe Ministry of Education, Youth and Science oversees education in Bulgaria. All children aged between 7 and 16 must attend full-time education. Six-year-olds can enroll at school at their parents discretion. The State provides education in its schools free of charge, except for higher education establishments, colleges and universities. The curriculum focuses on eight main subject-areas:(Country Profile: Bulgaria. Library of Congress Country Studies Program. October 2006. p6. http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/profiles/Bulgaria.pdf) language and literature, foreign languages, mathematics, technology, sciences and humanities, sciences and ecology, music and art, physical education and sports.Government estimates from 2003 put the rate at 98.6%, approximately the same for both sexes. Bulgaria has traditionally had high educational standards.(HealthBulgaria has a universal, mostly state-funded healthcare system. The National Health Insurance Fund (NHIF) pays a gradually increasing portion of the costs of primary healthcare. Employees and employers pay an increasing, mandatory percentage of salaries, with the goal of gradually reducing state support of health care. Between 2002 and 2004, health-care expenditures in the national budget increased from 3.8% to 4.3%, with the NHIF accounting for more than 60% of annual expenditures.(Bulgaria country profile. of Congress Research Division (October 2006). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.) In 2010, the healthcare budget amounts to 4.2% of GDP, or about 1.3 billion euro.(, ,        2010, econ.bg, 28 October 2009) Bulgaria has 181 doctors per 100,000 people, which is above the EU average.(       -   , econ.bg, 17 February 2010. Accessed 30 August 2010.) Some of Bulgarias largest medical facilities are the Hospital and the Medical Academy of Sofia. Life expectancy is 73.6 years, which is below the European union average.(Life expectancy at birth rankings. CIA The World Factbook, 2010)UrbanizationMost of the population (72.5%) resides in urban areas.() Bulgarias 20 largest cities have populations as follows:(Head Direction of Residential Registration and Administrative Service. Population table by permanent and present address as of 15 March 2008.)CultureFile:Theater Plovdiv.JPG|thumb|Ancient architecture in Plovdiv, the oldest city in Europe(Plovdiv: New ventures for Europes oldest inhabited city, The Courier, January/February 2010) and the 6th oldest settlement in the world, continuously inhabited since at least 3,000 BC.(The Worlds Oldest Cities, Daily Telegraph)Traditional Bulgarian culture contains mainly Thracian, Slavic and Bulgar heritage, along with Greek, Roman, Ottoman and Celtic influences.(Bulgarias Gold Rush, National Geographic Magazine, December 2006.) Thracian artifacts include numerous tombs and golden treasures. The countrys territory includes parts of the Roman provinces of Moesia, Thrace and Macedonia, and many of the archaeological discoveries date back to Roman times, while ancient Bulgars have also left traces of their heritage in music and in early architecture. Both the First and the Second Bulgarian empires functioned as the hub of culture during much of the Middle Ages, exerting considerable literary and cultural influence over the Eastern Orthodox Slavic world by means of the Preslav and Literary Schools. The alphabet, used as a writing system to many languages in Eastern Europe and Asia, originated in the former around the 9th century AD.(Paul Cubberley (1996) The Slavic Alphabets. In Daniels and Bright, eds. The Worlds Writing Systems. Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-507993-0.)Archaeological and World Heritage sitesA vast number of archaeological sites from all eras are scattered around the countrys territory. Bulgaria has the third-largest total number of uncovered archaeological sites in Europe after Italy and Greece,(Bulgarias Treasure Hunters and the Lost Rome, novinite.com, 2 June 2011) and many of them are Thracian in origin. A historical artifact of major importance is the oldest golden treasure in the world, dating back to 5,000 BC, coming from the site of the Necropolis.(New perspectives on the Varna cemetery (Bulgaria), By: Higham, Tom; Chapman, John; Slavchev, Vladimir; Gaydarska, Bisserka; Honch, Noah; Yordanov, Yordan; Dimitrova, Branimira; 1 September 2007)()Apart from these sites, nine World Heritage Sites exist:  the Rider, the Thracian tombs in Sveshtari and Kazanlak, the Church, the Monastery, the Churches of Ivanovo, National Park, Sreburna Nature Reserve and the ancient city of Nesebar.Art, music and literatureBulgarian musical tradition is long-standing and can be traced back to the early Ages and the works of Kukuzel (c. 12801360). National folk music has a distinctive sound and uses a wide range of traditional instruments, such as gudulka, gaida (bagpipe), kaval and tupan. The State Television Female Vocal Choir is the most famous performing folk ensemble, and received a Award in 1990.(see Award for Best Traditional Folk Album) Bulgarian classical music is represented by composers  Manolov, Vladigerov, Goleminov and Georgi Atanasov, opera singers Dimitrova, Boris Hristov and Kabaivanska, and pianists Weissenberg and Stanev.File:Peio Yavorov.jpeg|thumb|left|upright|Symbolist poet YavorovBulgaria has a rich religious visual arts heritage, especially in frescoes, murals and icons, many of them produced by the medieval Tarnovo Artistic School.(Graba, A. La peinture religiouse en Bulgarie, Paris, 1928, p. 95)One of the earliest pieces of Slavic literature were created in Medieval Bulgaria, such as The Didactic Gospel by of Preslav and An Account of Letters by Hrabar, both written c. 893. Notable Bulgarian authors include late Romantic Vazov, Symbolists Slaveykov and Yavorov, Expressionist Milev, fiction writer Vezhinov, novelist Dimov and postmodernist Popov. German-language writer Canetti was the only Bulgarian to win the Prize (Literature, 1981).()MediaThe media in Bulgaria has a record of unbiased reporting.() The written media have no legal restrictions and newspaper publishing is entirely liberal.(Media Landscape  Bulgaria, European Journalism Centre) The extensive freedom of the press means that no exact number of publications can be established, although some research put an estimate of around 900 print media outlets for 2006.( The largest-circulation daily newspapers include Trud and Chasa.(Non-printed media sources, such as television and radio, are overseen by the Council for Electronic Media (CEM), an independent body with the authority to issue broadcasting licenses. Apart from a state-operated national television channel, radio station and the News Agency, a large number of private television and radio stations exist. However, most Bulgarian media experience a number of negative trends, such as general degradation of media products, self-censorship and economic or political pressure.(Footprint of Financial Crisis in the Media, Bulgaria Country Report, Open Society Institute, December 2009) Show and Na Efira are among the most popular TV programs, both having more than 1,000,000 views per show.(20- -    bTV,  !, slusham.com, January 2010)Internet media are growing in popularity due to the wide range of available opinions and viewpoints, lack of censorship and diverse content.( Since 2000, a rapid increase in the number of Internet users has occurred  from 430,000 they grew to 1,545,100 in 2004, and 3.4 million (48% penetration rate) in 2010.() Bulgaria has the fastest average Broadband Internet speed in the world after Romania and South Korea.(Latvia and Lithuania in TOP-5 in world in terms of Internet download speed)CuisineFile:.jpg|thumb|170px|right|Rakiya distilled in Elena, central BulgariaYogurt (kiselo mlyako), lukanka, banitsa, salad, lyutenitsa and kozunak give Bulgaria a distinctive cuisine. Most dishes are oven baked, steamed, or in the form of stew. Deep-frying is uncommon, but grilling  especially different kinds of meats  is widely practiced. Pork is the most common meat, followed by chicken and lamb. Oriental dishes such as moussaka, gyuvech, and baklava are also present. Bulgarian cuisine is also noted for the quality of dairy products (a large variety of sirene and kashkaval cheese sorts) and salads, as well as the variety of wines and local alcoholic drinks such as rakiya, mastika and menta.Exports of wine go worldwide, and until 1990 the country exported the worlds second-largest total of bottled wine. As of 2007, more than 200,000 tonnes of wine were produced annually.() Among the more prominent local sorts are Dimiat and Mavrud.SportsFile:DSC02210qweqwewq.JPG|thumb|left|The national volleyball team in the FIVB World League qualificationBulgaria performs well in sports such as volleyball, wrestling, weight-lifting, canoeing, rowing, sports, gymnastics, chess, and recently, wrestling and tennis. The country fields one of the leading mens volleyball teams, ranked 6th in the world according to the 2011 FIVB rankings,() while the womens volleyball team finished second in European League 2010.(Volleyball: Bulgaria wins third place in womens European League, focus-nes.bg, 25 July 2010)(2011 CEV European League  RESULTS, Europenne de Volleyball official website)Football has become by far the most popular sport in the country. Some of the most famous players are Manchester United forward Berbatov and Stoichkov, twice winner of the Golden Shoe and the most successful Bulgarian player of all time.(Hristo Stoichkov  Bulgarian League Ambassador, Professional Football Against Hunger)(Hristo Stoichkov: For sure Barcelona will win tonight, news.bg, 27.05.2009) Prominent domestic football clubs include CSKA Sofia()()and Levski Sofia. Bulgarias best performance at World Cup finals came in 1994, with a 4th place.Bulgaria participates in most Olympic competitions since its first appearance at the 1896 games, when it was represented by Champaud. The country has appeared in most Summer Olympiads, and by 2010 had won a total of 218 medals: 52 gold, 86 silver, and 80 bronze, which puts it at 24th place in the all-time ranking.Wimbledon semi-finalist Pironkova is also Bulgarian.See also*resistance movement during World War II*of Bulgarian monarchs*of twin towns and sister cities in BulgariaReferences Further reading * Chary, Frederick B. The History of Bulgaria (The Greenwood Histories of the Modern Nations) (2011)  excerpt and text search* Detrez, Raymond. Historical Dictionary of Bulgaria (2nd ed. 2006). lxiv + 638 pp. Maps, bibliography, appendix, chronology. ISBN 978-0-8108-4901-3.* Crampton, R. J. A Concise History of Bulgaria (2005) Cambridge, UK; New York: Cambridge University Press ISBN 9780521616379* Bell, John D., ed. (1998). Bulgaria in Transition: Politics, Economics, Society, and Culture after Communism. Westview. ISBN 978-0813390109* Chary, Frederick B., The Bulgarian Jews and the Final Solution 19401944. University of Pittsburg Press (1972). ISBN 0-8229-3251-2* * * Hall, Richard C. Bulgarias Road to the First World War (1996) New York: Columbia University Press ISBN 088033357X* Lampe, John R. The Bulgarian Economy in the Twentieth Century (1986) London: Croom Helm ISBN 0709916442* Miller-Yianni, Simple Treasures in Bulgaria (2008) UK; Lulu Inc. ISBN 978-0-9559-8490-7* Miller-Yianni, Bulgarian History: A Concise Account (2010) UK; Lulu Inc. ISBN 978-1-4457-1633-6* Perry, Duncan M. Stefan Stambolov and the Emergence of Modern Bulgaria, 18701895 (1993) Durham: Duke University Press ISBN 0822313138* * Todorov, Tzvetan The fragility of goodness: why Bulgarias Jews survived the Holocaust: a collection of texts with commentary (2001) Princeton: Princeton University Press ISBN 0691088322* Dimana Trankova, Anthony Georgieff, Guide to Jewish Bulgaria, Vagabond Media Sofia, 2011, http://www.vagabond.bg/jewishbulgariaExternal links Government * Official governmental site* President of The Republic of Bulgaria* National Assembly of the Republic of Bulgaria* Chief of State and Cabinet Members General information * * Bulgaria information from the States Department of State* Portals to the World from the United States of Congress* Bulgaria at UCB Libraries GovPubs*  Travel * list list ace:Bulgariakbd:af:Bulgaryeals:Bulgarienam:ang:Pulgaralandab:ar:an:Bulgariaarc:roa-rup:Vurgariafrp:Bulgarieast:Bulgariagn:Vugariaaz:Bolqarstanbn:zh-min-nan:Bulgariyaba:be:be-x-old:bcl:Bulgaryabi:Bulgariabar:Bulgarienbo:bs:Bugarskabr:Bulgariabg:ca:Bulgriacv:ceb:Bulgariacs:Bulharskoco:Bulgariacy:Bwlgariada:Bulgarienpdc:Bulgariende:Bulgariendv:Bikyahdsb:Bulgarskaet:Bulgaariael:eml:Bulgares:Bulgariaeo:Bulgarioext:Bulgriaeu:Bulgariaee:Bulgariafa:hif:Bulgariafo:Bulgariafr:Bulgariefy:Bulgarijefur:BulgarieBhulgirVulgeyrgag:Bulgariyagd:Bulgiria- gu:got:hak:P-k-li-ko:haw:Pulukaliahy:hi:hsb:Boharskahr:Bugarskaio:Bulgariailo:Bulgariabpy:id:Bulgariaia:Bulgariaie:Bulgariaos:is:Blgarait:Bulgariahe:jv:Bulgariakl:Bulgariakn:pam:Bulgariaka:ks:csb:Blgarskkk:kw:Bulgarirw:Bulugariyaky:rn:Bulgariasw:Bulgariakv:kg:Balgariaht:Bilgariku:Bulgaristanlad:Bulgariakoi:krc:la:Bulgarialv:Bulgrijalb:Bulgarienlt:Bulgarijalij:Bulgiali:Blgarijeln:Bulgariajbo:bylgAri,aslmo:Blgariahu:Bulgriamk:ml:mt:Bulgarijami:Purukrialtg:Bulgarejamr:arz:ms:Bulgariamn:my:nah:Bulgariana:Borgeriyanl:Bulgarijends-nl:Bulgarijene:new:ja:nap:Bulgariace:frr:Bulgarienpih:Bulgeriyano:Bulgariann:Bulgarianrm:Bulgarienov:Bulgariaoc:Bulgariamhr:uz:Bolgariyapnb:ps:pms:Bulgaratpi:Balgeriands:Bulgarienpl:Bugariapnt:pt:Bulgriakaa:Bolgariyacrh:Bularistanro:Bulgariarmy:Bulgariyarm:Bulgariaqu:Bulgaryarue:ru:sah:se:Bulgariasm:Bultaliasa:sc:Bulgariasco:Bulgariestq:Bulgariensq:Bullgariascn:Bulgarasimple:Bulgariass:IBhulgariyask:Bulharskocu:sl:Bolgarijaszl:Bugaryjoso:Bulgariackb:srn:Bulgarikondresr:sh:Bugarskasu:Bulgariafi:Bulgariasv:Bulgarientl:Bulgaryata:roa-tara:Bulgariett:te:tet:Bulgriath:tg:tr:Bulgaristantk:Bolgariaudm:uk:ur:ug:vec:Bulgariavi:Bulgariavo:Bulgarnfiu-vro:Bulgaariawa:Bulgreyezh-classical:vls:Bulgareyewar:Bulgaryawo:Bulgaarixmf:wuu:yi:yo:Blgrzh-yue:diq:Bularstanzea:Bulharijebat-smg:Bulgarjzh:
3458
Belize
footnote1  1These ranks are based on the 2007 figures.Belize  (formerly Honduras) is a monarchy and the northernmost state in America. Belize has a diverse society, comprising many cultures and languages. Even though Kriol and Spanish are spoken among the population, Belize is the only country in Central America where English is the official language. Belize is bordered to the north by Mexico, south and west by Guatemala, and to the east by the Sea. Belizes mainland is about  long and  wide.With  of land and a population of only 333,200 people (2010 est.),() Belize possesses the lowest population density in Central America.() The countrys population growth rate of 2.21% (2008 est.),( however, is the highest in the region and one of the highest in the western hemisphere. Belizes abundance of terrestrial and marine species, and its diversity of ecosystems give it a key place within the globally significant Mesoamerican Biological Corridor.(http://biological-diversity.info/Downloads/Ecosystem%20Mapping.zip)Belize is culturally unique among its Central American neighbours; it is the only nation in the region with a British colonial heritage. As a part of the Caribbean Zone, however, it also shares a common heritage with the Caribbean portions of other Central American countries. In general, Belize is considered to be a Central American nation with strong ties to both the Caribbean and America. Belize is a member of the Community (CARICOM), and Sistema de la Integracin Centroamericana (SICA).EtymologyThe origin of the name Belize is unclear, but one idea is that the name is from the native Maya word belix, meaning muddy water, applied to the River. Others have suggested that it is derived from a Spanish pronunciation of the name of the Scottish buccaneer Peter Wallace, which was applied to an early settlement along the River and to the river itself.() Belize has a sizeable proportion of Africans from the ancient of Kongo, who could have brought the name with them, as there is a Belize in Angola as well.HistoryEarly historyFile:Xunantunich09.jpg|thumb|El Castillo at XunantunichThe civilization spread itself over the area which is today Belize beginning in around 1500 BC and flourished there until about A.D. 800. The recorded history of the centre and south is dominated by Caracol, where the inscriptions on their monuments were, as elsewhere, in the Lowland Maya aristocratic tongue Classic Choltian.() North of the Mountains, the inscriptional language at Lamanai was Yucatecan as of A.D. 625.(Michael P. Closs, The Hieroglyphic Text of Stela 9, Lamanai, Belize, 13 from Closs, 1987)In the late classic period of Maya civilization (before A.D. 1000), as many as 400,000 people may have lived in the area that is now Belize. Some lowland Maya still occupied the area when Europeans arrived in the 16th century. By then the primary inhabitants were the Mopan branch of the Yucatec Maya.Spanish colonists tried to settle the inland areas of Belize, but Maya rebellions and attacks forced them to abandon these efforts.English and Scottish buccaneers known as the Baymen first settled on the coast of Belize in 1638, seeking a sheltered region from which they could attack Spanish ships (see settlement in Belize). The settlers turned to cutting logwood during the 18th century. The wood yielded a fixing agent for clothing dyes that was vital to the European woollen industry. The Spanish granted the British settlers the right to occupy the area and cut logwood in exchange for an end to piracy.(Bolland, Nigel. Belize: Historical Setting. In A Country Study: Belize (Tim Merrill, editor). of Congress Research Division (January 1992). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.)Battle of St. Georges CayeThe Battle of St. Georges Caye was a short military engagement that lasted from 310 September 1798, undertaken off the coast of what is now Belize. The name, however, is typically reserved for the final battle that occurred on 10 September. The British first appointed a superintendent over the Belize area in 1786. Prior to that time, the British government did not initially recognize the settlement in Belize as a colony for fear of provoking Spanish attack. The delay in government oversight allowed the settlers to establish their own laws and forms of government. During this time a few wealthy settlers gained control of the local legislature, known as the Public Meeting, as well as of most of the settlements land and timber.The battle took place between an invading force from what would become Mexico, attempting to wrest Belize for Spain, and a small force of resident woodcutters called Baymen, who fought for their livelihood assisted by black slaves.  The Spanish repeatedly tried to gain control over Belize by force, but were unsuccessful. Spains last effort occurred on 10 September 1798, when the British repelled the Spanish fleet in a short engagement with no known casualties on either side known as the of St. Georges Caye. The anniversary of the battle is now a national holiday in Belize.As part of the British EmpireIn the early 19th century, the British sought greater control over the settlers, threatening to suspend the Public Meeting unless it observed the governments instructions to eliminate slavery in whole. Slavery was abolished in the Empire in 1838, but this did little to change working conditions for labourers in the Belize settlement. Slaves of the colony were valued for their potentially superior abilities in the work of mahogany extraction. As a result, former slave owners in British Honduras earned 53.6.9 on average per slave, the highest amount paid in any British territory.()Soon after, a series of institutions were put in place to ensure the continued presence of a viable labour force. Some of these greatly restricted the ability of individuals to obtain land, in a debt-peonage system to organise the newly free. The position of being extra special mahogany and logwood cutters undergirded the early ascriptions of the capacities (and consequently the limitations) of people of African descent in the colony. Because a small elite controlled the settlements land and commerce, former slaves had no choice but to continue to work in timber cutting.(In 1836, after the emancipation of Central America from Spanish rule, the British claimed the right to administer the region. In 1862, Great Britain formally declared it a Crown Colony, subordinate to Jamaica, and named it British Honduras.(Frommers Belize by Eliot Greenspan, page 279) As a colony, Belize began to attract British investors. Among the British firms that dominated the colony in the late 19th century was the Belize Estate and Produce Company, which eventually acquired half of all the privately held land in the colony. Belize Estates influence accounts in part for the colonys reliance on the mahogany trade throughout the rest of the 19th century and the first half of the 20th century.The Depression of the 1930s caused a near-collapse of the colonial economy as British demand for timber plummeted. The effects of widespread unemployment were worsened by a devastating hurricane that struck the colony in 1931. Perceptions of the governments relief effort as inadequate were aggravated by its refusal to legalize labour unions or introduce a minimum wage. Demonstrations and riots in 1934 marked the beginning of an independence movement. In response, the government repealed criminal penalties for workers who violated the terms of their labour contracts regarding unions and granted workers the right to join unions.Economic conditions improved during World War II (19391945) when many Belizean men entered the armed forces or otherwise contributed labour to the war effort. Following the war, the colonys economy again stagnated due to the pressures caused by its damaging effect. Britains decision to devalue the British Honduras dollar in 1949 worsened economic conditions and led to the creation of the Peoples Committee, which demanded independence. The Peoples Committees successor, the United Party (PUP), sought constitutional reforms that would expand voting rights to all adults. Independence Constitutional reforms were initiated in 1954 and resulted in a new constitution ten years later. Britain granted British Honduras self-government in 1964, and the head of the PUPindependence leader George Pricebecame the colonys prime minister. British Honduras was officially renamed Belize in 1973. Progress toward independence, however, was hampered by a Guatemalan claim to sovereignty over the territory of Belize. When Belize finally attained full independence on 21 September 1981, Guatemala refused to recognise the new nation. About 1,500 British troops remained to protect Belize from the Guatemalan threat.With Price at the helm, the PUP won all elections until 1984. In that election, the first national election after independence, the PUP was defeated by the United Democratic Party (UDP), and UDP leader Esquivel replaced Price as prime minister. Price returned to power after elections in 1989. Guatemalas president formally recognised Belizes independence in 1992. The following year the United Kingdom announced that it would end its military involvement in Belize. British soldiers were withdrawn in 1994, but the United Kingdom left behind a military training unit to assist with the newly formed Belize Defence Force.The UDP regained power in the 1993 national election, and Esquivel became prime minister for a second time. Soon afterwards Esquivel announced the suspension of a pact reached with Guatemala during Prices tenure, claiming Price had made too many concessions in order to gain Guatemalan recognition. The pact may have curtailed the 130-year-old border dispute between the two countries. Border tensions continued into the early 2000s, although the two countries cooperated in other areas.The PUP won a landslide victory in the 1998 national elections, and PUP leader Musa was sworn in as prime minister. In the 2003 elections the PUP maintained its majority, and Musa continued as prime minister. He pledged to improve conditions in the underdeveloped and largely inaccessible southern part of Belize.In 2005, Belize was the site of unrest caused by discontent with the United Party government, including tax increases in the national budget. On 8 February 2008, Dean Barrow was sworn in as prime minister after his UDP won a landslide victory in general elections.Throughout Belizes history, Guatemala has claimed ownership of all or part of the territory. This claim is occasionally reflected in maps showing Belize as Guatemalas twenty-third department. As of March 2007, the border dispute with Guatemala remains unresolved and quite contentious.()() Guatemalas claim to Belizean territory rests, in part, on the terms Clause VII of the Anglo-Guatemalan Treaty of 1859 which (supposedly) obligated the British to build a road between Belize City and Guatemala. At various times the issue has required mediation by the United Kingdom, Community heads of Government, the of American States, Mexico, and the United States. Notably, both Guatemala and Belize are participating in confidence-building measures approved by the OAS, including the Guatemala-Belize Language Exchange Project.()Since independence, a British garrison has been retained in Belize at the request of the Belizean government including, at times, Harrier jets.Geography File:BigRockFalls.jpg|upright|thumb|Rock Falls in the Cayo DistrictBelize is located on the Caribbean coast of northern Central America. It shares a border on the north with the Mexican state of Roo, on the west with the Guatemalan department of Petn, and on the south with the Guatemalan department of Izabal. To the east in the Caribbean Sea, the second-longest barrier reef in the world flanks much of the  of predominantly marshy coastline. The area of the country totals , an area slightly larger than Salvador or Massachusetts. The abundance of lagoons along the coasts and in the northern interior reduces the actual land area to .Belize is shaped like a rectangle that extends about  north-south and about  east-west, with a total land boundary length of . The undulating courses of two rivers, the Hondo and the River, define much of the course of the countrys northern and southern boundaries. The western border follows no natural features and runs north-south through lowland forest and highland plateau. The north of Belize consists mostly of flat, swampy coastal plains, in places heavily forested. The flora is highly diverse considering the small geographical area. The south contains the low range of the Maya Mountains. The highest point in Belize is Delight at .()The Caribbean coast is lined with a reef and some 450 islets and islands known locally as cayes (pronounced keys). They total about , and form the approximately  long Barrier Reef, the longest in the Western Hemisphere and the second longest in the world after the Barrier Reef. Three of merely four coral atolls in the Western Hemisphere are located off the coast of Belize.ClimateBelize has a climate with pronounced wet and seasons, although there are significant variations in weather patterns by region. Temperatures vary according to elevation, proximity to the coast, and the moderating effects of the northeast trade winds off the Caribbean. Average temperatures in the coastal regions range from  in January to  in July. Temperatures are slightly higher inland, except for the southern highland plateaus, such as the Pine Ridge, where it is noticeably cooler year round. Overall, the seasons are marked more by differences in humidity and rainfall than in temperature.Average rainfall varies considerably, ranging from  in the north and west to over  in the extreme south. Seasonal differences in rainfall are greatest in the northern and central regions of the country where, between January and April or May, fewer than  of rain fall per month. The dry season is shorter in the south, normally only lasting from February to April. A shorter, less rainy period, known locally as the little dry, usually occurs in late July or August, after the initial onset of the rainy season.Hurricanes have played keyand devastatingroles in Belizean history. In 1931 an unnamed hurricane destroyed over two-thirds of the buildings in Belize City and killed more than 1,000 people. In 1955 Janet levelled the northern town of Corozal. Only six years later, Hattie struck the central coastal area of the country, with winds in excess of  and  storm tides. The devastation of Belize City for the second time in thirty years prompted the relocation of the capital some  inland to the planned city of Belmopan. Hurricane Greta caused more than US$25 million in damages along the southern coast in 1978. On 9 October 2001, Iris made landfall at Monkey River Town as a  Category Four storm. The storm demolished most of the homes in the village, and destroyed the banana crop. In 2007 Dean made landfall as a Category 5 storm only 25 miles north of the Belize/Mexico border. Dean caused extensive damage in northern Belize. The most recent hurricane to affect Belize directly was the Category 2 Richard, making landfall approximately 20 miles south-southeast of Belize City at around 0045 UTC on 25 October 2010.()  The storm moved inland towards Belmopan, causing estimated damage of BZ$33.8 million ($17.4 million 2010 USD), primarily from damage to crops and housing.(http://www.reporter.bz/index.php?modarticle&catHeadline&article4721)VegetationWhile over 60% of Belizes land surface is covered by forest,(Cherrington, E.A., Ek, E., Cho, P., Howell, B.F., Hernandez, B.E., Anderson, E.R., Flores, A.I., Garcia, B.C., Sempris, E., and D.E. Irwin. (2010) Forest Cover and Deforestation in Belize: 19802010. Water Center for the Humid Tropics of Latin America and the Caribbean. Panama City, Panama. 42 pp. http://www.servir.net/servir_bz_forest_cover_1980-2010.pdf) recent studies indicate that some 20% of the countrys land is covered by cultivated land (agriculture) and human settlements.() Savannah, scrubland and wetland constitute the remainder of Belizes land cover. Important mangrove ecosystems are also represented across Belizes landscape.(Murray, M.R., Zisman, S.A., Furley, P.A., Munro, D.M., Gibson, J., Ratter, J., Bridgewater, S., Mity, C.D., and C.J. Place. 2003. The Mangroves of Belize: Part 1. Distribution, Composition and Classification. Forest Ecology and Management 174: 265279)(Cherrington, E.A., Hernandez, B.E., Trejos, N.A., Smith, O.A., Anderson, E.R., Flores, A.I., and B.C. Garcia. 2010. Identification of Threatened and Resilient Mangroves in the Belize Barrier Reef System. Technical report to the World Wildlife Fund. Water Center for the Humid Tropics of Latin America and the Caribbean (CATHALAC) / Regional Visualization & Monitoring System (SERVIR). 28 pp. http://maps.cathalac.org/Downloads/data/bz/bz_mangroves_1980-2010_highres.pdf) As a part of the globally significant Mesoamerican Biological Corridor which stretches from southern Mexico to Panama, Belizes biodiversity  both marine and terrestrial  is rich, with abundant flora and fauna. Belize is also a leader where it comes to protecting its biodiversity and natural resources. Recent (July 2010) information() from the Association of Protected Areas Management Organizations of Belize (APAMO) indicates that some 36% of Belizes land territory falls under some form of official protected status, giving Belize one of the most extensive systems of terrestrial protected areas in the Americas. Neighboring Costa Rica, by contrast, only has 25.8% of its land territory protected.(http://www.unep-wcmc.org/wdpa/statistics/2010MDG_National_Stats.xls) Some 13% of Belizes territorial waters  home to the Belize Barrier Reef System  are also protected. The Belize Barrier Reef System both constitutes a UNESCO-recognized World Heritage Site and the second largest barrier reef in the world, second only to Australias Great Barrier Reef.Forests and deforestationA sensing study conducted by the Water Center for the Humid Tropics of Latin America and the Caribbean (CATHALAC) and NASA, in collaboration with the Forest Department and the Land Information Centre (LIC) of the Government of Belizes Ministry of Natural Resources and the Environment (MNRE), and published in August 2010 revealed that Belizes forest cover in early 2010 was approximately 62.7%, down from 75.9% in late 1980.( A similar study() by Belize Tropical Forest Studies and Conservation International revealed similar trends in terms of Belizes forest cover. Both studies indicate that each year, 0.6% of Belizes forest cover is lost, translating to the clearing of an average of  each year. The USAID-supported SERVIR study by CATHALAC, NASA, and the MNRE also showed that Belizes protected areas have been extremely effective in protecting the countrys forests. While only some 6.4% of forests inside of legally declared protected areas were cleared between 1980 and 2010, over a quarter of forests outside of protected areas had been lost between 1980 and 2010. As a country with a relatively high forest cover and a low deforestation rate, Belize has significant potential for participation in initiatives such as REDD. Significantly, the SERVIR study on Belizes deforestation was also recognized by the intergovernmental Group on Earth Observations (GEO), of which Belize is a member nation.(http://www.earthobservations.org/art_010_002.shtml)Geology, mineral potential, and energyAlthough a number of economically important minerals exist in Belize, none has been found in quantities large enough to warrant their mining. These minerals include dolomite, barite (source of barium), bauxite (source of aluminium), cassiterite (source of tin), and gold. In 1990 limestone, used in road-building, was the only mineral resource being exploited for either domestic or export use.The similarity of Belizean geology to that of oil-producing areas of Mexico and Guatemala prompted oil companies, principally from the United States, to explore for petroleum at both offshore and on-land sites in the early 1980s. Initial results were promising, but the pace of exploration slowed later in the decade, and production operations had been halted. As a result, Belize remains almost totally dependent on imported petroleum for its energy needs. In 2006, the cultivation of newly discovered oil in the town of Lookout has presented new prospects and problems for this developing nation.(Burnett, John (2006). Maya Homeland. Large Oil Field Is Found in Belize; the Angling Begins, 4 January 2007.) The country also possess considerable potential for hydroelectric and other energy resources, such as solar and biomass. In the mid-1980s, one Belizean businessman even proposed the construction of a wood-burning power station for the production of electricity, but the idea foundered in the wake of ecological concerns and economic constraints.EconomyBelize has a small, essentially private enterprise economy that is based primarily on agriculture, agro-based industry, and merchandising, with tourism and construction recently assuming greater importance. In 2006, the exploitation of a newly discovered crude oil field near the town of Lookout has presented new prospects and problems for this developing nation.( It has yet to be seen if significant economic expansion will be made by this. To date, oil production equal   (2007 est.) and oil exports equal  (2006 est.). The country is a producer of industrial minerals.(Dan Oancea: Mining in Central America http://magazine.mining.com/Issues/0901/MiningCentralAmerica.pdf) Sugar, the chief crop, accounts for nearly half of exports, while the banana industry is the countrys largest employer.(The new government faces important challenges to economic stability. Rapid action to improve tax collection has been promised, but a lack of progress in reining in spending could bring the exchange rate under pressure. The tourist and construction sectors strengthened in early 1999, leading to a preliminary estimate of revived growth at 4%. Infrastructure continues to be a major challenge for the economic development of Belize.() Belize has the most expensive electricity in the region. Trade is important and the major trading partners are the United States, Mexico, the Union, and Central America.(BankingBelize has five commercial banks, of which the largest and oldest is Bank. The other four banks are Heritage Bank, Atlantic Bank, International Bank, and Scotiabank (Belize).Industrial InfrastructureThe largest integrated electric utility and the principal distributor in Belize is BEL, an integrated electric utility and distributor. BEL is approximately 70% owned by Fortis Inc., a Canadian investor-owned distribution utility. Fortis took over the management of BEL in 1999, at the invitation of the Government of Belize in an attempt to mitigate prior financial problems within the locally managed utility. In addition to its regulated investment in BEL, Fortis owns Belize Electric Company Limited (BECOL), a non-regulated hydroelectric generation business that operates three hydroelectric generating facilities on the Macal River in Belize.In 2008 the Public Utilities Commission of Belize issued an order that has had a significant negative impact on the financial condition and operations of BEL. The order effectively disallowed the recovery of costs via customer rates and set rates at a level that does not allow BEL to earn a reasonable return. This has led to a deterioration of facilities and service. BEL appealed the rate order, but the court dismissed BELs application, finding that various accepted concepts of good management shall not be applicable in Belize. BEL appealed this judgment to the Court of Appeal; however, a hearing is not expected until 2012. In May 2011, the Supreme Court of Belize granted BELs application to prevent the PUC from taking any enforcement action against BEL pending the appeal. BEL has been in default of financial covenants under its long-term lending agreements since 2008.(http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/43377412 BEL appeals judgment)TourismA combination of natural factorsclimate, the Belize Barrier Reef, over 1,000 offshore Cayes (islands), excellent fishing, safe waters for boating, diving, and snorkeling, numerous rivers for rafting, and kayaking, various jungle and reserves of fauna and flora, for hiking, watching, and helicopter touring, as well as many Maya ruinssupport the thriving tourism and ecotourism industry. Of the hundreds of cave systems, it also has the largest cave system in Central America. Development costs are high, but the Government of Belize has designated tourism as its second development priority after agriculture. In 2007, tourist arrivals totalled 251,655 (with more than 210,000 from the U.S.) and tourist receipts amounted to $183.3 million.File:Caracolfacup o.jpg|The Maya pyramid Caana at Caracol, Cayo District, still the highest man-made structure in BelizeFile:SPBEACH97.jpg|San Pedro Beach in CayeFile:Great Blue Hole.jpg|The Blue Hole, located near Ambergris Caye, BelizeFile:Mountain Pine Ridge Uploaded on_November_28,_2007 by tomeppy.jpg|Panoramic view of the Pine Ridge Forest Reserves numerous mountainsFile:1,000 ft. Falls.png|1,000 ft. Falls in the District of Belize, the highest in Central AmericaFile:BZECAYE.jpg|Half Moon Caye, BelizeFile:High Temple Lamanai 1.jpg|High Temple, Lamanai, BelizeFile:OBZEPIC3.JPG|Cucumber Beach at the Old Belize Adventure Cultural and Historical Center at Mile 4, Belize City, BelizeFile:Actun Tunichil Muknal.jpg| The Crystal Maiden Mayan sacrifice taken from within the cave Tunichil MuknalFile:CavesBranchBZE.jpg| Caves Branch Cave System. Belize possesses the most extensive Cave system in all of Central AmericaFile:St. Johns Cathedral, Belize City.jpg|The St. Johns Cathedral, Belize City, the oldest Anglican Church in Central America or the CaribbeanFile:GsReefAtoll2.jpg|A Glovers Reef Caye. Belize possesses well over 1,000 off shore cayes.Travel into BelizeSan Pedro Belize Express http://sanpedrobelizeexpresswatertaxi.com has over 25 daily departures, 14 first class boats, 4 unique destinations, and first class service to get you to, from and around Belize. Travel to Caye Caulker, Belize City and San Pedro has never been easier. From Mexico and the Yucatan PeninsulaChetumal, Quintana RooThe connecting hub from Mexico to Belize is Chetumal, Quintana Roo.  From Chetumal, take the San Pedro Belize Express water taxi from Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier).  The boat leaves Chetumal enroute to Ambergris Caye every day at 3:30 p.m. and ticket cost is $30 US, one way, $55 US, round trip. Travelers through Mexico can either take the ADO bus to Chetumal or fly from Mexico City to Chetumal on Interjet.  Tulum, Quintana RooTake the ADO autobus from the Tulum station to the Chetumal station.  This trip is approximately 3.5 hours on an air-conditioned, coach bus from Tulum to Chetumal.  From the Chetumal bus station, take a $2.00 US taxi to the San Pedro Belize Express Water Taxi terminal at Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier).  Merida, YucatanTake the ADO autobus from the Merida station to the Chetumal station. This trip is approximately 5.5 hours on an air-conditioned, coach bus from Merida to Chetumal.  From the Chetumal bus station, take a $2.00 US taxi to the San Pedro Belize Express Water Taxi terminal at Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier).  Playa del Carmen, Quintana RooTake the ADO autobus from the Playa del Carmen station to the Chetumal station. This trip is approximately 4.5 hours on an air-conditioned, coach bus from Playa del Carmen to Chetumal.  From the Chetumal bus station, take a $2.00 US taxi to the San Pedro Belize Express Water Taxi terminal at Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier). Mahahual, Quintana RooTake the ADO autobus from the Mahahual station to the Chetumal station. This trip is approximately 2.5 hours on an air-conditioned, coach bus from Mahahual to Chetumal.  From the Chetumal bus station, take a $2.00 US taxi to the San Pedro Belize Express Water Taxi terminal at Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier). Mexico City, MexicoTake a flight on Interjet from Mexico City, Mexico.  From Chetumal Airport, take a cab to the San Pedro Belize Express Water Taxi terminal at Muelle Fiscal (Municipal Pier).  From GuatemalaFloresThe most popular city of entry to Belize from Guatemala is Flores, where tourists from all over the world travel to see Tikal Maya Ruin. From Flores, take a bus with Linea Dorada http://www.lineadorada.info. Once in Belize City, head over to the Tourism Village and inside Brown Sugars Terminal and get your connecting boat to Ambergris Caye. Departure times are 9:00 am, 12:00 pm, 3:00 pm, 5:30 pm. Guatemala CityTake a bus from Guatemala Citys Fuente del Norte bus station in Santa Elena, a five minute auto-rickshaw ride across the causeway from Flores island. From Guatemala City (travel time: 8 to 10 hours), you have the following options to Belize:Altobuses del Norte (ADN) http://www.adnautobusesdelnorte.com.Linea Dorada http://www.lineadorada.info, first class buses leaving Guatemala City at 9:00pm for US$30,first class buses at 10:00am and 12:00pm for US$22 and an economy bus leaving at 10:00pm for US$16.  Fuente del Norte http://www.grupofuentedelnorte.com has 15+ departures from Guatemala City per day. Most of these are local runs with second-class buses (older pullman coaches without air conditioning), but they also operate a few first-class express buses (with toilets and air conditioning) leaving from Guatemala City at 10:00am, 2:00pm, and 10:30pm, and a deluxe bus leaving from Guatemala City at 9:00pm. Once in Belize City, head over to the Tourism Village and inside Brown Sugars Terminal and get your connecting boat to Ambergris Caye. Departure times are 9:00 am, 12:00 pm, 3:00 pm, 5:30 pm.AttractionsBelize District*Ha*Blue Hole*La Isla Bonita Ambergris Caye*Barrier Reef*Chan Marine Reserve*of Belize*Fort Street Tourism Village*The Institute for the Performing Arts*Belize Museum and Cucumber Beach*Belize Zoo (Called, The Best little zoo in the world)*Caulker*Belikin Beer Brewery*Pedro Town*Swing Bridge*Bakabush Adventure Tours*Crocland Eco-park*Numerous Cayes (islands)*Point*Bacab Eco Park*Old Belize http://oldbelize.comStann Creek District*Basin Wildlife Sanctuary and Jaguar Reserve*Placencia*Hopkins*Victoria Peak*Caye*Dangriga*Numerous CayesOrange Walk District*Lamanai*Estevan (Maya site)*Bravo Conservation and Management AreaCayo District*Actun Tunichil Muknal*Caracol*Xunantunich*Pech*Pilar*Hole (park)*Guanacaste National Park*National Park*Pine Ridge Forest Reserve*Creek Cave and Actun Tunichil Muknal (cave)* Falls*Creek*Big Rock Falls*Botanic Gardens*Victoria Peak, Belizes 2nd highest point at 1,120 m (3,675 ft)*Doyles Delight, Belizes highest point at 1,124 m (3,688 ft)*Dam*Maya MountainsToledo District*Lubaantun*Li Punit*Creek National Park*Honduras Marine Reserve*San Antonio, Santa Cruz and Rio Blanco Falls*Maya Mountains*Blue Creek*Sapodilla Cayes*Southwater CayeCorozal District*Chico National Park*Cerros*The Corozal Free Zone*Belize*SartenejaEducationThere are a number of kindergartens and secondary and tertiary schools in Belize. They provide quality education for students which is mostly funded by the government. Belize possess about 5 tertiary level institutions offering associates, bachelors, and undergraduate degrees. The biggest university is the of Belize. The university has 6 campuses throughout the country and it offers accounting, management, education, science, agriculture and other degrees.TransportThere are about 6 to 10 bus companies in Belize. These bus companies service routes from mainly the city, which is the heart of all transportation, to neighbouring villages like Ladyville and Sandhill to all other districts which are Corozal, Cayo Orange Walk, Toledo and Stann Creek. The bus prices to neighbouring villages from the city range from $1.00 BZE Dollars to $2.50 BZE Dollars. From Belize City to out districts prices range from $4.00  $9.00 BZE Dollars.Water TaxiSan Pedro Belize Express http://sanpedrobelizeexpresswatertaxi.com has over 25 daily departures, 14 first class boats, 4 unique destinations, and first class service to get you to, from and around Belize. Travel to Caye Caulker, Belize City and San Pedro has never been easier. For those wanting a truly Belizean experience, take the water taxis from destination to destination.  San Pedro Belize Express http://sanpedrobelizeexpresswatertaxi.com departs from the Brown Sugar Terminal in Belize City with scheduled runs at 9:00 a.m., 12:00 noon, 3:00 p.m. 5:30 p.m. to San Pedro and Caye Caulker.Departure from San Pedro Town pier on Black Coral Street next to Wahoos Bar and Grill and leaves at 7:00 a.m., 11:30 a.m., 2:30 p.m., 4:30 p.m.There are boats departing from Caye Caulker to both Belize City and San Pedro Town and they leave from the pier in front of the Basket Ball Court. Caye Caulker to Belize City: 7:00 am, 12:00 pm, 3:00 pm, 5:00 pm and Caye Caulker to San Pedro: 7:00 am (Connection to Chetumal), 9:45 am, 12:45 am, 3:45 pmRates: Belize City to San Pedro, San Pedro to Belize City: $30 Belize or $15 US (one way), $55 Belize or $27.50 US (round trip) Caye Caulker to San Pedro, Belize City to Caye Caulker: $20 Belize or $10 US (one way), $35 Belize or $17.50 US(round trip)PoliticsBelize is a parliamentary democracy, a realm, and therefore a member of the of Nations.The structure of government is based on the British parliamentary system, and the legal system is modelled on the Law of England. The current head of state is Elizabeth II, Queen of Belize. Since the Queen primarily resides in the United Kingdom, she is represented in Belize by the Governor-General. However, the cabinet, led by the Minister of Belize, who is of government, acting as advisors to the Governor-General, in practice exercise executive authority. Cabinet ministers are members of the majority political party in parliament and usually hold elected seats within it concurrent with their cabinet positions.The bicameral Assembly of Belize is composed of a House of Representatives and a Senate. The 31 members of the House are popularly elected to a maximum five-year term and introduce legislation affecting the development of Belize. The Governor-General appoints the 12 members of the Senate, with a Senate president selected by the members. The Senate is responsible for debating and approving bills passed by the House.Belize is a full participating member of the Caribbean Community (CARICOM), the Central American Integration System (SICA), The United Nations, and the Organization of American States. It is still in the process of acceding to Caricom and SICA treaties, including trade and single market treaties.Districts and constituenciesBelize is divided into 6 districts:#District#District#District#Walk District#Creek District#DistrictThese districts are further divided into 31 constituencies.Armed ForcesThe Belize Defence Force (BDF) is the Military of Belize, and is responsible for protecting the sovereignty of Belize. The BDF, along with the Belize National Coast Guard, and the Immigration Department, is a department of the Ministry of Defence and Immigration, which is headed by Perdomo; the BDF itself is commanded by Brigadier General Tapia. In 1997, the regular army numbered over 900, the reserve army 381, the air wing 45 and the maritime wing 36, amounting to an overall strength of approximately 1400.( In 2005, the maritime wing became part of the Belizean Coast Guard.(Channel 5 Belize, Belizean Coast Guard hits the high seas 28 November 2005.) In the same year, the government spent $1.2 million on the military, constituting 1.87% of the countrys gross domestic product (GDP).(Belize, CIA World Factbook, https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/bh.html)After Belize achieved independence in 1981 the United Kingdom maintained a deterrent force in the country to protect it from invasion by Guatemala (see claim to Belizean territory). The main British force left in 1994, three years after Guatemala recognised Belizean independence, but the United Kingdom maintains a training presence via the British Army Training and Support Unit Belize (BATSUB) and Flight Army Air Corps.(Dion E. Phillips , The Military of Belize http://www.cavehill.uwi.edu/bnccde/belize/conference/papers/phillips.html, 2002)DemographicsFile:KekChi Maya Children.jpg|upright|thumb| Two Kekchi Maya children. The Maya predominate in the District of Belize.File:BZEBOYS o.jpg|thumb|Boys of various ethnicities on a boat in CreekColonisation, slavery, and immigration have played major roles in affecting the ethnic composition of the population and as a result, Belize is a country with numerous cultures, languages, and groups.(Volz, Joe and Coy, Cissie, Belize: Central American Jewel, on aarp.org)(Smith, Vicki (2007), Belize beckons with unspoiled Caribbean isles, friendly faces, rich marine life, The San Diego Union-Tribune, 18 February 2007, at SignOnSanDiego.com)(Link, Matthew R. (2002), Central Americas perfect, penny-pinching blend of island beaches, virgin rain forest, and Maya mysteries,, Budget Travel, January/February 2002 issue at budgettravelonline.com) The countrys population is currently estimated to be a little over 333,000.() Mestizos comprise about 34% of the population, Kriols 25%, Spanish 15%, Maya 11%, and Garinagu 6%.(Population and HousingAccording to the 2010 Housing and Population Census, the total population of Belize is 312,971. The total number of households in Belize was 79,598 and the average household size was 3.9. The homeless population was amounted to 118 total of which 113 were males and 5 were females. The institutional population were discovered to be 1,957; 1,665 being male and 292 being females.The total population in urban Belize was 139,069; 68,020 males and 71,049 females. 39,104 total households in 2010 and a 3.6 average household size. The total population in rural Belize was 171,827; 88,261 males and 83,566 females. 40,494 total households in 2010 and a 4.2 average household size.Maya and early settlersThe Maya are thought to have been in Belize and the Yucatn region since the second millennium BC; however, much of Belizes original Maya population was wiped out by disease and conflicts between tribes and with Europeans. Three Maya groups now inhabit the country: The Yucatec (who came from Yucatn, Mexico to escape the Caste War of the 1840s), the Mopan (indigenous to Belize but were forced out by the British; they returned from Guatemala to evade slavery in the 19th century), and Kekchi (also fled from slavery in Guatemala in the 19th century).(Cho, Julian (1998). Maya Homeland. University of California Berkeley Geography Department and the Toledo Maya of Southern Belize. Retrieved 4 January 2007.) The later groups are chiefly found in the Toledo District.White, initially Spanish conquistadors explored and declared the land a colony but chose not to settle due to the lack of resources such as gold and the strong defence of the Yucatn by the Maya. Later English and Scottish settlers and pirates known as the Baymen entered the area in the 16th and 17th century respectively and established a logwood trade colony in what would become the Belize District.(KriolsKriols make up roughly 25% of the Belizean population and about 75% percent of the Diaspora.((Johnson,Melissa A.)The Making of Race and Place in Nineteenth-Century British Honduras. Environmental History, Vol. 8, No. 4 (Oct. 2003), pp. 598617, http://www.jstor.org/stable/3985885) They are descendants of the Baymen slave owners, and slaves brought to Belize for the purpose of the logging industry.() These slaves were mostly Black (many also of Miskito ancestry) from Nicaragua and born Africans who had spent very brief periods in Jamaica.((Johnson,Melissa A.) The Making of Race and Place in Nineteenth-Century British Honduras. Environmental History, Vol. 8, No. 4 (Oct. 2003), pp. 598617, ) Bay Islanders and more Jamaicans came in the late-19th century, further adding these all ready varied peoples, creating this ethnic group.For all intents and purposes, Kriol is an ethnic and linguistic denomination, but some natives, even those blonde and blue-eyed, may call themselves Kriol, defining it as more a cultural attribute and not limited to physical appearance.( Kriol was historically only spoken by them, but this ethnicity has become synonymous with the Belizean national identity, and as a result it is now spoken by about 75% of Belizeans.()( Kriols are found all over Belize, but predominantly in urban areas such as Belize City, coastal towns and villages, and in the Belize River Valley.GarinaguThe Garinagu (singular Garifuna) are a mix of African, Arawak, and Carib ancestry.( More precisely, the average Garifuna is 76% Sub Saharan African, 20% Arawak/Carib and 4% European.(Crawford, M.H. 1997 Biocultural adaptation to disease in the Caribbean: Case study of a migrant population. Journal of Caribbean Studies. Health and Disease in the Caribbean. 12(1): 141155. on http://www2.ku.edu/~lba/MHCbcar.htm)Throughout history they have been incorrectly labeled as Black Caribs. When the British took over Saint Vincent after the Treaty of Paris in 1763, they were opposed by French settlers and their Carib allies. The Caribs eventually surrendered to the British in 1796. The British separated the more African-looking Caribs from the more indigenous looking ones. 5,000 Garinagu were exiled, but only about 2,500 of them survived the voyage to Roatn, an island off the coast of Honduras.Because Roatn was too small and infertile to support their population, the Garinagu petitioned the Spanish authorities of Honduras to be allowed to settle on the mainland coast. The Spanish employed them as soldiers, and they spread along the Caribbean coast of Central America. The Garinagu settled in Seine Bight, Punta Gorda and Punta Negra, Belize by way of Honduras as early as 1802. However, in Belize 19 November 1832 is the date officially recognized as Garifuna Settlement Day in Dangriga.(Mestizos and SpanishAround the 1840s, Mestizo, Spanish, and Yucatec settlers from Mexico began to settle in the north due to the War of Yucatn.()() Currently, the Mestizos are the largest ethnic group in Belize, making up 34% of the population in 2000, and Spanish make up 15%. They predominate in the Corozal, Orange Walk, and much of the Cayo district, as well as San Pedro town in Ambergris Caye.(The Mestizo culture was originated from a mixture of Spanish and Maya. The Mestizo towns of Belize have much more in common with neighbouring Yucatn and most of Guatemala and Central America than central, southern or coastal Belize. Towns centre on a main square, and social life focuses on the Catholic Church built on one side of it. Most Mestizos and Spanish speak Spanish, English and Kriol fluently.(Other groupsChildren.JPG|thumb|Mennonite children selling peanuts near Lamanai in Belize. Roughly 10,000 German-speaking Mennonites live in Belize, farming the land and living according to their religious beliefs.The remaining 9% is a mix of Mennonite farmers, Indians, Chinese, whites from the United States and Canada, and many other foreign groups brought to assist the countrys development. During the 1860s, a large influx of East Indians who spent brief periods in Jamaica and American Civil War veterans from Louisiana and other Southern states established settlements in British Honduras and introduced commercial sugar cane production to the colony, establishing 11 settlements in the interior. The 20th century saw the arrival of Asian settlers from mainland China, South Korea, India, Syria, and Lebanon. American immigrants and expatriate Americans and Africans also began to settle in the country.(Emigration, immigration, and demographic shiftsKriols and other ethnic groups are emigrating mostly to the United States, but also to the United Kingdom and other developed nations for better opportunities. Based on the latest Census, the number of Belizeans in the United States is approximately 160,000 (including 70,000 legal residents and naturalised citizens), consisting mainly of Kriols and Garinagu.(Diaspora of Belize Council on Diplomacy, Washington, D.C. and Consulate General of Belize.)Due to conflicts in neighbouring Central American nations, Mestizo refugees from El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras have fled to Belize in significant numbers during the 1980s, and have been significantly adding to this group.() These two events have been changing the demographics of the nation for the last 30 years.(According to estimates by the CIA in 2009, Belizes fertility rate currently stands at approximately 3.6 children per woman. Its birth rate is 27.33 births/1,000 population, and the death rate is 5.8 deaths/1,000 population.(LanguageEnglish is the official language of Belize, a former British colony. Although only 4 percent of the population speaks it as their first language, a majority speak English very well. Kriol is spoken as the first language of 33 percent of Belizeans. It is considered by some linguists to be a dialect of English, as the two are mutually intelligible. About 75 to 80 percent of the population speak some Kriol and English.Spanish is the first language of 46 percent, and is spoken very well by a majority of Belizeans.languages and Garifuna are the first languages of about 12 percent of the population. The Germanic Plautdietsch dialect, Chinese, Hindustani and other languages are mother tongues of about 5 percent of the population.English is the primary language of public education, with Spanish taught in primary and secondary school as well. Bilingualism is very common. Literacy currently stands at nearly 80%.ReligionReligious freedom is guaranteed in Belize. Nearly 80% of the inhabitants are Christian, with 49.6% of Belizeans being Roman Catholics and 29% Protestants.(http://www.state.gov/g/drl/rls/irf/2008/108514.htm, International Religious Freedom Report 2008) Foreign Catholics frequently visit the country for special gospel revivals. The Orthodox Church has a presence in Santa Elena.() Witnesses have experienced a significant increase in membership in recent years. According to the Witnesses, around 3% of the population attended at least one religious meeting in 2007.(2007 Report of Jehovahs Witnesses Worldwide, Watch Tower Bible and Tract Society of Pennsylvania) Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints claims 3,300 members in the country(Belize. LDS Newsroom. Retrieved 13 December 2008.)Other non-Christian minorities include: Hinduism, followed by most Indian immigrants, and Islam, common among Middle Eastern immigrants and has gained a following among some Kriols.CultureCuisineBelizean cuisine is inspired by British, Mexican and Western Caribbean cooking. The basic ingredients are rice and beans, which are often eaten with chicken, pork, veal, fish or vegetables. Coconut milk and fried plantains are added to the dishes to create a truly tropical taste. Exotic ingredients include armadillo meat, venison and fried paca (called Gibnut in Kriol). Conch soup is a traditional dish which has a characteristic taste and thick consistency due to added okra, potatoes, yams, cassava flour and a touch of toasted habanero. Immigration has brought Garifuna dishes based on fish and plantains, and among the best known are Hudut, Darasa, Ereba, Bundiga, and so on. Belizean food is almost always accompanied by white rice in coconut milk.SportsThe major sports in Belize are football, basketball, volleyball and cycling, with smaller followings of racing, & field, softball and cricket. Fishing is also popular in areas of Belize. The Country Cycling Classic, also known as the cross country race or the Holy Saturday Cross Country Cycling Classic, is considered to be one of the most important Belize sports events. This one-day sports event is meant for amateur cyclists but has also gained a worldwide popularity.This cycling event in Belize has seven rider categories based on rider rating, age, and gender. Action-packed and thrilling, this most interesting sporting event allows for the participation of tourists and visitors alike from all over the world. The cycling routes offer enchanting and mesmerizing views across the resplendent greenery of the forest areas and the meandering rivers. This makes the event even more popular among the tourists.The history of Cross Country Cycling Classic in Belize dates back to the period when Metzgen picked up the idea from a small village on the Northern highway. The people from this village used to cover long distances on their bicycles to attend the weekly game of cricket. He improvised on this observation and added thrill by sowing the idea of a sporting event in the difficult terrain of western highways, which were then poorly built.On Easter day, citizens of Dangriga participate in a yearly fishing tournament. First, second, and third prize are awarded based on a scoring combination of size, species, and number. The tournament is broadcast over local radio stations, and prize money is awarded to the winners.Belizes National Basketball Team is the only National Team that has achieved major victories internationally. During the 1998 Caricom Mens Basketball Championship, held at the Civic Center in Belize City. Belize went on to win the championship and proceeded to participate in the 1999 Centrobasquet Tournament in Havana. The National Team finished seventh of eight teams after winning only 1 game despite playing close all the way. In a return engagement at the 2000 CARICOM championship in Barbados, Belize placed fourth. Shortly thereafter, Belize moved to the Central American region and won the Central American Games championship in 2001. The team has failed to duplicate this success, most recently finishing with a 2 and 4 record in the 2006 COCABA championship. The team finished second in the 2009 COCABA tournament in Cancun, Mexico where it went 30 in group play. Belize won its opening match in the Centrobasquet Tournament, 2010, defeating Trinidad and Tobago, but lost badly to Mexico in a rematch of the COCABA final. A tough win over Cuba set Belize in position to advance, but they fell to Puerto Rico in their final match and failed to qualify.FolkloreIn their folklore, we find the legends of Bobi Suzi, La Llorona, Cadejo, Sucia, Ellis, Duende, Chatona, Xtabai, and Anansi.HolidaysThe following holidays are observed in Belize.(National Holidays of Belize Council on Diplomacy, Washington, D.C. and Consulate General of Belize. Retrieved 5 February 2008.)National SymbolsBlack Orchidblack orchidThe National Flower of Belize is the Black Orchid (cochleata), also known as Encyclia cochleata).(National Symbols of Belize Council on Diplomacy, Washington, D.C. and Consulate General of Belize. Retrieved 5 February 2008.)Mahogany TreeThe National Tree of Belize is the Mahogany Tree (macrophylla), one of the magnificent giants of the Belize rain forest. Rising straight and tall to over a hundred feet from great buttresses at the roots, it emerges above the canopy of the surrounding trees with a crown of large, shining green leaves. In the early months of the year, when the leaves fall and new red-brown growth appears, the tree can be spotted from a great distance. The tree puts out a great flush of small whitish flowers  the blossom for dark fruits, which are pear-shaped capsules about six inches long. When the fruits mature they split into five valves, freeing large winged seeds which are carried away by the wind. They fall on the shaded protection of the forest floor and germinate to begin a new life cycle. The mahogany tree matures in 60 to 80 years.British settlers exploited the Belizean forest for mahogany, beginning around the middle of the 17th century. It was originally exported to the United Kingdom in the form of squared logs, but shipments now consist mainly of sawn lumber.The motto Sub Umbra Florero means: Under the shade (of the mahogany tree) I flourish.(National Symbols of Belize Council on Diplomacy, Washington, D.C. and Consulate General of Belize.)Keel Billed Toucansulfuratus -Belize Zoo-6a-2c.jpg|thumb|upright|The Keel Billed ToucanThe Keel Billed Toucan (sulfuratus) is the National Bird of Belize. It is noted for its great, canoe-shaped bill and its brightly coloured green, blue, red and orange feathers. Toucans are found in open areas of the country with large trees. It is mostly black with bright yellow cheeks and chest, red under the tail and a distinctive white patch at the base of the tail.They make a monotonous frog-like croak. Toucans like fruits, and eat by cutting with the serrated edge of their bills. Toucans nest in holes in trees, using natural holes or holes made by woodpeckers, often enlarging the cavity by removing soft, rotten wood. They lay two to four eggs which are incubated by both parents. The nesting stage lasts from six to seven weeks.TapirBelizes National Animal is the Tapir, the largest land mammal of the American tropics. It is also known as the mountain cow, although it is actually related to the horse and the rhinoceros. It is protected under Belizean law.National heroesThe three people who have received Belizes highest honours, Order of National Hero and Order of Belize, are:*Goldson*Metzgen*Cadle PriceSee also*Forgotten District  A Documentary on Maya ecotourism in southern Belize*of Belizeans*of international rankingsReferencesFurther reading* Belize In Focus: A Guide to the People, Politics and Culture Ian Peedle* Belize: A Concise History P. A. B. Thomson* Belize: Land of the Free By The Carib Sea Thor Janson* Belize: Reefs, Rain Forests, and Mayan Ruins Dick Lutz* Confederate Settlements in British Honduras Donald C.Simmons, Jr.* Education and Multi-cultural Cohesion in Belize, 19311981 Peter Ronald Hitchen Unpublished PhD Thesis. University of Central Lancashire, England. April 2002.* Escaping the Rat Race  Freedom in Paradise: Real-life Stories About Living, Working, Investing, and Retiring in Belize by Dr. Helga Peham, 2007.* Fodors Guide: Belize and Guatemala* Forest Cover and Deforestation in Belize: 19802010 CATHALAC / NASA / Belize Ministry of Natural Resources and the Environment / SERVIR. August 2010.* Formerly British Honduras: A Profile of a New Nation of Belize William David Stetzekorn* Insight Guide: Belize Huw Hennessy* Lonely Planet World Guide: Belize Carolyn Miller Caelstrom and Debra Miller* The Making of Belize Anne Sutherland* Metzgen: Notes on British Honduras.* Monrad Metzgen, Henry Edney and Conrad Cain Handbook of British Honduras:* Monrad Metzgen: Shoulder to Shoulder or the Battle of St Georges Caye, 1798.* Moon Handbooks: Belize Chicki Mallan and Joshua Berman* Our Man in Belize: A Memoir Richard Timothy Conroy* The Belize Debt-for-Nature Swap: Foundations of a Framework for Program Evaluation Emil A. Cherrington. Unpublished Master of Science thesis, College of Forest Resources, University of Washington, Seattle, Washington. June 2004. 96 pp.* The Guatemalan Claim to Belize: A Handbook on the Negotiations James S. Murphy* The Rough Guide: Belize Peter Eltringham* Time Among the Maya: Travels in Belize, Guatemala and Mexico Ronald Wright* Thirteen Chapters of A History of Belize Assad Shoman* Travellers Wildlife Guide: Belize and Northern Guatemala Les BeletskyExternal links*Government of Belize  Official governmental site*Chief of State and Cabinet Members*Belize National Emergency Management Organization  Official governmental site*Belize Wildlife Conservation Network  Belize Wildlife Conservation Network*CATHALAC  Water Center for the Humid Tropics of Latin America and the Caribbean*SERVIR  Regional Visualization & Monitoring System for Mesoamerica*Belize information on globalEDGE*LANIC Belize page**Belize at UCB Libraries GovPubs***Lat. and Long.  (Belmopan)list }}ace:Belizeaf:Belizeals:Belizear:an:Belizeroa-rup:Belizefrp:Belizeast:Belizeay:Wilisiaz:Belizbm:Belizebn:zh-min-nan:Belizebe:be-x-old:bcl:Belisabo:bs:Belizbr:Belizebg:ca:Belizecv:ceb:Belizecs:Belizecy:Belizeda:Belizede:Belizedv:dsb:Belizedz:et:Belizeel:es:Beliceeo:Belizoext:Belicieu:Belizeee:Belizefa:hif:Belizefo:Belisfr:Belizefy:BelizeBheilsVeleeshgag:Belizgd:Beilise- Belizeko:hy:hi:hr:Belizeio:Belizeilo:Belizbpy:id:Belizeia:Belizeie:Belizeos:is:Belsit:Belizehe:jv:Belizekn:pam:Belizeka:ks:kk:kw:Belisarw:Belizesw:Belizeht:Belizku:Belzemrj:la:Belizalv:Belizalb:Belizelt:Belizaslij:Belizeli:Belizeln:Belizejbo:belizlmo:Belizehu:Belizemk:ml:mr:arz:ms:Belizemn:my:nah:Belicena:Berij(land)ja:frr:Belizepih:Belesno:Belizenn:Belizenov:Belizoc:Belizemhr:uz:Belizpnb:pap:Belizeps:pms:Belizends:Belizepl:Belizept:Belizecrh:Belizro:Belizerm:Belizequ:Bilisirue:ru:sah:se:Belizesa:sco:Belizesq:Belizascn:Belizisimple:Belizess:IBhelizisk:Belizesl:Belizeso:Beliseckb:sr:sh:Belizefi:Belizesv:Belizetl:Belista:tt:te:th:tg:tr:Belizeuk:ur:ug:vec:Belizevi:Belizevo:Belisnfiu-vro:Belizewar:Belizewo:Beliisyi:yo:Blszh-yue:diq:Belizzea:Belizebat-smg:Belzoszh:
3462
Bolivia
calling_code  +591Bolivia , officially known as Plurinational State of Bolivia()() (Quechua: Bulivya Mamallaqta, ,  Aymara: Wuliwya Suyu), is a country in central America. It is the poorest country in South America. It is bordered by Brazil to the north and east, Paraguay and Argentina to the south, Chile by the south west, and Peru by the west.Prior to European colonization, the Andean region of Bolivia was a part of the Empire the largest state in America. The Empire conquered the region in the 16th century. During most of the Spanish colonial period, this territory was called Peru and was under the administration of the of Peru, which included most of Spains South American colonies. After declaring independence in 1809, 16 years of war followed before the establishment of the Republic, named for Bolvar, on 6 August 1825. Bolivia has struggled through periods of political instability, dictatorships and economic woes.Bolivia is a Democratic Republic that is divided into nine departments. Its geography is varied from the peaks of the Andes in the West, to the Eastern Lowlands, situated within the Amazon Basin. It is a country, with a Medium Development Index score, and a poverty level around 60%. Its main economic activities include agriculture, forestry, fishing, mining, and manufacturing goods such as textiles, clothing, refined metals, and refined petroleum. Bolivia is very wealthy in minerals, especially tin.The Bolivian population, estimated at 10 million, is multiethnic, including Amerindians, Mestizos, Europeans, and Africans. The main language spoken is Spanish, although the Aymara and languages are also common and all three, as well as 34 other indigenous languages, are official. The large number of different cultures within Bolivia has contributed greatly to a wide diversity in fields such as art, cuisine, literature, and music.EtymologyBolivia was named for Bolvar, a leader in the American wars of independence.(Simn Bolvar Salem Press)  Jos de Sucre had been given the option by Bolvar to either keep Peru (present-day Bolivia) under the newly formed of Peru, to unite with the Provinces of Rio de la Plata, or to formally declare its independence from the of Peru that had dominated most of the region. Sucre opted to create a new nation and, with local support, named it in honor of Simn Bolvar.(6 de Agosto: Independencia de Bolivia)However, the original name given to the newly formed country was Republic of Bolvar. The name would not change to Bolivia until some days later when congressman Manuel Martn Cruz proposed: If from Romulus comes Rome, then from Bolvar comes Bolivia (). The name stuck and was approved by the Republic on 3 October 1825.(http://blogs.law.harvard.edu/philg/2009/01/11/what-countries-are-named-after-individuals-or-families/ What countries are named after individuals or families?)In 2009, a new constitution changed the countrys name from the Republic of Bolivia to the Plurinational State of Bolivia in recognition of the multi-ethnic nature of the country and the enhanced position of Bolivias indigenous peoples under the new constitution.(Morales highly favoured for re-election in Bolivia Truth Out/Associated Press 6 December 2009)(Can Bolivias indigenous groups dance in harmony? BBC 10 June 2010)(Bolivia poll wont end opposition BBC 24 January 2009)HistoryThe region that is now known as Bolivia has been continuously occupied for over 2,000 years, when the Aymara arrived in the region. Present-day Aymara associate themselves with an advanced civilization situated at Tiwanaku, in Western Bolivia. The capital city of Tiwanaku dates from as early as 1500 BC when it was a small agriculturally based village.(Fagan, Brian M. The Seventy Great Mysteries of the Ancient World: Unlocking the Secrets of Past Civilizations. New York: Thames & Hudson, 2001.)The community grew to urban proportions between AD 600 and AD 800, becoming an important regional power in the southern Andes. According to early estimates, at its maximum extent, the city covered approximately 6.5 square kilometers, and had between 15,000  30,000 inhabitants.(Kolata, Alan L. The Tiwankau: Portrait of an Andean Civilization. Blackwell Publishers, Cambridge, 1993. p. 145) However, satellite imaging was used recently to map the extent of fossilized suka kollus across the three primary valleys of Tiwanaku, arriving at population-carrying capacity estimates of anywhere between 285,000 and 1,482,000 people.(Kolata, Alan L. Valley of the Spirits: A Journey into the Lost Realm of the Aymara. John Wiley and Sons, Hoboken, 1996.)Around AD 400, Tiwanaku went from being a locally dominant force to a predatory state. Tiwanaku expanded its reaches into the Yungas and brought its culture and way of life to many other cultures in Peru, Bolivia, and Chile. However, Tiwanaku was not a violent culture in many respects. In order to expand its reach, Tiwanaku exercised great political astuteness, creating colonies, fostering trade agreements (which made the other cultures rather dependent), and instituting state cults.(McAndrews, Timothy L. et al. Regional Settlement Patterns in the Tiwanaku Valley of Bolivia. Journal of Field Archaeology 24 (1997): 6783.)The empire continued to grow with no end in sight. William H. Isbell states that Tiahuanaco underwent a dramatic transformation between AD 600 and 700 that established new monumental standards for civic architecture and greatly increased the resident population.(Isbell, William H. Wari and Tiwanaku: International Identities in the Central Andean Middle Horizon. 731751.) Tiwanaku continued to absorb cultures rather than eradicate them. Archaeologists note a dramatic adoption of Tiwanaku ceramics into the cultures which became part of the Tiwanaku empire. Tiwanakus power was further solidified through the trade it implemented among the cities within its empire.(Tiwanakus elites gained their status through the surplus food they controlled, collected from outlying regions and then redistributed to the general populace. Further, this elites control of llama herds became a powerful control mechanism as llamas were essential for carrying goods between the civic centre and the periphery. These herds also came to symbolize class distinctions between the commoners and the elites. Through this control and manipulation of surplus resources, the elites power continued to grow until about AD 950. At this time a dramatic shift in climate occurred.(Kolata, Alan L. The Tiwankau: Portrait of an Andean Civilization. Blackwell Publishers, Cambridge, 1993.)There occurred a significant drop in precipitation in the Titicaca Basin. Some archaeologists venture to label this a major drought. As the rainfall decreased, many of the cities further away from Lake Titicaca began to tender less foodstuffs to the elites. As the surplus of food decreased, and thus the amount available to underpin their power, the control of the elites began to falter. The capital city became the last place viable place for food production due to the resiliency of the raised field method of agriculture. But, in the end, even this more productive design for food production was no match for the vagaries of the weather. Tiwanaku disappeared around AD 1000 because food production, the main source of the power elites control, dried up. The area remained uninhabited for centuries thereafter.(Between 1438 and 1527, the Inca empire, during its last great expansion, gained control over much of what is now western Bolivia. The Incas would not maintain control of the region for long however, as the rapidly expanding Inca Empire was internally weak. As such, the impending Spanish conquest would be remarkably easy.Colonial periodThe Spanish conquest of the Inca empire began in 1524 and was mostly completed by 1533. The territory now called Bolivia was then known as Upper Peru and was under the authority of the Viceroy of Lima. Local government came from the Audiencia de Charcas located in Chuquisaca (La Platamodern Sucre). Founded in 1545 as a mining town, Potos soon produced fabulous wealth, becoming the largest city in the New World with a population exceeding 150,000 people.(The High Place: Potosi. John Demos.)By the late 16th century Bolivian silver was an important source of revenue for the Empire.(MSN Encarta, Conquest in the Americas. Archived 31 October 2009.) A steady stream of natives served as labor force (the Spanish employed the pre-Columbian draft system called the mita).() Upper Peru was bounded to of the Ro de la Plata in 1776. Katari led the indigenous rebellion that laid siege to Paz in March 1781, during which 20,000 people died.(Rebellions. History Department, Duke University.) As Spanish royal authority weakened during the Napoleonic wars, sentiment against colonial rule grew.Independence and subsequent warsThe struggle for independence started in the city of Sucre in 1809, with the Revolution (Chuquisaca was then the name of the city). That revolution, which created a local government Junta, was followed by the Paz revolution, during which Bolivia actually declared independence. Both revolutions were short-lived, and defeated by the Spanish authorities, but the following year the American wars of independence raged across the continent. Bolivia was captured and recaptured many times during the war by the royalists and patriots. Buenos Aires sent three military campaigns, all of which were defeated, and eventually limited itself to protecting the national borders at Salta. Bolivia was finally freed of Royalist dominion by Jos de Sucre, with a military campaign coming from the North in support of the campaign of Bolvar. After 16 years of war the Republic was proclaimed on 6 August 1825 and named Bolivia in honor of Bolvar.In 1836, Bolivia, under the rule of Marshal de Santa Cruz, invaded Peru to reinstall the deposed president, General Jos de Orbegoso. Peru and Bolivia formed the Confederation, with de Santa Cruz as the Supreme Protector. Following tension between the Confederation and Chile, Chile declared war on 28 December 1836. Argentina, Chiles ally, declared war on the Confederation on 9 May 1837. The Peruvian-Bolivian forces achieved several major victories during the of the Confederation: the defeat of the Argentinian expedition and the defeat of the first Chilean expedition on the fields of Paucarpata near the city of Arequipa.On the same field, the Chilean and Peruvian rebel army surrendered unconditionally and signed the Treaty. The treaty stipulated that Chile would withdraw from Peru-Bolivia, Chile would return captured Confederate ships, economic relations would be normalized, and the Confederation would pay Peruvian debt to Chile. In Chile, public outrage over the treaty forced the government to reject it. Chile organized a second attack on the Confederation and defeated it in the of Yungay. After this defeat, Santa Cruz resigned and went to exile in Ecuador and then Paris, and the Peruvian-Bolivian Confederation was dissolved.Following the independence of Peru, Peruvian president General Gamarra invaded Bolivia. The Peruvian army was decisively defeated at the of Ingavi on 20 November 1841 where Gamarra was killed. The Bolivian army under General Ballivin then mounted a counter-offensive, capturing the Peruvian port of Arica. Later, both sides signed a treaty in 1842, putting a final end to the war.Economic instability and continued warsA period of political and economic instability in the early to mid-19th century weakened Bolivia. Then in the of the Pacific (187983) against Chile, it lost its access to the sea and the adjoining rich salitre (saltpeter) fields, together with the port of Antofagasta.Since independence, Bolivia has lost over half of its territory to neighboring countries in wars. It also lost the state of Acre, in the Acre War; important because this region was known for its production of rubber. Peasants and the Bolivian army fought briefly but after a few victories, and facing the prospect of a total war against Brazil, it was forced to sign the of Petrpolis in 1903, in which Bolivia lost this rich territory. Popular myth has it that Bolivian president Mariano Melgarejo (186471) traded the land for what he called a magnificent white horse and Acre was subsequently flooded by Brazilians which ultimately led to confrontation and fear of war with Brazil.In the late 19th century, an increase in the world price of gold brought Bolivia relative prosperity and political stability. During the early 20th century, tin replaced gold as the countrys most important source of wealth. A succession of governments controlled by the economic and social elite followed laissez-faire capitalist policies through the first thirty years of the 20th century.(http://www.bolivien-liest.de/en/country_en.html Background note: Bolivia-Source-Bolivien-liest.de)Living conditions of the native people, who constitute most of the population, remained deplorable. With work opportunities limited to primitive conditions in the mines and in large estates having nearly feudal status, they had no access to education, economic opportunity, and political participation. Bolivias defeat by Paraguay in the War (193235), where Bolivia lost a great part of the Chaco region in dispute, marked a turning-point.()()( (PDF), University of WisconsinMadison, Department of Geography)Nationalist Revolutionary MovementFile:Llama en la laguna Colorada Potos Bolivia.jpg|thumb|A llama in the Llaguna Collorada, a shallow salt lake in the southwestern Bolivian sector of the Altiplano.The Nationalist Movement (MNR) emerged as a broadly based party. Denied its victory in the 1951 presidential elections, the MNR led a successful revolution in 1952. Under President Paz Estenssoro, the MNR, having strong popular pressure, introduced suffrage into his political platform and carried out a sweeping land-reform promoting rural education and nationalization of the countrys largest tin mines.12 years of tumultuous rule left the MNR divided. In 1964, a military junta overthrew President Estenssoro at the outset of his third term. The 1969 death of President Barrientos Ortuo, a former member of the junta who was elected president in 1966, led to a succession of weak governments. Alarmed by the rising Popular Assembly and the increase in the popularity of President Juan Jose Torres, the military, the MNR, and others installed Colonel (later General) Banzer Surez as president in 1971.Banzer ruled with MNR support from 1971 to 1974. Then, impatient with schisms in the coalition, he replaced civilians with members of the armed forces and suspended political activities. The economy grew impressively during most of Banzers presidency, but rights violations and eventual fiscal crises undercut his support. He was forced to call elections in 1978, and Bolivia again entered a period of political turmoil.CIA activities and leftist insurgencyThe CIA had been active in providing finances and training to the Bolivian military in 1960s. The revolutionary leader Guevara was killed by a team of CIA officers and members of the Bolivian Army on 9 October 1967, in Bolivia. The CIA reported that Guevara was captured on 8 October as a result of the clash with the Cuban-led guerrillas. He had a wound in his leg, but was otherwise in fair condition. At 1150 hours on 9 October the Second Ranger Battalion received direct orders from Bolivian Army Headquarters in La Paz to kill Guevara. These orders were carried out at 1315 hours the same day with a burst of fire from an M-2 automatic rifle. Felix Rodriguez was a CIA officer on the team with the Bolivian Army that captured and shot Guevara.() Rodriguez said that after he received a Bolivian presidential execution order, he told the soldier who pulled the trigger to aim carefully, to remain consistent with the Bolivian governments story that Che had been killed in action during a clash with the Bolivian army. Rodriguez said the US government had wanted Che in Panama, and I could have tried to falsify the command to the troops, and got Che to Panama as the US government said they had wanted, said Mr Rodriguez, but he chose to let history run its course as desired by Bolivia.()Military governments: Garca Meza and Siles ZuazoElections in 1979 and 1981 were inconclusive and marked by fraud. There were coups dtat, counter-coups, and caretaker governments. In 1980, General Garca Meza Tejada carried out a ruthless and violent coup dtat that did not have popular support. He pacified the people by promising to remain in power only for one year. (At the end of the year, he staged a televised rally to claim popular support and announced, Bueno, me quedo, or, All right; Ill stay office.() He was deposed shortly thereafter.) His government was notorious for human-rights-abuses, drug-trafficking, and economic mismanagement; during his presidency, the inflation that later crippled the Bolivian economy could already be felt. Later convicted in absentia for various crimes by attorney del Granado, including murder, Garca Meza was extradited from Brazil and began serving a 30-year prison sentence in 1995.After a military rebellion forced out Meza in 1981, three other military governments in 14 months struggled with Bolivias growing problems. Unrest forced the military to convoke the Congress elected in 1980 and allow it to choose a new chief executive. In October 1982, Siles Zuazo again became president, 22 years after the end of his first term of office (195660).Snchez de Lozada and Banzer: Liberalizing the economySnchez de Lozada pursued an aggressive economic and social reform agenda. The most dramatic reform was the capitalization program, under which investors, typically foreign, acquired 50% ownership and management control of public enterprises, such as the state petroleum corporation, telecommunications system, airlines, railroads, and electric utilities, in return for agreed upon capital investments.The reforms and economic restructuring were strongly opposed by certain segments of society, which instigated frequent and sometimes violent protests, particularly in La Paz and the Chapare coca-growing region, from 1994 through 1996. The de Lozada government pursued a policy of offering monetary compensation for voluntary eradication of illegal coca by its growers in the Chapare region. The policy produced little net reduction in coca, and in the mid-1990s Bolivia accounted for about one-third of the worlds coca that was being processed into cocaine. The coca leaf has long been part of the Bolivian culture, as indigenous workers have traditionally used the leaf for its properties as a mild stimulant and appetite suppressant.During this time, the umbrella labor-organization of Bolivia, the Central Obrera Boliviana (COB), became increasingly unable to effectively challenge government policy. A teachers strike in 1995 was defeated because the COB could not marshal the support of many of its members, including construction and factory workers. The state also used selective martial law to keep the disruptions caused by the teachers to a minimum. The teachers were led by Trotskyites, and were considered to be the most militant union in the COB. Their downfall was a major blow to the COB, which also became mired in internal corruption and infighting in 1996.In the 1997 elections, General Banzer, leader of the Democratic Action party (ADN) and former dictator (197178), won 22% of the vote, while the MNR candidate won 18%. General Banzer formed a coalition of the ADN, MIR, UCS, and CONDEPA parties, which held a majority of seats in the Bolivian Congress. The Congress elected him as president, and he was inaugurated on 6 August 1997. During the election campaign, Banzer had promised to suspend the privatization of the state-owned oil-company, YPFB. But this seemed unlikely to happen, considering Bolivias weak position globally. The Banzer government basically continued the free-market and privatization-policies of its predecessor.The relatively robust economic growth of the mid-1990s continued until about the third year of its term in office. After that, regional, global and domestic factors contributed to a decline in economic growth. Financial crises in Argentina and Brazil, lower world prices for export commodities, and reduced employment in the coca sector depressed the Bolivian economy. The public also perceived a significant amount of public sector corruption. These factors contributed to increasing social protests during the second half of Banzers term.(.)At the outset of his government, President Banzer launched a policy of using special police-units to physically eradicate the illegal coca of the Chapare region. The policy produced a sudden and dramatic four-year decline in Bolivias illegal coca crop, to the point that Bolivia became a relatively small supplier of coca for cocaine. Those left unemployed by coca eradication streamed into the cities, especially El Alto, the slum-neighborhood of La Paz. The MIR of Jaime Paz Zamora remained a coalition-partner throughout the Banzer government, supporting this policy (called the Dignity Plan).(http://chakana.nl/files/pub/AssiesSalman_2005_Ethnicity-and-Politics-in-Bolivia.pdf Ethnicity and Politics in Bolivia-Source-Ethnopolitics, Vol. 4, No. 3, 269297, September 2005)Between January 1999 and April 2000, large-scale protests erupted in Cochabamba, Bolivias third largest city, in response to the privatization of water resources by foreign companies and a subsequent doubling of water prices.On 6 August 2001, Banzer resigned from office after being diagnosed with cancer. He died less than a year later. Vice President Jorge Fernando Quiroga Ramrez completed the final year of his term.In the June 2002 national elections, former President Gonzalo Snchez de Lozada (MNR) placed first with 22.5% of the vote, followed by coca-advocate and native peasant-leader Morales (Movement Toward Socialism, MAS) with 20.9%. Morales edged out populist candidate Reyes Villa of the Republican Force (NFR) by just 700 votes nationwide, earning a spot in the congressional run-off against Snchez de Lozada on 4 August 2002.A July agreement between the MNR and the fourth-place MIR, which had again been led in the election by former President Jaime Paz Zamora, virtually ensured the election of Snchez de Lozada in the congressional run-off, and on 6 August he was sworn in for the second time. The MNR platform featured three overarching objectives: economic reactivation (and job creation), anti-corruption, and social inclusion.File:La paz Bolivia view 2008.jpg|thumb|Paz skyline. The city is the highest capital in the world.In 2003 the gas conflict broke out. On 12 October 2003 the government imposed martial law in El Alto after 16 people were shot by the police and several dozen wounded in violent clashes which erupted when a caravan of oil trucks escorted by police and soldiers deploying tanks and heavy-caliber machine guns tried to breach a barricade. On 17 October 2003 Evo Morales supporters from Cochabamba tried to march into Cruz de la Sierra, the largest city of the eastern lowlands where support was strong for the president. They were turned back. Faced with the option of resigning or more bloodshed, Sanchez de Lozada offered his resignation in a letter to an emergency session of Congress. After his resignation was accepted and his vice president, Mesa, invested, he left on a commercially scheduled flight for the United States.In March 2004, the new president Carlos Mesa announced that his government would hold a series of rallies around the country, and at its embassies abroad, demanding that Chile return to Bolivia a stretch of seacoast that the country lost in 1884 after the end of the War of the Pacific. Chile has traditionally refused to negotiate on the issue, but Mesa nonetheless made this policy a central point of his administration.However, the countrys internal situation became unfavorable for such political action on the international stage. After a resurgence of gas protests in 2005, Carlos Mesa attempted to resign in January 2005, but his offer was refused by Congress. On 22 March 2005, after weeks of new street protests from organizations accusing Mesa of bowing to U.S. corporate interests, Mesa again offered his resignation to Congress, which was accepted on 10 June. The chief justice of the Supreme Court, Rodrguez, was sworn as interim president to succeed the outgoing Carlos Mesa.Plan de TodosMobilizing against neoliberalism as a common enemy of the people, the indigenous population of the Andean region was able to achieve widespread government reform.() Bolivia, in particular, was quite successful due to the prominence of an indigenous population and the persistence of reformist policies. In 1993, Sanchez de Lozada ran for president in alliance with the Tupac Katari Revolutionary Liberation Movement, which inspired indigenous-sensitive and multicultural-aware policies.() Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada (colloquially known as Goni) was able to shift Bolivian society by selling state firms and constitutionally acknowledging the existence of a multicultural and multiethnic population. Current development has led to a neoliberal citizenship regime in which rights are expressed through property ownership, formal democracy and representation, and an investment in the maintaining of infrastructure.In the 1990s, Bolivia introduced, the Plan de Todos, which led to the decentralization of government, introduction of bilingual education, implementation of agrarian legislation, and privatization of state owned businesses. The Plan de Todos main incentive was to encourage popular participation among the Bolivian people. The law recognizes the existence of barrios and rural communities as Territorially Based Organizations (TBOs) and has oversight boards known as rmiles de agilancia, or vigilance committees, that are responsible for overseeing municipal governments and planning projects. The Plan formally acknowledged the existence of 311 municipalities, which benefited directly based on the size of their populations. The Plan de Todos inspired the development of a market democracy with minimally regulated capitalist economy. The Plan explicitly stated that Bolivian citizens would own a minimum of 51% of enterprises; under the Plan, most state owned enterprises (SOEs), besides mines, were sold.() This privatization of SOEs led to innovative neoliberal structuring that acknowledged a diverse population within Bolivia.()The Law of Popular Participation() gave municipalities the responsibility of maintaining various infrastructures (and offering services): health, education, systems of irrigation, which stripped the responsibility away from the state. The state provides municipalities with twenty percent of federal revenue so that each municipality can adequately maintain these infrastructures. The Law also redistributes political power to the local level.The Morales administrationThe two main candidates for the 2005 Bolivian presidential election held on 18 December 2005 were Juan Evo Morales Ayma of the MAS Party and Quiroga, leader of the and Democratic Power (PODEMOS) Party and former head of the Accin Democrtica Nacionalista (ADN) Party. Morales won the election with 53.7% of the votes, an majority, unusual in Bolivian elections. He was sworn in on 22 January 2006, for a five-year term. Prior to his official inauguration in La Paz, he was inaugurated in an Aymara ritual at the archeological site of Tiwanaku before a crowd of thousands of Aymara people and representatives of leftist movements from across Latin America. Though highly symbolic, this ritual was not historically based and primarily represented native Aymaras  not the main Quechua-speaking population. Since the Spanish conquest in the early 16th century, this region of South America, where there is a majority native population, has been ruled mostly by descendants of European immigrants.On 1 May 2006, Morales caused controversy when he announced his intent to re-nationalize Bolivian hydrocarbon assets. While stating that the initiative would not be an expropriation, Morales sent Bolivian troops to occupy 56 gas installations simultaneously, including the two Petrobras-owned refineries which provide over 90% of Bolivias refining-capacity. All foreign energy firms were required to sign new contracts within 180 days giving Bolivia majority ownership, and up to 82% of revenues for the largest natural gas fields. All such firms signed contracts. Reports from the Bolivian government and the companies involved are contradictory as to plans for future investment.By far the biggest customer for Bolivian hydrocarbons has been Brazil, which imports two-thirds of Bolivias natural gas via pipelines operated by the semi-private Petrobras. Since gas can only be exported from landlocked Bolivia via Petrobras large (and expensive) pipelines, the supplier and customer are strongly linked. Petrobras has announced plans to produce enough natural gas by 2011 to replace that now supplied by Bolivia. Bolivias position is strengthened by the knowledge that hydrocarbon reserves are more highly valued now than at the times of previous nationalizations, and by the pledged support of President Chvez of Venezuela.Fulfilling a campaign promise, Morales opened on 6 August 2006, the Constituent Assembly to begin writing a new constitution aimed at giving more power to the indigenous majority.() Problems immediately arose when, unable to garner the two-thirds votes needed to include controversial provisions in the constitutional draft, Morales party announced that only a simple majority would be needed to draft individual articles while two-thirds needed to pass the document in full. Violent protests arose in December 2006 in parts of the country for both two-thirds and departmental autonomy, mostly in the eastern third of the country, where much of the hydrocarbon wealth is located. MAS and its supports believed two-thirds voting rules would give an effective veto for all constitutional changes to the conservative minority.In August 2007, more conflicts arose in Sucre, as the city demanded the discussion of the seat of government inside the assembly, hoping the executive and legislative branch could return to the city, but assembly and the government said this demand was overwhelmingly impractical and politically undesirable. The conflict turned into violence, and the assembly was moved to a military area in Oruro. Although the main opposition party boycotted the session, a constitutional draft was approved on 24 November.In May 2008, Evo Morales was a signatory to the Constitutive Treaty of the of South American Nations. Bolivia has ratified the treaty.In the 2009 national general elections, Evo Morales was re-elected with 64.22% of the vote. His party, Movement for Socialism, also won a two-thirds majority in both houses of the National Congress.GeographyAt , Bolivia is the worlds 28th-largest country.(CIA World Factbook. Retrieved from https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/rankorder/2147rank.html.) It lies between latitudes 9 and 23S, and longitudes 57 and 70W.Bolivia was a landlocked nation from 1879 to 1992, after losing its coastal department of Litoral to Chile in the of the Pacific. However, it does have access to the Atlantic via the River. In 1992, Peru gave Bolivia a parcel of land on the Pacific coast. In 2010 this was expanded into a 99-year lease allowing the development of a port and naval station on a  land parcel  south of Perus port of Ilo. However, since no ports yet exist on this land, Bolivia is in effect still landlocked.()Many ecological zones are represented within Bolivias territory. The western highlands of the country are situated in the Andes and include the Bolivian Altiplano. The eastern lowlands include large sections of Amazonian rainforests and the Chaco Plain. The highest peak is Sajama at  located in the Department. Titicaca is located on the border between Bolivia and Peru. The de Uyuni, the worlds largest flat, lies in the southwest corner of the country, in Department.ClimateThe weather in Bolivia can vary drastically from one climatic zone to another. The summer months in Bolivia are November through March. The weather is typically warmer and wetter during these months. April through October, the winter months, are typically colder and drier.In the highlands, the weather can be very cold and temperatures frequently go below zero at night, especially on the Altiplano. Snow is common in Potos during the winter months and sometimes also falls on La Paz and Oruro. In contrast, winter in Sucre, Cochabamba and Tarija on the Cordillera Real is a time of blue skies and comfortable temperatures.The weather in the rainforest is usually very hot and is often very wet. The drier period of the year is May to October. The section of the rainforest that borders the Cordillera Real of the Andes Mountains is a bit cooler, but still very wet. As altitude declines, the temperature rises. Additionally many rivers and aquatic zones will dry up very noticeably in winter and then flood in summer creating an unpredictable landscape.GeologyThe of Bolivia comprises a variety of different lithologies as well as tectonic and sedimentary environments. On a synoptic scale, geological units coincide with topographical units. Most elementally, the country is divided into a mountainous western area affected by the subduction processes in the Pacific and an eastern lowlands of stable platforms and shields.EconomyBolivia is one of the poorest and least developed countries in America, despite being rich in resources. Bolivias 2002 gross domestic product (GDP) totaled USD $7.9 billion. Economic growth was about 2.5% per year, and inflation was between 3% and 4% in 2002 (it was under 2% in 2001). Bolivia was rated Repressed by the 2010 of Economic Freedom.() However, despite a series of mostly political setbacks, between 2006 and 2009 the Morales administration has spurred growth higher than at any point in the preceding 30 years. The growth was accompanied by a moderate decrease in inequality.()File:Cochabamba1.JPG|thumb|right|CochabambaBolivias current economic situation remains lackluster, a factor that can be linked to several factors from the past three decades. The first major blow to the Bolivian economy came with a dramatic fall in the price of tin during the early 1980s, which impacted one of Bolivias main sources of income and one of its major mining-industries.() The second major economic blow came at the end of the War in the late 1980s and early 1990s as economic aid was withdrawn by western countries who had previously tried to keep a market-liberal regime in power through financial support.Since 1985, the government of Bolivia has implemented a far-reaching program of macroeconomic stabilization and structural reform aimed at maintaining price stability, creating conditions for sustained growth, and alleviating scarcity. A major reform of the customs service in recent years has significantly improved transparency in this area.Parallel legislative reforms have locked into place market-liberal policies, especially in the hydrocarbon and telecommunication sectors, that have encouraged private investment. Foreign investors are accorded national treatment, and foreign ownership of companies enjoys virtually no restrictions in Bolivia.(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ei/bgn/35751.htm#econ Economy of Bolivia-Source-US State Government)Bolivia has the second largest gas reserves in South America.() The government has a long-term sales-agreement to sell natural gas to Brazil through 2019. The government held a binding referendum in 2005 on the Hydrocarbon Law.The US Geological Service estimates that Bolivia has 5.4 million tonnes of lithium which represents 50%70% of world reserves. The light metal is used to make high-capacity batteries used in electric cars and such. The spinoff effect of lithium mining could cause Bolivia to become the Saudi Arabia of the Green World. However, to mine for it would involve disturbing the countrys salt flats (called de Uyuni), an important natural feature which boosts tourism in the region. The government does not want to destroy this unique natural landscape, to meet the rising world demand for lithium.()In April 2000, Hugo Banzer, the former President of Bolivia, signed a contract with Aguas del Tunari, a private consortium, to operate and improve the water supply in Bolivias third-largest city, Cochabamba. Shortly thereafter, the company tripled the water rates in that city, an action which resulted in protests and rioting among those who could no longer afford clean water.(Jennifer Hattam, Who Owns Water? Sierra, September 2001, v.86, iss.5, p.16.)(PBS Frontline/World Leasing the Rain, Video, June 2002) Amidst Bolivias nationwide economic collapse and growing national unrest over the state of the economy, the Bolivian government was forced to withdraw the water contract.Bolivian commercial exports were $1.3 billion in 2002, from a low of $652 million in 1991. Imports were $1.7 billion in 2002. Bolivian tariffs are a uniformly low 10%, with capital equipment charged only 5%. Bolivias trade-deficit was $460 million in 2002.File:Piles of Salt Salar de Uyuni Bolivia Luca Galuzzi 2006 a.jpg|thumb|right|Salt mounds in de Uyuni. Each mound is about a meter high.Bolivias trade with neighboring countries is growing, in part because of several regional preferential trade agreements it has negotiated. Bolivia is a member of the Community of Nations and enjoys nominally free trade with other member countries.The United States remains Bolivias largest trading partner (excepting natural resources, such as natural gas). In 2002, the United States exported $283 million of merchandise to Bolivia and imported $162 million.Agriculture accounts for roughly 15% of Bolivias GDP. Soybeans are the major crop, sold into the Andean Community market.Bolivias government remains heavily dependent on foreign assistance to finance development projects. At the end of 2002, the government owed $4.5 billion to its foreign creditors, with $1.6 billion of this amount owed to other governments and most of the balance owed to multilateral development banks. Most payments to other governments have been rescheduled on several occasions since 1987 through the Club mechanism. External creditors have been willing to do this because the Bolivian government has generally achieved the monetary and fiscal targets set by IMF programs since 1987, though economic crises in recent years have undercut Bolivias normally good record.File:Uros people-Lake Titicaca.jpg|thumb|150 px|right|Uro person on floating an islet in Titicaca.The rescheduling of agreements granted by the Paris Club has allowed the individual creditor countries to apply very soft terms to the rescheduled debt. As a result, some countries have forgiven substantial amounts of Bolivias bilateral debt. The U.S. government reached an agreement at the Paris Club meeting in December 1995 that reduced by 67% Bolivias existing debt stock. The Bolivian government continues to pay its debts to the multilateral development banks on time. Bolivia is a beneficiary of the Indebted Poor Countries (HIPC) and Enhanced HIPC debt relief programs, which by agreement restricts Bolivias access to new soft loans.The income from tourism becomes increasingly important. Bolivias tourist industry has grown gradually since about 1990.DemographicsFile:Mujeres aymara con siku y caja - flickr-photos-micahmacallen-85524669 (CC-BY-SA).jpg|thumb|180 px|right|Festival in SucreBolivias ethnic distribution is estimated to be 30% Quechua-speaking and 25% Aymara-speaking. The largest of the approximately three dozen native groups are the Quechuas (2.5 million), Aymaras (2 million), then Chiquitano (180,000), and Guaran (125,000). So the full Amerindian population is at 55%; the remaining 30% is mestizo (mixed Amerindian and European), and around 15% are whites.(Bolivian people)The white population consists mostly of criollos, which in turn consist of families of relatively unmixed Spanish ancestry, descended from the early Spanish colonists. These have formed much of the aristocracy since independence. Other smaller groups within the white population are Germans, who founded the former national airline Areo Boliviano, as well as Italians, Basques, Croats, Russians, Poles and other minorities, many of whose members descend from families that have lived in Bolivia for several generations. Some 40,000 German-speaking Mennonites live in eastern Bolivia.(Bolivian Reforms Raise Anxiety on Mennonite Frontier. The New York Times. 21 December 2006.)File:Miners at Work Potosi (pixinn.net).jpg|left|thumb|Young miners at work in PotosThe Bolivian community numbers more than 0.5% of the population, descended from African slaves that were transported to work in Brazil and then migrated westward into Bolivia. They are mostly concentrated in the Yungas region (Nor Yungas and Sud Yungas provinces) in the department of La Paz. There are also Japanese who are concentrated mostly in Cruz de la Sierra, and Middle Easterners who became prosperous in commerce.Bolivia is one of the least developed countries in South America. Almost two-thirds of its people, many of whom are subsistence farmers, live in poverty. Population density ranges from less than one person per square kilometre in the southeastern plains to about ten per square kilometre (25 per sq. mi) in the central highlands. As of 2006, the population is increasing about 1.45% per year.()Major cities are Paz (administrative capital), Sucre (capital), Cruz de la Sierra (largest population), Alto, Oruro and Cochabamba.HealthIn 2006, life expectancy at birth was 64 for males and 67 for females.( A study by Development Programme and UNICEF reported that over 230 babies in Bolivia died per day through lack of proper care.() The majority of the population has no health insurance.() A significant part of the population has no access to healthcare.( and Health Surveys has completed five surveys in Bolivia since 1989 on a wide range of topics.(Bolivia Surveys,)ReligionFile:Cristo de la Concordia 02.jpg|thumb|140 px|left|Cristo de la Concordia in Cochabamba, a symbol of Catholic influence in BoliviaAlthough the great majority of Bolivians are Roman Catholic, Protestant denominations and traditional ethnic religion()() Religions are expanding rapidly.( According to a 2001 survey conducted by the National Statistical Institute, 78% of the population is Roman Catholic, 16% is Protestant and 3% follow other Christian denominations.() Islam is practiced by the descendants of Arabs and local converts, constituting a small minority of just over 2000 adherents.  There is also a small Jewish community that is almost all Ashkenazim in origin. The state has no official religion.There are colonies of Mennonites in the Santa Cruz Department.() Many Native communities interweave pre-Columbia and Christian symbols in their worship.LanguageSpanish 60.7% (official), Quechua 21.2% (official), Aymara 14.6% (official), foreign languages 2.4%, other 1.2% (2001 census according to CIA Factbook). According to Nacional de Estadstica de Bolivia 28.1% of the population of Bolivia spoke an indigenous language as a first language in 2007. This had increased to 29.4% in 2008. Approximately 90% of the children attend primary-school but often for a year or less. Until the 2001 census the literacy rate was low in many rural areas, but, according to the CIA, the literacy rate was 87% nationwide, which is similar to Brazils but below the South American average. Nevertheless in 2008 after the campaign Yes I can, Bolivia was declared illiteracy-free under the UNESCO standards.()Politics and governmentFile:LaPaz Plaza Pedro Di Murillo 10.2004.jpg|thumb|The government building of the Congress of Bolivia at the Plaza Murillo in central Paz.Bolivia has been governed by democratically elected governments since 1982, when a long string of military coups came to an end. Presidents Siles Zuazo (198285) and Paz Estenssoro (198589) began a tradition of ceding power peacefully which has continued, although two presidents have stepped down in the face of popular protests: Snchez de Lozada in 2003 and Mesa in 2005. Bolivias multiparty democracy has seen a wide variety of parties in the presidency and parliament, although the Nationalist Movement, Democratic Action, and the Left Movement predominated from 1985 to 2005. The current president is Morales, the first indigenous Bolivian to serve as head of state. Morales for Socialism  Political Instrument for the Sovereignty of the Peoples party was the first to win an outright presidential majority in four decades, doing so both in 2005 and 2009.The constitution, drafted in 2006-07 and approved in 2009, provides for balanced executive, legislative, judicial, and electoral powers, as well as several levels of autonomy. The traditionally strong executive branch tends to overshadow the Congress, whose role is generally limited to debating and approving legislation initiated by the executive. The judiciary, consisting of the Supreme Court and departmental and lower courts, has long been riddled with corruption and inefficiency. Through revisions to the constitution in 1994, and subsequent laws, the government has initiated potentially far-reaching reforms in the judicial system as well as increasing decentralizing powers to departments, municipalities, and indigenous territories.Executive branchThe executive branch is headed by a President and Vice President, and consists of a variable number (currently, 20) of government ministries. The president is elected to a five-year term by vote, and governs from the Presidential Palace (popularly called the Burnt Palace, Palacio Quemado) in La Paz. In the case that no candidate receives an majority of the popular vote or more than 40% of the vote with an advantage of more than 10% over the second place finisher, a run-off is to be held among the two candidates most voted.(Constitucin Poltica del According to anonymous sources it is said that one of the three countries that would be one kingdom,( Bolivia , Per and Ecuador) one of them is going to have monarchy and the man who will promote this will be president of that country, then abolish the republic and a monarchy would be established by placing his father as king, the government is said to be a constitutional monarchy stands for this man are said to also say Its initials would be PNCB he been born 15 years ago, also said that his government will be very successful to be characterized by the capitalism and be commander in a new war. Estado, art. 166.)PrisonsThere are 53 in Bolivia which incarcerate around 8,700 people as of 2010. The prisons are managed by the Penitentiary Regime Directorate (). There are 17 prisons in departmental capital cities and 36 provincial prisons.Legislative branchThe Asamblea Legislativa Plurinacional (Legislative Assembly or National Congress) has two chambers. The Cmara de Diputados (Chamber of Deputies) has 130 members elected to five year terms, seventy from single-member districts (circunscripciones), sixty by proportional representation, and seven by the minority indigenous peoples of seven departments. The Cmara de Senadores (Chamber of Senators) has 36 members (four per department). Members of the Assembly are elected to five year terms. The body has its headquarters on the Plaza Murillo in La Paz, but also holds honorary sessions elsewhere in Bolivia. The Vice President serves as titular head of the combined Assembly.Judicial branchThe judiciary consists of the Supreme Court, the Constitutional Tribunal, the Judiciary Council, Agrarian and Environmental Tribunal, and District (departmental) and lower courts.* Plurinational Constitutional Tribunal ()  rules on the constitutionality of government or court actions* Supreme Court or Supreme Tribunal of Justice ()*  Agrarian and Environmental Tribunal ()  highest court authority in matters of agriculture and the environment* Judiciary Council ()  oversees the conduct of courts and judges, including misconduct and ethical violations* District Courts (one in each department)* Provincial and local courtsIn October 2011, Bolivia will hold its first judicial elections to choose members of the national courts by popular vote.Electoral branchThe electoral branch of Bolivias government, formally the Electoral Organ, is an independent branch of government which replaced the National Electoral Court in 2010. The branch consists of the Supreme Electoral Tribunal, the nine Departmental Electoral Tribunals, Electoral Judges, the anonymously selected Juries at Election Tables, and Electoral Notaries.() Wilfredo Ovando presides over the seven-member Supreme Electoral Tribunal. Its operations are mandated by the Constitution and regulated by the Electoral Regime Law (Law 026, passed 2010). The Organs first elections will be the countrys first judicial election in October 2011 and five municipal special elections expected to be held in 2011.Administrative divisionsFile:Bolivia departments uonamed.png|right|thumb|Map of the of Bolivia.Bolivia is divided into nine departments (departamentos), which are further divided into 112 provinces (provincias), into 339 municipalities (municipios). Municipalities may combine into regions or into mancomunidades for joint planning purposes. Municipalities have subdivisions called districts (distritos) and cantons (cantones), which handle local affairs, although the status of cantons is in flux following their exclusion from the 2009 Constitution. Indigenous territories, called Community Lands, are separately organized community units. All indigenous territories, and municipalities and regions that so choose by referendum, operate under a form of indigenous self-governance on the basis of their own y costumbres.Bolivias departments and their capitals are as follows:* Beni (Trinidad)* Chuquisaca (Sucre)* Cochabamba (Cochabamba)* La Paz (Paz)* Oruro (Oruro)* Pando (Cobija)* Potos (Potos)* Santa Cruz (Cruz de la Sierra)* Tarija (Tarija)Bolivias nine departments received greater autonomy under the Administrative Decentralization law of 1995. Departmental autonomy further increased with the first popular elections for departmental governors (prefectos) on 18 December 2005, after long protests by the pro-autonomy department of Santa Cruz.The departments of Tarija, Beni, Pando and Santa Cruz are sometimes known as the half moon because of the crescent shape of the departments when looked at together in the east of the country. They also have in common conservative politics and rich fossil fuel deposits.Bolivian cities and towns are governed by directly elected mayors and councils. Municipal elections were held on 5 December 2004, with councils elected to five-year terms. The Popular Participation Law of April 1994, which distributes a significant portion of national revenues to municipalities for discretionary use, has enabled previously neglected communities to make striking improvements in their facilities and services.MilitaryFile:GuentherZ 2006-08 12 0891 Jagdpanzer Kuerassier OeBH.jpg|thumb|An SK-105, the battle tank of the Bolivian army.The Bolivian military comprises three branches: Ejrcito (Army), Naval (Navy) and Fuerza Area (Air Force). The legal age for voluntary admissions is 18; however, when the numbers are small the government recruits anyone as young as 14.(CIA -The World Factbook  Bolivia) The of duty is generally 12 months. The Bolivian government annually spends $130 million on defense.()The Bolivian Army has around 31,500 men. There are six military regions (regiones militaresRMs) in the army. The Army is organized into ten divisions.Though it is landlocked Bolivia keeps a navy. The Naval Force (Fuerza Naval Boliviana in Spanish) is a naval force about 5,000 strong in 2008.()The Air Force (Fuerza Area Boliviana or FAB) has nine air bases, located at La Paz, Cochabamba, Santa Cruz, Surez, Tarija, Villamontes, Cobija, Riberalta, and Robor.Civil aviationThe General Directorate of Civil Aeronautics (Direccin General de Aeronutica CivilDGAC) formerly part of the FAB, administers a civil aeronautics school called the National Institute of Civil Aeronautics (Instituto Nacional de Aeronutica CivilINAC), and two commercial air transport services TAM and TAB.TAM (Transporte Areo Militar) Transporte Areo Militar (the Bolivian Military Airline) is an airline based in La Paz, Bolivia. It is the civilian wing of the Fuerza Area Boliviana (the Bolivian Air Force), operating passenger services to remote towns and communities in the North and Northeast of Bolivia. TAM (a.k.a. TAM Group 71) has been a part of the FAB since 1945.A similar airline serving the Department with small planes is Lnea Area Amaszonas,() using smaller planes than TAM.TAB (Transportes Areos Bolivianos)Although a civil transport airline,  Transportes Areos Bolivianos, was created as a subsidiary company of the FAB in 1977. It is subordinate to the Air Transport Management (Gerencia de Transportes Areos) and is headed by an FAB general. TAB, a charter heavy cargo airline, links Bolivia with most countries of the Hemisphere; its inventory included a fleet of Hercules C130 aircraft. TAB was headquartered adjacent to Alto International Airport. TAB also flew to Miami and Houston, with stops in Panama.CultureFile:Nios ejecutando una tarkeada.jpg|thumb|250 px|right|Bolivian children playing tarkaBolivian culture has been heavily influenced by the Quechua, the Aymara, as well as by the popular cultures of Latin America as a whole.The cultural development is divided into three distinct periods: precolumbian, colonial, and republican. Important archaeological ruins, gold and silver ornaments, stone monuments, ceramics, and weavings remain from several important pre-Columbian cultures. Major ruins include Tiwanaku, Fuerte de Samaipata, Incallajta, and Iskanawaya. The country abounds in other sites that are difficult to reach and have seen little archaeological exploration.(File:Diablada oruro fraternidad.jpg|thumb|left|250px|The Diablada, dance primeval, typical and main of of Oruro a Masterpiece of the Oral and Intangible Heritage of Humanity since 2001 in Bolivia (File: Fraternidad Artstica y Cultural La Diablada.The Spanish brought their own tradition of religious art which, in the hands of local native and mestizo builders and artisans, developed into a rich and distinctive style of architecture, painting, and sculpture known as Mestizo Baroque. The colonial period produced not only the paintings of Prez de Holgun, Flores, Bitti, and others but also the works of skilled but unknown stonecutters, woodcarvers, goldsmiths, and silversmiths. An important body of Native Baroque religious music of the colonial period was recovered in recent years and has been performed internationally to wide acclaim since 1994.(Bolivian artists of stature in the twentieth century include Guzmn de Rojas, Arturo Borda, Luisa Pacheco, Mamani Mamani, Mario Yllanes, Da Silva, and Nez del Prado, Vega.Bolivia has a rich folklore. Its regional music is distinctive and varied. The devil dances at the annual carnival of Oruro are one of the great folkloric events of South America, as is the lesser known carnival at Tarabuco.(The best known of the various festivals found in the country is the de Oruro, which was among the first 19 Masterpieces of the Oral and Intangible Heritage of Humanity, as proclaimed by the UNESCO in May 2001.Entertainment includes football, which is the national sport, as well as football, which is played on street corners by both children and adults.EducationUnder UNESCO standards, Bolivia has been declared free of illiteracy in 2008.(Bolivia has a wide variety of public and private universities. Among them: San Francisco Xavier de Chuquisaca USFX  Sucre, founded in 1624; Mayor de San Andres UMSA  La Paz, founded in 1830; Mayor de San Simon UMSS  Cochabamba, founded in 1832; Autonoma Gabriel Rene Moreno UAGRM  Santa Cruz de la Sierra, founded in 1880; Tecnica de Oruro UTO  Oruro, founded in 1892; Autnoma Toms Fras UATF  Potosi, founded in 1892; Juan Misael Saracho UJMS  Tarija, founded in 1946; Catolica Boliviana San Pablo UCB, founded in 1966; Tcnica del Beni UTB  Trinidad, founded in 1967; Nur NUR, founded in 1982; Privada de Santa Cruz de la Sierra UPSA  Santa Cruz de la Sierra, founded in 1984; Nacional Siglo XX UNSXX  Llallagua, founded in 1986; Universidad del Valle UNIVALLE -Cochabamba, founded in 1988; Privada Boliviana UPB, founded in 1993; Privada Franz Tamayo UPFT, founded in 1993 and Amaznica de Pando UAP  Cobija, founded in 1993.For the first time in Bolivian history, three indigenous universities were created: Aymara Tupac Katari UATK  La Paz, founded in 2009; Quechua Casmiro Huanca UQCH  Cochabamba, founded in 2009 and Boliviana Guaran y Pueblos de Tierras Bajas UGPTB  Chuquisaca, founded in 2009.See also*rankings of Bolivia*America Life Quality RankingsFurther reading* Alexander, R. J. (2005) A History of Organized Labor in Bolivia, Praeger Publishers Inc* Atkinson, D. (2007) Bradt Travel Guide: Bolivia, Bradt Travel Guides* Crabtree J., and Whitehead, L. (eds.; 2008) Unresolved Tensions: Bolivia Past and Present, University of Pittsburgh Press* Dangl, B. (2007) The Price of Fire: Resource Wars and Social Movements in Bolivia, AK Press* Farcau, B. W. (2000) The Ten Cents War: Chile, Peru and Bolivia in the War of the Pacific, 1879-1884, Greenwood Press* Farthing, L. and Kohl, B. (2006) Impasse in Bolivia: Neoliberal Hegemony and Popular Resistance, Zed Books* Gill, L. (2000) Teetering on the Rim: Global Restructuring, Daily Life, and the Armed Retreat of the Bolivian State, Columbia University Press* Goldstein, D. M. (2004) The Spectacular City: Violence and Performance in Urban Bolivia, Duke University Press* Gustafson, B. D. (2009) New Languages of the State: Indigenous Resurgence and the Politics of Knowledge in Bolivia , Duke University Press* Harten, S. (2011) The Rise of Evo Morales and the MAS, Zed Books* Healy, K. (2000) Llamas, Weavings and Organic Chocolate: Multicultural Grassroots Development in the Andes and Amazon of Bolivia, University of Notre Dame Press* Hylton, F. and Thomson, S. (2008) Revolutionary Horizons: Past and Present in Bolivian Politics, Verso* Jacobs, M. (2006) Ghost Train Through the Andes: On My Grandfathers Trail in Chile and Bolivia, John Murray* Jemio, L. C. (2001) Debt, Crisis Reform Bolivia: Biting the Bullet, Palgrave Macmillan* Klein, H. S. (1992) Bolivia: The Evolution of a Multi-Ethnic Society, Oxford University Press* Klein, H. S. (2011) A Concise History of Bolivia, Stanford University Press* Kunststaetter, D. and R. (2008) Footprint Handbook: Bolivia, Footprint Handbooks* Lazar, S. (2008) El Alto, Rebel City: Self and Citizenship in Andean Bolivia, Duke University Press* Lougheed, V. (2008) Understanding Bolivia: A Travellers History, Harbour Publishing* McLaughlin, D. (2008) Bolivia, Fields Publishing* Morales, W. Q. (1992) Bolivia: Land of Struggle, Westview Press* Mutic, A.(2010) Lonely Planet Guide: Bolivia, Lonely Planet* Olivera, O. and Lewis, T. (2004) Cochabamba!: Water Rebellion in Bolivia, End Press* Petras, J. (2005) Social Movements and State Power: Argentina, Brazil, Bolivia, Ecuador, Pluto Press* Postero, N. G. (2006) Now We Are Citizens: Indigenous Politics in Post-multicultural Bolivia, Stanford University Press* Powers, W. (2006) Whispering in the Giants Ear: A Frontline Chronicle from Bolivias War on Globalization, Bloomsbury Publishing* Read, J. (2008) The Rough Guide to Bolivia, Rough Guides* Richards, K. (2009) Culture Smart!: Bolivia, Kuperard* Sivak, M. (2010) Evo Morales: The Extraordinary Rise of the First Indigenous President of Bolivia, Palgrave Macmillan* Spitzer, L. (1999) Hotel Bolivia: The Culture of Memory in a Refuge from Nazism, Hill & Wang* Stearman, A. M. (1989) Camba and Kolla: Migration and Development in Santa Cruz, Bolivia, University Press of Florida* Suzuki, T. (2010) Embodying Belonging: Racializing Okinawan Diaspora in Bolivia and Japan, niversity of Hawaii Press* Webber, J. R. (2011) Rebellion and Reform in Bolivia, Haymarket Books* Webber, J. R. (2011) Red October: Left-Indigenous Struggles in Modern Bolivia, Brill Academic* Werner, R. J. (2009) Bolivia in Focus: A Guide to the People, Politics, and Culture, Interlink Publishing* Young, R. (2004) Marching Powder, PanReferencesExternal links* UNHCR: Bolivia references* World Health Organization: Bolivia** U.S. Library of Congress  Bolivia: A Country Study* Encyclopedia of the Nations: Bolivia* BBC News: Country Profile  Bolivia* Lonely Planet: Introducing Bolivia* Bolivia Weekly Bolivia News* U.S. State Department: Bolivia* World Trade Organization: Bolivia* World Atlas: Map of Bolivia* The Carter Center: Bolivia* Embassy World: Maps of Bolivia* The New York Times: Bolivia News* The Washington Post: Bolivia Country Guide* Association of Religion Data Archives profile: Bolivia* Languages of Bolivia* Bolivian Information Forum* LANIC Bolivia page* Bolivia: Legacy of the Chaco War* Bolivia: Photos and Postcards* Bolivia Economy* Complete information on BoliviaRelated informationlist ace:Boliviaaf:Bolivials:Bolivienam:ang:Bolifiaab:ar:an:Boliviaroa-rup:Boliviafrp:Bolivieast:Boliviagn:Volviaay:Wuliwyaaz:Boliviyabm:Boliviabn:zh-min-nan:Boliviaba:be:be-x-old:bcl:Bolibyabi:Boliviabo:bs:Bolivijabr:Boliviabg:ca:Bolviacv:ceb:Boliviacs:Bolviecbk-zam:Boliviaco:Boliviacy:Bolifiada:Boliviade:Boliviendv:nv:Bolbiyadsb:Boliwiskaet:Boliiviael:es:Boliviaeo:Bolivioext:Bolviaeu:Boliviaee:Boliviafa:hif:Boliviafo:Boliviafr:Boliviefy:BoliviaBholaivVoliviagag:Boliviyagd:Boilibhiagl:Boliviahak:P-li-v-  ko:hy:hi:hsb:Boliwiskahr:Bolivijaio:Boliviailo:Boliviabpy:id:Boliviaia:Boliviaie:Boliviaos:is:Blivait:Boliviahe:jv:Boliviakl:Boliviakn:pam:Boliviaka:ks:kk:kw:Bolivirw:Boliviyaky:rn:Boliviyasw:Boliviaht:Boliviku:Bolvyamrj:ltg:Bolivejala:Bolivialv:Bolvijalb:Bolivienlt:Bolivijalij:Boliviali:Bolivialn:Boliviajbo:boliviaslmo:Buliviahu:Bolviamk:ml:mr:arz:ms:Boliviamwl:Bolbiamn:my:nah:Boliviana:Boribiyanl:Bolivianew:ja:frr:Boliiwienpih:Boliwyano:Boliviann:Bolivianov:Boliviaoc:Bolviamhr:uz:Boliviyapnb:pap:Boliviaps:pms:Boliviands:Bolivienpl:Boliwiapt:Bolviakaa:Boliviyacrh:Boliviyaro:Boliviarmy:Boliviyarm:Boliviaqu:Buliwyaru:sah:se:Boliviasa:sco:Boliviesq:Boliviascn:Boliviasimple:Boliviass:IBholiviyask:Bolviasl:Bolivijaszl:Boliwijoso:Boliifiackb:sr:sh:Bolivijafi:Boliviasv:Boliviatl:Bulibyata:tt:te:tet:Bolviath:tg:chr:tr:Bolivyauk:ur:ug:vec:Boiviavi:Boliviavo:Bolivnfiu-vro:Boliiviawa:Boliveyezh-classical:war:Boliviawo:Boliibiwuu:yi:yo:Blfzh-yue:diq:Bolivyabat-smg:Buolvjzh:
